REAUTHORIZATION  OF  THE 

COASTAL  ZONE  MANAGEMENT  ACT 

S.  HRG.  109–1100 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  25,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

63–243 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 25, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................

WITNESSES 

fense Council 

Chasis,  Sarah,  Director,  Water  and  Coastal  Program,  Natural  Resources  De-
........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cooksey,  Sarah  W.,  Administrator,  Delaware  Coastal  Programs;  Board  Mem-
ber and Former Chair, Coastal States Organization  ........................................
Governor  and  State  letters  from  Texas,  South  Carolina,  Alabama,  Vir-
ginia, and California recommending CZMA reauthorization  ....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cruickshank, Dr. Walter D., Deputy Director, Minerals Management Service, 
Department of the Interior  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hudson, Jr., W. Donald, Ph.D., President, Chewonki Foundation; Maine Gov-
ernor Baldacci’s Non-Governmental Appointee to the Gulf of Maine Council 
on  the  Marine  Environment;  President,  U.S.  Gulf  of  Maine  Association; 
and Treasurer, National Marine Educators Association 
..................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Fry, Tom, President, National Ocean Industries Association  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jeffress,  Bill,  Director,  Office  of  Project  Management  and  Permitting,  Alaska 
Department of Natural Resources  ......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kitsos,  Thomas,  Ph.D.,  Associate  Deputy  Assistant  Administrator,  National 
Ocean Services, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Boxer, Hon. Barbara, U.S. Senator from California, prepared statement  ..........
Letters  to  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell, 

and Hon Olympia J. Snowe from: 

W.  Paul  Farmer,  Executive  Director/CEO,  American  Planning  Associa-
tion  .................................................................................................................
Lynne  Zeitlin  Hale,  Director,  Global  Marine  Initiative,  The  Nature  Con-
servancy  .........................................................................................................
Marc  J.  Hershman,  Professor  of  Marine  Affairs,  Adjunct  Professor  of 
Law, University of Washington  ...................................................................
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  Association  (NERRA),  prepared  state-
......................................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Sarah Chasis  .....................................................................................................
Sarah W. Cooksey  .............................................................................................
Dr. Walter D. Cruickshank  ..............................................................................
Thomas Kitsos, Ph.D.  .......................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Olympia J. Snowe to: 

ment 

Sarah Chasis  .....................................................................................................
Sarah W. Cooksey  .............................................................................................
Dr. Walter D. Cruickshank  ..............................................................................
W. Donald Hudson, Jr., Ph.D.  .........................................................................
Thomas Kitsos, Ph.D.  .......................................................................................

Page 
1 
45 
46 
4 
1 
3 

47 
48 

15 

15 
26 

10 
12 

54 
56 
50 
52 

59 
60 

6 
7 

69 

90 

88 

89 

70 

87 
85 
85 
83 

79 
77 
75 
80 
74 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

REAUTHORIZATION  OF  THE 

COASTAL  ZONE  MANAGEMENT  ACT 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  25,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Olympia  J.  Snowe 
presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order.  First  of  all,  I 
want to thank Chairman Stevens for allowing me to chair this full 
Committee  hearing  today  on  the  very  important  issue  of  reauthor-
izing  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act.  I  certainly  want  to  ex-
press  my  appreciation  to  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  for  putting  this 
on the Committee’s agenda so that it can move forward, and I truly 
appreciate that. 

I look forward to discussing a great challenge facing our Nation’s 
coastal  states,  and  that  is  the  need  to  balance  economic  develop-
ment  and  environmental  protection.  Together  we  can  chart  a 
course for better balancing and supporting these efforts through S. 
360,  the  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Reauthorization  Act  of  2005. 
I  am  proud  to  have  introduced  this  legislation,  which  would 
strengthen  the  Act’s  State-Federal  partnerships  and  funding  pro-
grams  to  support  our  coastal  communities.  Many  of  my  colleagues 
have been instrumental in collaborating with me on this particular 
language. 

I recognize the challenges facing our lands that border the oceans 
and  Great  Lakes.  Even  though  coastal  counties  cover  only  17  per-
cent  of  the  United  States,  this  area  is  home  to  more  than  50  per-
cent  of  the  Nation’s  population.  Over  360  ports  and  10  of  our  15 
largest cities are located on the seaboard. Moreover, the population 
growth  rate  will  continue  to  climb  in  these  areas  as  people  are  at-
tracted  by  the  vibrant  mix  of  recreational  amenities  and  economic 
opportunities. Over time, however, social and economic demands in 
these  areas  will  strain  coastal  infrastructure,  alter  waterfront  ac-
cess, and increase the flow of pollution into our waters. 

But  urban  areas  are  not  our  only  concern.  Our  coasts,  a  rel-
atively  small  sliver  of  our  country,  also  support  diverse  habitats 
and ecosystems that are vital to multibillion dollar commercial and 
recreational  fisheries  and  other  natural  resources.  Healthy  fishing 
industries  form  the  backbone  of  our  coastal  towns  in  many  states 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

across  this  country,  including  my  home  State  of  Maine,  and  rec-
reational opportunities along our state’s picturesque coastline draw 
increasing  numbers  of  people,  making  tourism  in  our  state  the 
largest  industry.  We  must  ensure  that  coastal  plans  continue  to 
take natural resource conservation into account. 

Since 1972 the Coastal Zone Management Act has enabled coast-
al  states  to  manage  and  develop  their  environments  and  resources 
in  a  sound,  sustainable  manner.  However,  as  noted  in  the  U.S. 
Commission on Ocean Policy’s final report, the increasing pressures 
facing  our  coastal  regions  continue  to  evolve  in  scope  and  com-
plexity.  For  example,  non-point  source  pollution  has  become  the 
primary  cause  of  nutrient  loading,  hypoxia,  harmful  algal  blooms, 
and  environmental  toxins  in  coastal  waters.  Development  and 
sprawl  in  the  coastal  zone  compounds  this  problem  and  puts  addi-
tional pressures on habitats and infrastructure. 

This  hearing  today  is  a  critical  step  toward  addressing  these 
growing  challenges.  Today  we  will  hear  about  ways  to  better  sup-
port  local  coordination  and  planning  efforts,  fund  essential  new 
coastal  research,  and  resolve  funding  disparities  that  currently 
exist  under  this  Act.  Yet  most  of  the  legislation  does  not  need  to 
be  amended.  The  Act  has  established  a  remarkably  successful 
State-Federal  framework  for  coastal  zone  management,  and  we 
must ensure it continues to do so. 

For  instance,  34  states  volunteer  to  participate  in  the  Act’s  pro-
gram to develop coastal zone management plans custom-tailored to 
their  individual  needs.  Once  a  plan  is  Federally  approved,  match-
ing  funds  are  available  to  help  each  state  implement  its  plan,  and 
these  states  are  able  to  review  and  approve  any  Federal  action  off 
their shores. This consistency requirement fosters much-needed col-
laboration between local, State, and Federal governments. 

My  bill  would  uphold  the  grant  programs  and  consistency  rules 
of the original Act, but it also seeks to expand funding sources and 
community planning tools to meet emerging state needs. For exam-
ple,  it  would  increase  the  total  funding  authorization  to  $160  mil-
lion  in  Fiscal  Year  2006  and  increase  it  to  $175  million  by  2010. 
It  would  also  encourage,  but  not  require,  states  to  take  additional 
steps  to  combat  the  problem  of  non-point  source  pollution  and  en-
courage  local  infrastructure  and  development  planning  through  a 
new coastal community program. In Maine, non-point source pollu-
tion programs have been credited with reopening hundreds of acres 
of  shellfish  beds,  a  $16  million  industry,  and  the  recovery  of  fish 
nursery  areas.  However,  NOAA’s  funding  for  non-point  programs 
has  declined  dramatically,  so  we  must  renew  our  Federal  commit-
ment to addressing this national problem. Every coastal state could 
potentially  benefit  from  the  flexibility  and  funding  of  these  pro-
grams. 

As  we  strive  to  support  our  states’  coastal  planning  efforts,  we 
must  do  so  equitably.  To  this  end,  my  bill  will  fix  a  problem  with 
the  funding  structure  of  the  coastal  zone  management  program. 
Each state’s funding level has been determined by a formula based 
on  the  length  of  coastline  and  population.  In  1992  this  level  was 
capped  at  $2  million  in  an  attempt  to  ensure  equal  treatment  of 
states. A growing number of the states have reached this cap in the 
last 13 years. The result is that the 13 states accounting for 83 per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

cent  of  our  coastline  and  76  percent  of  our  coastal  population  are 
trapped under this cap. 

The coastal management programs of these states are stagnating 
while  their  needs  are  ever-increasing.  My  colleagues  and  I  are  de-
veloping  language  in  this  bill  for  removing  this  cap  while  assuring 
that smaller states receive funding at equitable levels. 

Finally, as we work to reauthorize the Act, our overarching goals 
must  be  to  uphold  and  strengthen  the  provisions  that  empower 
states  to  control  activities  affecting  their  coasts.  Each  state  has  a 
unique  social  and  economic  situation,  and  ultimately  each  state, 
not  a  Federal  agency,  needs  to  control  the  future  direction  of  its 
coast.  There  is  no  better  way  to  assure  this  is  done  than  through 
the collaboration and funding frameworks of the Act. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  distinguished  panelists  today 
as we work to build on this success. For our first panel I would like 
to welcome Dr. Thomas Kitsos, Associate Deputy Assistant Admin-
istrator  of  NOAA’s  National  Ocean  Service;  Dr.  Walter 
Cruickshank,  who  is  the  Deputy  Director  of  the  Interior  Minerals 
Management  Service;  and  Ms.  Sarah  Cooksey,  who  is  a  board 
member and former chair of the Coastal States Organization. 

On our second panel we will hear from Ms. Sarah Chasis, Direc-
tor  of  the  Natural  Resources  Defense  Council’s  Water  and  Coastal 
Program; Tom Fry, President of the National Ocean Industries As-
sociation;  and  from  Alaska  we  have  Mr.  Bill  Jeffress,  Director  of 
the  Office  of  Program  Management  and  Permitting  in  the  Alaska 
Department  of  Natural  Resources.  Finally,  from  my  home  State  of 
Maine,  I  extend  a  warm  welcome  to  Dr.  Don  Hudson,  Chair-elect 
of the Gulf of Maine Council on the Marine Environment. 

Chairman Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Snowe.  I  am  de-
lighted  you  introduced  this  bill  and  happy  to  work  with  you  on  it. 
I want to make a few points before we start. 

The  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  has  been  unauthorized  since 
1999.  Those  of  us  on  the  Appropriations  Committee  have  kept  it 
funded since that time. I had a conversation with a gentleman from 
the Department of Commerce who pointed out to me that this and 
other  programs  are  unfunded,  and  there  are  some  activities  in-
volved  in  the  programs  where  there  are  potential  penalties  that 
may  well  be  unenforceable  unless  we  have  reauthorization  of  this 
act and these other acts that have been held up. 

This  is  a  very  serious  thing  for  us.  The  four  bills  we  have  sent 
to  the  floor  so  far  have  all  been  held  up  because  of  increased  au-
thorizations  in  the  bills.  This  bill  that  you  have  proposed,  and  I 
think the proposal is reasonable, will probably face the same prob-
lem unless we can get an agreement on how far the authorized lev-
els should be increased by this bill. 

The  enacted  level  of  these  grants  has  actually  varied  in  the  last 
few  years,  but  they  have  hovered  right  around—it  started  off  $69 
million  in  2002  and  it  is  down  to  $63.9  million  in  the  request  for 
this year and $66 million was actually provided last year. It shows 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

that  without  an  authorized  level  the  amount  varies  from  year  to 
year. So I think we must get together on that point. 

Second,  I  note  that  there  is  a  provision,  a  sense  of  Congress,  to 
reevaluate  the  calculation  of  shoreline  mileage.  As  I  am  sure  that 
Mr.  Jeffress  will  point  out,  the  Alaska  Department  of  Natural  Re-
sources has recalculated the entire tidal shoreline as defined in this 
bill,  which  includes  the  outer  coast,  offshore  islands,  sounds,  bays, 
rivers, creeks to the head of tidewater or to where tidewater is nar-
rowed to the width of 100 feet. In doing so, the new calculation for 
Alaska’s tideline is 44,500 miles, greater than all of the entire con-
tinental United States. 

Of that amount, less than 1 percent is developed. That is the rea-
son we have asked Mr. Jeffress to come down and testify today con-
cerning what is done in Alaska. We have a unique coastal area and 
it  is  obvious  that  to  compare  this—to  put  the  same  provisions  ap-
plicable  to  our  coastline  of  44,500  miles  to  the  same  tests  that  are 
provided in the other states—for instance, we have a population of 
16  people  per  mile  along  the  coastline.  California’s  population  is 
442 times that. There is no question that the population along the 
coastline should be one of the criteria in considering the application 
of this act. So we will look forward to this hearing and to the com-
ments that are made by the witnesses. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  your 
comments  on  the  issue  of  increased  authorization  levels.  I  think 
that is a point well taken, because obviously our first and foremost 
goal  is  to  pass  a  reauthorization  since  that  expired  in  1999.  That 
is  a  primary  goal,  and  I  appreciate  your  thoughts  on  it.  We  will 
work together on some of these issues to help give impetus to pass-
ing this legislation. 
Senator Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Madam  Chairman,  thank  you  for  having  this 
hearing.  Each  of  us  Senators  comes  to  the  table  with  an  interest 
to protect regarding our own states. The esteemed Chairman of the 
Commerce Committee clearly has his interest in the State of Alas-
ka.  You  and  I  have  our  respective  interests  in  two  coastal  states, 
yours of Maine, mine of Florida. 

I  have  more  coastline  in  the  State  of  Florida,  by  the  way,  than 
California,  and  that  surprises  people—by  far.  California  has  some-
thing  like  800  miles.  I  have  something  like  1,500  miles,  only  ex-
ceeded  by  Senator  Stevens’  state,  which  exceeds  the  coastline  of 
Florida,  but  not  in  beaches.  In  the  actual  beaches,  the  State  of 
Florida has a lot more beaches than any other state. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Now,  be  careful,  because  the  entire  Arctic  coast 

is beach. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  I  am  talking  about  the  kind  of  beach  where 

people frolic in the surf. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  My  friend,  if  some  people  are  right  about  global 
climate  change  you  better  reserve  your  future,  a  piece  for  the  fu-
ture. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  A  place  like  Florida,  global  climate  change,  we 
will  not  have  a  state  of  Florida  left;  it  will  be  all  covered  with 
water. 

Well,  anyway,  the  point  of  all  this  is  that  this  act  has  worked 
well, but it is now under attack. It is not under attack by this com-
mittee;  it  is  under  attack  by  the  House  and  it  is  under  attack  to-
morrow  in  the  Senate  Energy  Committee.  What  we  have  is  an  at-
tempt  to  weaken  parts  of  this  act,  and  the  effect  is  to  weaken  a 
state’s  right  to  have  meaningful  input  into  what  happens  off  of  its 
shores. 

Even  the  National  Governors  Association  has  taken  a  strong 
stand on this. What you have is, Madam Chair, what you and I are 
going to face increasingly, are the attempts to drill for oil off of the 
coast. What the House bill has already done is it alters the appeal 
schedule for consistency appeals to the Secretary of Commerce and 
gives the Secretary of Interior new powers to grant easements and 
right of ways for oil and gas exploration outside of the Coastal Zone 
Management Act process. 

Now,  tomorrow  in  the  Senate  Energy  bill  that  is  going  to  be 
marked  up,  what  they  are  going  to  do  is  to  draw—they  are  going 
to have an amendment, and I will identify the Senator who is going 
to  offer  it.  It  is  Senator  Landrieu.  Senator  Landrieu  is  my  dear 
friend  and  I  love  her  and  the  feeling  is  mutual,  but  on  this  issue 
she  thinks  that  a  coast  is  not  a  coast  unless  it  has  oil  rigs  off  the 
coast. 

Of course, we not only have a $50 billion a year tourism industry 
that  clearly  depends  on  pristine  sugary  sand  beaches,  but  we  also 
have  a  fragile  environmental  situation  and,  interestingly  for  Sen-
ator  Stevens,  who  is  the  chairman  of  Defense  Appropriations,  we 
have  one  of  the  unique  assets  in  the  world  and  it  is  called  re-
stricted  air  space.  That  is  why  so  much  of  the  military  training  is 
being  done  off  of  Florida’s  coast.  I  maintain  that  you  cannot  be 
dropping bombs on simulated targets underneath the restricted air 
space if you are going to have oil rigs down there. 

But anyway, tomorrow the Senate Energy Committee is going to 
consider  an  amendment  that  would  allow  the  Department  of  Inte-
rior  to  draw  lines  delineating  each  state’s  waters  in  which  they 
could  very  possibly  start  to  delineate  the  waters  of  Louisiana  and 
Alabama  off  the  coast  of  Florida.  I  do  not  like  it  and  if  they  do— 
and  I  hope  we  can  defeat  it—they  will  severely  weaken  the  State 
of  Florida’s  ability  to  have  a  say  in  the  oil  and  gas  activities  off  of 
its coast. 

So  what  I  think  we  need  to  do  is  to  realize  that  our  coastal  re-
sources  must  be  protected  within  reason  and  not  exploited,  and  I 
thank you for the opportunity to share these thoughts. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much, Senator Nelson. I appre-
ciate  your  comments  in  that  regard.  Obviously,  we  have  a  lot  of 
challenges  with  the  energy  legislation  being  marked  up,  some  of 
which conflicts with the essence of what the Coastal Zone Manage-
ment Act is all about. 
Dr. Kitsos, welcome. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

STATEMENT  OF  THOMAS  KITSOS,  PH.D.,  ASSOCIATE  DEPUTY 
ASSISTANT  ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  OCEAN  SERVICE, 
NATIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION 
(NOAA) 
Dr.  KITSOS.  Good  morning,  Madam  Chairwoman.  My  name  is 
Tom Kitsos. I am with NOAA. I am here representing the position 
of  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  NOAA  on  your  legislation.  I 
would  like  to  note  that  last  week  I  had  the  pleasure  of  being  in 
your  state  in  Portland  for  a  meeting  of  the  Marine  Protected  Area 
Advisory Committee and I had a chance to go to the Portland Fish 
Auction, which is an experience I think everybody should have, and 
we certainly understand why coastal zone management (CZM) is so 
important to your home state. 

I would like to thank you for the opportunity to testify on Senate 
Bill 360 and we appreciate your efforts, Senator Snowe, and the ef-
forts  of  Senator  Stevens  and  Senator  Nelson  in  support  of  ocean 
policy generally and in support of this bill. The Coastal Zone Man-
agement Act (CZMA) recognizes and balances national objectives in 
development  and  conservation  of  coastal  ocean  areas  with  the  his-
torical interest and role of the states in governing near-shore devel-
opment and land use. 

In  response  to  the  report  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Pol-
icy,  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  supports  reauthoriza-
tion of the CZMA and outlines many other critical actions to be im-
plemented in cooperation with the coastal states. The national and 
state  coastal  management  programs  and  partnerships  established 
by  the  CZMA  provide  excellent  mechanisms  for  carrying  out  many 
of  the  commission’s  recommendations  and  the  President’s  Ocean 
Action  Plan.  State  participation  in  the  CZM  is  voluntary.  As  you 
noted, Senator Snowe, 34 of the 35 eligible coastal states are imple-
menting  approved  programs  and  the  35th,  the  State  of  Illinois,  is 
currently developing a program for approval. 

The  CZMA’s  Federal  consistency  provisions  provide  states  a 
unique tool to meet their coastal objectives while ensuring a coordi-
nated  national  approach  to  coastal  management.  States  have 
worked  closely  with  applicants  to  ensure  projects  are  consistent 
with their enforceable policies. States have concurred with about 95 
percent  of  the  projects  they  have  reviewed  under  these  provisions. 
NOAA recently completed a series of regional Federal consistency 
workshops  that  have  helped  State  and  Federal  agencies  to  better 
collaborate on CZM consistency requirements and improve the effi-
ciency of the process. 

The  CZMA’s  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  com-
plements  the  state  coastal  zone  management  programs.  The  26 
Federally designated National Estuarine Research Reserves protect 
more than one million acres of estuarine lands and waters. The re-
serves  support  important  research,  monitoring,  education,  and 
stewardship  activities  within  coastal  watersheds  in  support  of 
coastal  management.  The  reserve  systemwide  monitoring  program 
includes 104 water quality monitoring stations and 26 weather sta-
tions.  The  system  provides  important  environmental  data  in  sup-
port  of  the  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  called  for  in  the 
President’s U.S. Ocean Action Plan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

Senator Snowe, the CZMA benefits the Nation in many different 
ways.  The  reserves  provide  long-term  protection  and  advance  our 
understanding  of  sensitive  estuarine  habitats.  In  Fiscal  Year  2002 
and  2003  the  reserve  system,  working  through  state  partners,  ac-
quired  more  than  13,500  acres  of  valuable  habitat  for  research, 
education, and stewardship purposes. Coastal states and territories 
continue to protect and restore coastal waters from the harmful ef-
fects of polluted runoff. 

Section  306A  of  the  CZMA,  the  coastal  resources  improvement 
program, helps states to support local projects, including providing 
public access to beaches and waterfronts. In 2002 and 2003, states 
matched  about  $7.5  million  in  Federal  funds  to  develop  163  access 
projects in 17 states. The risk of dramatic loss of life and property 
from storms and other coastal hazards is increasing daily as coast-
al  development  and  population  continues  to  surge.  North  Carolina 
in cooperation with NOAA’s Coastal Services Center has developed 
a  geographic  information  system  to  help  visualize  the  impacts  of 
flood forecasts, helping citizens better understand the ramifications 
of impending storm events. 

State  coastal  zone  management  programs  promote  more  livable 
communities by providing technical and management assistance to 
local  governments  on  waterfront  revitalization,  coastal  brownfields 
cleanup, and restoration of degraded resources. 

The  Administration  supports  CZMA  reauthorization.  Senate  Bill 
360 proposes new methods for addressing the ever-increasing pres-
sures on the coastal zone. It would allow section 306 funding to be 
used for coastal non-point pollution control programs and state-spe-
cific  emerging  issues.  It  creates  a  new  coastal  community  grants 
program  to  help  assess  and  manage  growth,  public  infrastructure, 
and open space needs. These provisions could provide communities 
greater  flexibility  to  mitigate  population  growth,  revitalize  urban 
waterfronts  and  economies,  increase  public  access,  reduce  coastal 
hazard threats, and protect important habitats. 

In  closing,  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  offers  an  excellent 
opportunity to renew the Federal commitment to enhancing and re-
storing  America’s  coastal  resources.  I  look  forward,  NOAA  looks 
forward, to working with you, Senator Snowe, Senator Stevens, and 
Senator Nelson, on reauthorizing this important program and at an 
appropriate time I would be happy to answer any questions. 

And  I  ask  that  my  official  statement  be  included  in  the  record. 
Senator SNOWE. Without objection, so ordered; for all of the pan-

elists as well. 

Thank you, Dr. Kitsos. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Kitsos follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS KITSOS,  PH.D.,  ASSOCIATE DEPUTY ASSISTANT 
AND 

SERVICE,  NATIONAL OCEANIC

ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL OCEAN
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION (NOAA) 

Introduction 

Good afternoon, Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee. I am Tom Kitsos, 
Associate  Deputy  Assistant  Administrator  for  Ocean  Services  and  Coastal  Zone 
Management  for  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA). 
Thank you for this opportunity to testify on S. 360, a bill to reauthorize and amend 
the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). In general, the Administration supports 
CZMA  reauthorization  and  this  legislation.  We  appreciate  the  efforts  of  Senator 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Snowe in sponsoring this bill and for supporting this program, which has served as 
a cornerstone for national coastal policy for more than 30 years. 

The  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  of  1972  created  an  innovative  intergovern-
mental  program  that  has  been  of  great  benefit  to  the  Nation,  the  states,  and  the 
public.  The  CZMA  recognizes  and  balances  national  objectives  in  development  and 
conservation  of  coastal  and  ocean  areas  with  the  historical  interest  and  role  of  the 
states in governing near shore development and land use. Under Federally approved 
coastal  management  programs  states  are  provided  incentives  and  assistance  to  co-
ordinate their environmental, resource management and development programs and 
objectives  to  promote  sustainable  coastal  development  and  long-term  conservation. 
Under the CZMA’s estuarine research reserve program, states—often in partnership 
with  academia  and  Federal  agencies—implement  research  and  education  programs 
to better understand complex coastal processes. 

My testimony will focus on the success of the CZMA and the importance of reau-

thorization of CZMA through S. 360. 
The Success of the CZMA 

For  the  past  33  years,  the  Federal  Government,  states,  and  local  governments 
have  worked  under  the  unique  partnership  created  by  the  CZMA  to  ‘‘preserve,  pro-
tect, develop, and where possible, to restore or enhance the resources of the Nation’s 
coastal zone for the present and future generations.’’ 

In response to the report of the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy, the President’s 
U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  highlighted  the  importance  of  ongoing  and  renewed  efforts 
to  ‘‘assist  State,  Tribal,  and  local  stakeholders  to  develop  comprehensive  strategies 
to  protect  the  Nation’s  coastal  resources.’’  The  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  specifically 
supports  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and  outlines  many  other  critical  actions  to 
be  implemented  in  partnership  with  the  coastal  states,  some  in  conjunction  with 
state coastal management and estuarine reserve programs. To this end, we are cur-
rently working with EPA and the states to conduct a series of community workshops 
to  improve  coastal  watershed  protection,  as  well  as  working  with  the  State  of  Illi-
nois to complete the voluntary state participation in the CZM system. 

Coastal  estuaries  are  among  the  most  biologically  productive  regions  in  the  Na-
tion.  The  states’  Coastal  Management  Programs  and  National  Estuarine  Research 
Reserves  advance  research,  best  management  practices,  and  the  development  of  in-
frastructure  necessary  to  better  understand  and  address  the  complex  relationships 
between  people  and  the  coast.  This  understanding  comes  not  only  from  CZMA-sup-
ported  research  into  the  natural  functions  of  our  coastal  areas,  but  also  into  man’s 
impact upon them, all in an effort to sustain the long-term economic and ecological 
viability of irreplaceable coastal resources to support an ecosystem approach to man-
agement. State programs address a wide range of national objectives, including: 

from erosion and storms, 

• Maintaining  and  restoring  the  natural  beach  and  dune  systems  for  protection 
• Providing for appropriate coastal development, 
• Protecting and restoring ecologically important coastal habitats, 
• Controlling nonpoint source pollution, 
• Improving public access and recreational opportunities in coastal areas, 
• Enhancing public awareness through education and outreach, and 
• Revitalizing local waterfronts. 
Coastal Zone Management Program 

Thirty-four  of  the  thirty-five  eligible  coastal  states,  Commonwealths,  and  Terri-
tories  are  implementing  Federally  approved  coastal  management  plans.  As  rec-
ommended  in  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan,  NOAA  is  working  with  the  final  eligible 
coastal  state,  Illinois,  to  approve  its  coastal  management  program.  Through  the 
CZMA, NOAA provides funding for developing and implementing the plans, and pro-
vides  technical  assistance  on  best  practices  for  addressing  important  coastal  man-
agement issues. Funding for the CZM program is allocated to eligible coastal states 
based  on  shoreline  mileage  and  coastal  population.  We  appreciate  efforts  to  ensure 
funding increases can be distributed equitably among all state programs. This fund-
ing is required to be matched on a dollar for dollar basis, yet many states far exceed 
this  match  requirement  and  are  able  to  leverage  additional  state  resources  using 
CZMA  dollars.  For  example,  the  Maine  Coastal  Program  has  been  successful  in 
matching  state  dollars  to  Federal  dollars  at  a  ratio  of  more  than  5:1;  in  past  years 
this ratio has been as high as 11:1. 

The  CZMA’s  Federal  consistency  provisions  provide  a  unique  tool  to  meet  state 
coastal  objectives,  while  ensuring  a  coordinated  national  approach  to  coastal  man-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

agement.  The  consistency  provisions  apply  to  Federal  agencies,  as  well  as  individ-
uals  and  groups  applying  for  Federal  permits  and  funding.  The  consistency  provi-
sions require any proposed activities that have reasonably foreseeable effects on any 
land, water use or natural resource of the coastal zone to be consistent with the en-
forceable  components  of  Federally-approved  State  Coastal  Management  Programs. 
States  have  concurred  with  about  95  percent  of  the  projects  they  have  reviewed 
under  these  provisions.  NOAA  recently  completed  a  series  of  regional  Federal  con-
sistency workshops that have helped State and Federal agencies to better coordinate 
and collaborate on CZMA consistency requirements and improve the efficiency of the 
process. 
National Estuary Research Reserve Program 

Critical,  long-term  research  takes  place  at  the  twenty-six  Federally  designated 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  (Reserves)  in  twenty-one  coastal  states  and 
Commonwealths. Texas currently is pursuing designation of an additional site. Con-
necticut and Wisconsin have expressed interest in designation of new Reserves. The 
Reserves  play  an  important  role  in  meeting  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan’s  goal  to 
‘‘expand our scientific knowledge of oceans, coasts and Great Lakes.’’ 

Reserves  currently  protect  over  one  million  acres  of  estuarine  lands  and  waters, 
and Reserve programs conduct important research, monitoring, education and stew-
ardship activities within coastal watersheds. The Reserve system has developed sys-
tem-wide  efforts  and  standards  to  ensure  data  compatibility  and  consistent  meth-
odologies  are  used  at  all  sites.  The  Reserve’s  System-Wide  Monitoring  Program  in-
cludes  104  water-quality  monitoring  stations  and  26  weather  stations.  The  system 
provides  important  environmental  data  in  support  of  the  national  backbone  of  the 
Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  supported  in  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan.  The 
Reserve system also supports a fellowship program, training up to 52 graduate stu-
dents  each  year  in  estuarine  science.  This  fellowship  program  not  only  facilitates 
important research, but also encourages the development of young scientists to sus-
tain the science workforce to meet the Nation’s needs. 

Coastal  Management  and  Reserve  outreach  programs  educate  thousands  of  local 
citizens,  teachers,  students,  and  policy-makers  on  the  important  connections  be-
tween people, the land, and the sea, supporting sustainable and ecosystem-based ap-
proaches  to  coastal  resource  management.  The  Reserve  coastal  training  program 
reaches  hundreds  of  coastal  decision  makers  each  year,  providing  them  with  infor-
mation to improve management of our fragile coastal resources. 
The CZMA Benefits the Nation 

State coastal management programs and the network of Reserves enhance the vi-
tality  of  our  coastal  economies  and  the  protection  and  sustainability  of  important 
coastal resources and habitats. 

Habitat  Conservation—The  Reserves  provide  long-term  protection  and  advance 
our  understanding  of  sensitive  estuarine  habitats.  In  FY  2002–2003,  the  Reserve 
system,  working  through  state  partners,  acquired  more  than  13,500  acres  of  valu-
able habitat for research, education and stewardship purposes. 

Coastal  Nonpoint  Source  Pollution  Control—Coastal  states  and  Territories  con-
tinue to protect and restore coastal waters from the harmful effects of polluted run-
off.  Recently,  Wisconsin  passed  the  nation’s  most  comprehensive  nonpoint  source 
regulations.  These  rules  outline  performance  standards  for  various  sources  of  pol-
luted runoff ranging from agriculture to urban stormwater; identify appropriate best 
management  practices  for  runoff  control;  and  enhance  existing  cost-sharing  pro-
grams. 

Public  Access—Section  306A  of  the  CZMA,  the  Coastal  Resource  Improvement 
Program,  is  an  important  mechanism  for  many  states  to  support  local  projects,  in-
cluding  providing  access  to  beaches  and  waterfronts.  In  2002–2003,  states  matched 
about  $7.5  million  in  Federal  funds  to  develop  163  access  projects  in  17  states.  For 
example,  the  Port  of  Houston  Authority,  working  with  the  Texas  coastal  manage-
ment  program,  developed  the  Atkinson  Island  Interpretive  Canoe  Trail.  The  Re-
serves  are  also  involved  in  projects  to  enhance  public  access.  The  Grand  Bay  Re-
serve  in  Mississippi  is  improving  and  expanding  facilities  at  its  two  public  boat 
ramps.  The  Rookery  Bay  Reserve  in  Florida  has  developed  public  parking,  a  boat 
launch and a 2.5-mile boardwalk at Tarpon Bay. 

Coastal  Hazards—The  risk  of  dramatic  loss  of  life  and  property  from  storms  and 
other coastal hazards is increasing daily as coastal development and population con-
tinues to surge. Oregon coastal managers developed the Oregon Coastal Atlas to im-
prove and streamline hazard-related decision making related to tsunami inundation 
and landslides. The Oregon Coastal Management Program is also working with the 
NOAA  Coastal  Services  Center  to  develop  a  coastal  erosion  forecast  tool  for  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Atlas.  North  Carolina,  also  in  cooperation  with  the  NOAA  Coastal  Services  Center, 
has developed a tool to help visualize flood forecasts. Implemented during Hurricane 
Isabel,  this  geographic  information  system  (GIS)  helps  citizens  better  understand 
the likely impacts of impending storm events. 

Coastal  Community  Development—State  coastal  management  programs  promote 
more  livable  communities  by  providing  technical  and  management  assistance  to 
local governments. The Washington Coastal Management Program and Padilla Bay 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  utilized  the  Reserve’s  Coastal  Training  Pro-
gram to educate local planners on how development impacts natural shoreline proc-
esses. The CZMA also serves as a conduit for delivery of many NOAA products and 
services that help state and local governments as they prepare and implement plans 
to  revitalize  waterfronts,  cleanup  coastal  brownfields,  and  restore  degraded  coastal 
resources. 

CZM  Performance  Measures—NOAA  is  conducting  an  on-going  effort  to  develop 
and  evaluate  performance  measures  to  better  gauge  the  successes  of  state  coastal 
management  programs  and  the  Reserves.  NOAA  has  developed  this  performance 
measurement  system  over  the  past  four  years,  in  partnership  with  the  states.  This 
information,  in  combination  with  the  results  of  periodic  programmatic  evaluations 
required  by  the  CZMA,  can  be  used  to  determine  the  true  state  of  our  coasts  and 
the programs that manage them. 
Importance of S. 360 

The  CZMA  has  provided  numerous  benefits  to  states  and  to  the  citizens  living, 
working, and recreating in our coastal communities. Because of its emphasis on co-
operation  and  coordination,  the  CZMA  has  enjoyed  widespread  support  from  Con-
gress, states, local governments, interest groups, and the public. The Administration 
supports  CZMA  reauthorization  and  appreciates  the  efforts  of  Senator  Snowe  and 
Senator Kerry, in introducing S. 360. 

S. 360 proposes new methods for addressing the ever-increasing pressures on the 
coastal  zone.  This  legislation  would  add  two  new  categories  to  Section  309,  Coastal 
Zone  Enhancement  Grants.  These  new  categories  would  allow  funding  to  be  used 
for  coastal  nonpoint  pollution  control  programs  and  state-specific  emerging  issues. 
Secondly, it proposes a new Coastal Community Grants program to help assess and 
manage  growth,  public  infrastructure,  and  open  space  needs.  This  program  would 
provide  for  management-oriented  research  and  technical  assistance  through  the  ex-
isting state coastal management programs and estuarine reserves. Through amend-
ments  such  as  these,  the  CZMA  could  provide  communities  with  greater  flexibility 
to  mitigate  population  growth,  revitalize  urban  waterfronts  and  water-dependent 
economies, provide for increased public access, conserve and restore important coast-
al  habitats,  and  further  reduce  the  threat  to  lives  and  property  associated  with 
coastal storms. 

S. 360 could be strengthened by ensuring Section 17, Authorization for Appropria-

tions, is consistent with the President’s Budget Request. 
Conclusion 

In  closing,  the  CZMA  is  a  vital  tool  for  coordinating  and  integrating  local,  state 
and  Federal  policies  and  programs  affecting  the  coast  and  for  building  a  national 
cooperative  effort  to  protect  resources,  provide  access  and  mitigate  risk,  while  sup-
porting  coastal-dependent  development.  The  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  offers  an 
excellent opportunity to renew the Federal commitment to enhancing and restoring 
America’s  coastal  resources.  The  amendments  offered  in  S.  360  would  improve  an 
already  effective  partnership  between  the  Federal  Government,  the  state  coastal 
management  programs,  and  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves.  The  proposed 
Coastal  Communities  Program  would  help  encourage  new  and  innovative  methods 
for  addressing  many  of  the  problems  faced  by  the  coastal  states  and  communities. 
Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. I look forward to working 
with you on reauthorizing this important program. 

I will be glad to answer any questions. 

Senator SNOWE. Dr. Cruickshank. 

STATEMENT OF DR. WALTER D. CRUICKSHANK, 

DEPUTY DIRECTOR, MINERALS MANAGEMENT SERVICE, 

DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  Good  morning,  Madam  Chairwoman  and 
Members  of  the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  tes-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

tify on the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA) and its relation-
ship to the Department of the Interior’s outer continental shelf pro-
gram. The Department of the Interior and the Department of Com-
merce  have  worked  diligently  to  communicate  and  comprehend 
each  other’s  concerns  over  the  Federal  consistency  program  and 
how  the  existing  Federal  regulatory  regime  manages  offshore  and 
coastal  activities.  Secretary  Norton  places  special  significance  on 
the requirement that all OCS program decisions carefully evaluate 
and be responsive to the laws, goals, and policies of affected states. 
As  my  colleague  from  NOAA  has  indicated,  the  Administration 
supports reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Management Act, and 
I defer to his testimony for specific comments on S. 360. 

I  will  discuss  the  Minerals  Management  Service’s  role  in  the 
management and stewardship of Federal offshore lands and the im-
portance  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  and  the  continued 
success  of  the  Nation’s  energy  and  mineral  development  program 
on the OCS. The Federal offshore plays a vital role in our Nation’s 
energy future. Energy use sustains our economy and our quality of 
life.  But  high  prices  and  increasing  dependence  on  foreign  sources 
raise important national policy issues. 

The OCS is a major supplier of oil and natural gas for the domes-
tic market, contributing more oil and natural gas to the U.S. econ-
omy  than  any  single  state  or  country  in  the  world.  Currently  the 
OCS  accounts  for  over  30  percent  of  the  oil  produced  in  this  coun-
try and 23 percent of our natural gas. Within the next 5 years, off-
shore  production  will  likely  account  for  more  than  40  percent  and 
26  percent  respectively  of  those  two  commodities,  primarily  owing 
to deep water discoveries in the Gulf of Mexico. 

As  the  Department  of  Interior’s  offshore  resource  management 
agency,  the  MMS  has  a  focused  and  well  established  mandate,  to 
balance  the  exploration  and  development  of  oil,  gas,  and  mineral 
resources  of  the  OCS  with  environmental  protection  and  safety. 
MMS  has  worked  diligently  to  create  a  framework  for  overseeing 
OCS activities. Our management principles include conservation of 
resources  by  providing  for  their  most  efficient  use,  assurance  of  a 
fair  and  equitable  return  to  the  public,  protection  of  the  human, 
marine,  and  coastal  environments,  involvement  of  interested  and 
affected  parties  in  planning  and  decisionmaking,  and  minimizing 
conflicts between mineral activities and other uses of the OCS. 

The U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy in its report said that ‘‘the 
scope  and  comprehensiveness  of  the  OCS  oil  and  gas  program  can 
be a model for the management of a wide variety of offshore activi-
ties.’’ 

In  his  national  energy  policy,  the  President  directed  the  Secre-
taries of Interior and Commerce to determine if changes to the reg-
ulatory  regime  were  needed  to  promote  energy-related  projects  in 
the coastal zone and on the OCS. As a result of our joint effort, in 
June  2003  NOAA  published  a  proposed  rule  to  address  energy-re-
lated  consistency  issues.  The  proposed  rule  would  establish  a 
straightforward  consistency  review  process  with  clear  information 
requirements  and  predictable  review  and  decision  time  frames, 
eliminate  conflicts  between  the  existing  CZMA  rules  and  the  re-
quirements of the OCS Lands Act, and maintain the states’ ability 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

to review Federal actions which have reasonably foreseeable effects 
on land, water, and natural resources of the coastal zone. 

In addition, MMS has taken proactive steps to enhance the inte-
gration  of  CZMA  with  our  offshore  program.  A  particular  example 
is in our Gulf of Mexico region, where we have been working to im-
prove our coordination with all of the Gulf States. We have stream-
lined  the  lease  sale  consistency  review  process  through  an  ap-
proach  agreed  to  by  all  of  the  states.  We  have  entered  agreements 
with each of the Gulf States on specific information that would sat-
isfy state consistency requirements. And we have an expedited con-
sistency  review  process  for  about  three-quarters  of  all  Gulf  plans 
through the use of concurrence agreements, again with each of the 
Gulf States. 

In addition, we have a very good working relationship with Alas-
ka’s  Office  of  Program  Management  and  Permitting  and  we  look 
forward  to  contributing  to  their  efforts  as  they  proceed  with  their 
coastal zone management program. 

In  conclusion,  I  would  like  to  note  that  both  OCSLA  and  the 
Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  explicitly  provide  states  a  critical 
role  in  shaping  national  policy  regarding  the  development  of  OCS 
resources for the Nation’s benefit. In its declaration of policy for the 
OCS, Congress said that states and affected local governments are 
entitled to an opportunity to participate in the policy and planning 
decisions  made  by  the  Federal  Government  related  to  the  explo-
ration  for  and  development  of  minerals  on  the  OCS.  The  Depart-
ment  of  Interior  and  the  Minerals  Management  Service  are  firmly 
committed to the consultative responsibility that this entails. 

This  concludes  my  remarks  and  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer 

any questions from members of the Committee. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Cruickshank follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. WALTER D. CRUICKSHANK, DEPUTY DIRECTOR, 

MINERALS MANAGEMENT SERVICE, DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  it  is  a  great  pleasure  for  me  to 
be here to discuss the reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA) 
in  the  context  of  the  Department  of  the  Interior’s  Outer  Continental  Shelf  (OCS) 
Program.  The  partnership  forged  between  the  Department  of  the  Interior  and  the 
Department  of  Commerce  on  coastal  zone  management  is  consistent  with  the  Sec-
retary’s  Four  C’s—‘‘communication,  consultation,  and  cooperation,  all  in  the  service 
of  conservation.’’  Over  the  past  several  years,  the  Department  of  the  Interior  and 
the  Department  of  Commerce  have  worked  diligently  on  communicating  and  com-
prehending  each  others’  concerns  over  Federal  consistency  and  how  the  existing 
Federal  regulatory  regime  manages  offshore  and  coastal  activities.  We  have  con-
sulted cooperatively and produced a mutually-agreeable proposal that addresses our 
Nation’s  needs  for  siting  energy  facilities  that  affect  the  coastal  zone  while  bal-
ancing  conservation,  protection,  and  beneficial  use  of  our  invaluable  coastal  re-
sources. In addition, Secretary Norton has placed special significance on the require-
ment  that  all  OCS  program  decisions  must  carefully  evaluate  and  be  responsive  to 
the laws, goals, and policies of the affected states. 

The Administration supports the reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Management 
Act. This hearing is looking at S. 360, the Coastal Zone Enhancement Reauthoriza-
tion Act of 2005, which I defer to my esteemed colleague from NOAA to present the 
Administration’s comments on the bill. 

Today I am here to discuss the Minerals Management Service’s (MMS) role in the 
management  and  stewardship  of  Federal  offshore  lands  and  the  importance  of  the 
CZMA in the continued success of the Nation’s energy and mineral development pro-
gram in the Federal OCS. We recognize that other agencies issue authorizations for 
the construction and operation of energy-related facilities (such as natural gas pipe-
lines and liquefied natural gas terminals) which are subject to CZMA; my testimony 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

will  not  address  the  roles  of  those  agencies.  The  Federal  offshore  plays  a  vital  role 
with respect to our Nation’s energy future. 

America  faces  an  energy  challenge.  Energy  use  sustains  our  economy  and  our 
quality of life, but high prices and increasing dependence on foreign energy supplies 
raise important national policy issues. There is no one single or short term solution. 
Achieving  the  goal  of  secure,  affordable  and  environmentally  sound  energy  will  re-
quire  diligent,  concerted  efforts  on  many  fronts  on  both  the  supply  and  demand 
sides of the energy equation. 

President  Bush’s  National  Energy  Policy  (NEP)  report  laid  out  a  comprehensive, 
long-term energy strategy for securing America’s energy future. That strategy recog-
nizes  that  to  reduce  our  rising  dependence  on  foreign  energy  supplies,  we  must  in-
crease domestic production, while pursuing energy conservation and the use of alter-
native and renewable energy sources. 

The OCS Lands Act directs the Secretary of the Interior to make resources avail-
able  to  meet  the  nation’s  energy  needs.  The  accompanying  Congressional  Declara-
tion  of  Policy  states,  ‘‘The  OCS  is  a  vital  national  resource  reserve  held  by  the  Fed-
eral Government for the public, which should be made available for expeditious and 
orderly development.’’ As the Department of the Interior’s offshore resource manage-
ment  agency,  the  MMS  has  a  focused  and  well  established  ocean  mandate—to  bal-
ance the exploration and development of oil, gas, and mineral resources of the OCS 
with safety and protection of the marine and coastal environment. 

The Federal OCS is a major supplier of oil and natural gas for the domestic mar-
ket,  contributing  more  oil  and  natural  gas  for  U.S.  consumption  than  any  single 
state or country in the world. As steward of the mineral resources on the 1.76 billion 
acres  of  the  Nation’s  OCS,  MMS  has,  since  1982,  managed  OCS  production  of  9.6 
trillion  barrels  of  oil  and  more  than  109  trillion  cubic  feet  of  natural  gas  for  U.S. 
consumption. 

Today,  MMS  administers  approximately  8,200  leases  and  oversees  approximately 
4,000 facilities on the OCS. OCS production accounts for over 30 percent of the Na-
tion’s domestic oil production and approximately 23 percent of our domestic natural 
gas  production.  Within  the  next  5  years,  offshore  production  will  likely  account  for 
more  than  40  percent  of  oil  and  26  percent  of  U.S.  natural  gas  production,  owing 
primarily to deep water discoveries. 

As  the  OCS  resource  management  agency,  MMS  has  worked  diligently  for  over 
20  years  to  create  a  framework  for  OCS  mineral  resource  development.  Principles 
guiding  our  management  of  the  resources  of  the  OCS  include:  conservation  of  re-
sources  by  providing  for  their  most  efficient  use;  assurance  of  a  fair  and  equitable 
return to the public for rights conveyed; protection of the human, marine, and coast-
al environments; involvement of interested and affected parties in planning and de-
cision-making;  and  minimization  of  conflicts  between  mineral  activities  and  other 
uses of the OCS. MMS also has over two decades of experience working with coastal 
states  regarding  coastal  zone  issues  related  to  development  on  the  OCS.  The  U.S. 
Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  in  its  report,  ‘‘An  Ocean  Blueprint  for  the  21st  Cen-
tury,’’ stated, ‘‘the scope and comprehensiveness of the OCS oil and gas program can 
be a model for the management of a wide variety of offshore activities.’’ 

In the NEP, the President directed the Secretaries of the Interior and Commerce 
to  determine  if  changes  to  the  Federal  regulatory  regime  were  needed  to  facilitate 
energy-related  projects  in  the  coastal  zone  and  on  the  OCS.  Secretary  Norton  and 
then-Secretary Evans convened a ‘‘Coastal Zone Management Act Team’’ to develop 
a  proposed  rule  addressing  questions  raised  in  NOAA’s  July  2002  Advanced  Notice 
of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (ANPR),  and  to  establish  an  effective  partnership  for  con-
sistency  issues.  I  am  pleased  to  report  that  this  effort  has  led  to  a  much  improved 
proposed rule. 

Using  the  July  2002  ANPR  as  the  starting  point,  the  team  engaged  in  an  inten-
sive  effort  to  fulfill  the  Secretaries’  goals  in  a  manner  that  reflected  the  interests 
and  concerns  of  our  various  stakeholders.  As  a  result  of  our  joint  effort,  in  June 
2003, NOAA published a proposed rule that better addressed energy-related consist-
ency issues while ensuring protection of the Nation’s coastal resources. The proposal 
would: 

requirements. 

• Establish  a  straightforward  consistency  review  process  with  clear  information 
• Provide  a  predictable  consistency  review  process  so  that  states,  Federal  agen-
cies,  and  applicants  know  which  activities  are  covered,  when  consistency  re-
views will begin, and when decisions will be made. 

• Clarify what information is required for consistency review purposes. 
• Eliminate  conflict  and  confusion  between  the  statutory  requirements  of  the 

CZMA and OCS Lands Act, and most importantly, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

• Maintain the states’ ability to review those Federal actions which have reason-
ably  foreseeable  effects  on  any  land,  water  use  or  natural  resources  of  their 
coastal zone as provided for in the CZMA. 

When  promulgated  as  a  final  rule,  the  changes  will  improve  the  effectiveness  of 
the  Federal  consistency  process  while  preserving  the  proper  balance  between  state 
and Federal management of coastal resources. 

We have also been working with NOAA to achieve prompt and efficient consulta-
tions  under  the  Endangered  Species  Act  and  rulemakings  under  the  Marine  Mam-
mal Protection Act. 

Now I’d like to talk about other proactive steps MMS is taking to ensure integra-

tion of CZMA into our offshore management program. 

The  MMS  has  developed  a  CZM  strategy  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  with  the  primary 

goals of: 

mittals. 

CZMA requirements. 

lease sale and permitted activities. 

ency Determination document approach agreed to by all Gulf States. 

• Providing  a  more  efficient  process  for  state  consistency  review  of  MMS  OCS 
• Standardizing  information  required  of  industry  based  on  actual  authorized 
• Managing the CZM Federal consistency review timeframes more effectively. 
• Improving MMS/Gulf State relationships. 
I am happy to say this initiative has been extremely successful. We have: 
• Streamlined the lease sale consistency review process through a tiered Consist-
• Written agreements with all Gulf States on specific information that would sat-
isfy  state  consistency  requirements,  thereby  eliminating  the  need  for  an  addi-
tional  30-day  time  frame  allowed  under  the  January  2001  regulations  for  the 
states’ decision on adequate information to begin consistency review. 
• Eliminated  broad  descriptive  information  previously  required  in  industry  sub-
• Standardized and updated information required by industry via several Notices 
• Expedited  consistency  review  of  75  to  80  percent  of  all  Gulf  plans  submitted 
• Significantly improved MMS/Gulf State Coordination. 
Alaska  is  in  the  process  of  revising  its  CZM  plan.  In  Alaska,  there  is  an  interest 
in  subsistence  fishing  and  hunting,  which  is  the  cultural  heart  and  soul  of  rural 
Alaska.  The  need  to  protect  fish  and  wildlife  and  their  use  for  future  generations 
is important in Alaska, as is the desire to encourage wise, sustainable development. 
Alaska  has  an  outstanding  record  of  balancing  these  competing  interests.  For 
MMS, the issue here will be OCS leasing off the northern coast of Alaska and ensur-
ing that subsistence resources remain at levels adequate to meet community needs. 
The  MMS  and  Alaska’s  coordinating  agency,  the  Office  of  Permitting  and  Project 
Management  (OPMP),  enjoy  an  excellent  working  relationship.  Alaska  is  presently 
reworking  its  CZM  program  and  MMS  is  ready  to  contribute  as  they  progress  in 
their efforts. 
Conclusion 

through the use of concurrence agreements with the Gulf States. 

to Lessees and Operators. 

OCSLA and CZMA explicitly provide states a critical role in shaping national pol-
icy  regarding  the  development  of  OCS  resources  for  the  Nation’s  benefit.  The  Con-
gressional  Declaration  of  Policy  for  OCSLA  prescribes,  ‘‘States,  and  through  such 
States,  affected  local  governments,  are  entitled  to  an  opportunity  to  participate,  to 
the extent consistent with the national interest, in the policy and planning decisions 
made  by  the  Federal  Government  relating  to  the  exploration  for,  and  development 
and  production  of,  minerals  of  the  OCS.’’  The  Department  is  firmly  committed  to 
the consultative responsibility this entails. 

Building  on  our  successful  partnership,  the  Department  of  the  Interior  and  the 
Department  of  Commerce  will  continue  to  work  together  to  identify  and  resolve 
issues that could arise in the administration of both the CZMA and OCSLA to pro-
mote  Congress’  objectives  in  both  statutes  and  the  objectives  of  the  President’s  Na-
tional Energy Policy. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  remarks  however  I  would  be  pleased 

to answer questions from you or the Members of the Committee. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Dr. Cruickshank. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Ms. Cooksey. 

15 

STATEMENT  OF  SARAH  W.  COOKSEY,  ADMINISTRATOR, 
DELAWARE  COASTAL  PROGRAMS;  BOARD  MEMBER  AND 
FORMER CHAIR, COASTAL STATES ORGANIZATION 
Ms. COOKSEY. Good morning. Thank you, Chairman Stevens and 
Subcommittee Chairman Snowe and other Subcommittee Members, 
for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  For  the  record,  I  have  also  attached 
a copy of the National Governors Association policy which calls for 
the reauthorization of CZMA. 

The  benefits  and  challenges  of  coastal  and  ocean  management 
are  well  documented  in  the  Ocean  Commission  and  other  reports. 
So  rather  than  reiterating  them,  I  will  focus  specifically  on  Senate 
Bill 360, which recommends reauthorization. Additional details are 
included in my written remarks. 

As previous witnesses have described, CZMA is unique in linking 
Federal,  state,  and  community-based  coastal  management  efforts. 
It  furthers  national  goals  by  supporting  and  identifying  economic 
and  environmental  priorities  and  implementing  local  strategies. 
The  testimony  of  Don  Hudson  from  the  Gulf  of  Maine  is  just  one 
of  the  34  state  and  territory  coastal  management  success  stories 
that could be told today if time allowed. 

Both  the  final  report  of  the  U.S.  Ocean  Commission  and  the 
President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  identified  reauthorization  of 
CZMA  as  a  priority.  The  Ocean  Commission  specifically  rec-
ommends  the  following  to  be  included.  Senate  Bill  360  addresses 
most of these: 

Strengthening the planning and coordination capability of coastal 

states to address coastal, watershed, and ocean planning; 

Increased  Federal  financial,  technical,  and  institutional  support 

for sustainable coastal and community development; 

Expand investment in the conservation and restoration of coastal 
habitats  and  support  regional  ecosystem  management  and  im-
proved  science,  resource  assessment,  and  information  to  support 
decisionmaking  based  on  science  from  coastal  watersheds  and 
oceans. 

Governor  Ruth  Ann  Minner  from  Delaware,  as  well  as  many 
other  Governors,  specifically  included  a  request  for  CZMA  reau-
thorization  in  their  recommendations  to  the  Ocean  Commission.  I 
have and I would like to submit into the record Governor and State 
letters  from  the  States  of  Texas,  South  Carolina,  Alabama,  Vir-
ginia, and California that also recommend reauthorization. 

Senator SNOWE. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The information referred to follows:] 

STATE OF TEXAS GENERAL LAND OFFICE, 

Austin, TX, May 18, 2005 

Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Snowe: 

On behalf of the State of Texas, I urge the Senate to reauthorize the Coastal Zone 
Management  Act  (CZMA).  I  support  the  recommendations  of  the  President’s  U.S. 
Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  Final  Report  that 
call for the reauthorization of the CZMA and highlighted its importance in ensuring 
economically vibrant and ecologically sustainable coastal and ocean resources. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

of the CZMA: 

Texas  has  the  third  longest  coastline  in  the  Nation,  covering  18  coastal  counties 
and including 400 miles of Gulf beaches and 3,300 miles of bay shoreline. With this 
coastline,  as  well  as  millions  of  acres  of  submerged  land  in  our  coastal  bays,  the 
management  of  our  waterways  and  coastal  resources  is  critical.  We  face  significant 
challenges  along  our  coast  that  can  have  a  negative  impact  on  both  the  health  and 
economic well being of this state and its citizens. 

Texas  CZMA  funds  are  crucial  in  addressing  shoreline  access,  economic  develop-
ment  of  coastal  areas,  protection  of  wetlands,  and  reduction  of  pollutants  carried 
into coastal waters from our rapidly expanding coastal urban areas. 

I  understand  that  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee 
will begin consideration of CZMA reauthorization during a hearing on S. 360 (spon-
sored  by  Senators  Olympia  Snowe  and  John  Kerry)  that  is  scheduled  for  Wednes-
day, May 25. 

The  following  issues  are  of  primary  importance  when  considering  reauthorization 

1.  Increase  support  for  state  and  territorial  coastal  zone  management  programs 
through  administration  and  implementation  of  grant  programs  and  tools.  These 
grant  programs  are  critical  to  meeting  the  increased  challenges  along  the  Texas 
coast. The authorization of the Coastal Resource Improvement Program, under Sec-
tion  306A,  and  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Grants,  under  Section  309,  are  impor-
tant to providing much needed assistance to local communities. 

2.  Authorize  a  Coastal  Community  Restoration  Program.  By  providing  incentives 
to  local  government  for  actions  that  resolve  important  habitat  protection  conflicts, 
revitalize  previously  developed  areas  and  coordinate  conservation  efforts  Congress 
will  enable  state  and  local  governments  to  better  manage  our  nationally  important 
coastal zones. 

3. Maintain existing Federal consistency provisions. The Federal-state partnership 
established  under  the  CZMA  enables  state  review  of  Federal  activities  to  ensure 
compliance  with  state  plans.  In  Texas,  Federal  consistency  has  not  limited  reason-
able activities and development of resources in the coastal zone. I would oppose any 
actions  to  weaken  the  CZMA  requirements  for  coordination  and  consistency  with 
state plans. 

I  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  necessary  changes 
to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  this  109th  Session  of  Congress.  Thank 
you for taking up this important matter at this time. 

Sincerely, 

JERRY PATTERSON, 
Commissioner. 

STATE OF SOUTH CAROLINA OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 

Columbia, SC, May 18, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

I would like to express my support for S. 360, the Coastal Zone Enhancement Re-
authorization  Act  of  2005.  We  face  significant  challenges  along  our  coast  in  terms 
of  encouraging  economic  development  while  reconciling  growth  pressures  with  the 
unique natural value of our coast. Improved coastal management, as is proposed in 
S.  360,  would  greatly  increase  our  capacity  to  address  these  critical  coastal  issues. 
In  my  June  4,  2004  letter  to  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  commenting 
on their Preliminary Report, one of the key recommendations I supported was reau-
thorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act.  With  the  release  of  the  final  re-
port last fall, Congress now has the opportunity to act on priority recommendations 
of  the  Commission,  and  I  believe  passage  of  S.  360  would  be  a  significant  step  to-
ward realizing these priorities. 

The  following  two  issues  are  of  primary  importance  to  South  Carolina  when  con-

sidering reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA): 

1. Maintenance of state’s rights: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

The  existing  Federal  consistency  provisions  should  be  retained  in  their  current 
form. The Federal-state partnership established under the CZMA enables state 
review of Federal activities to ensure compliance with state plans. In our state, 
Federal consistency has not limited reasonable activities and development of re-
sources  in  the  coastal  zone.  Provisions  in  previous  energy  legislation  have  had 
the potential to erode this important mechanism for considering state concerns. 
I  would  urge  you  to  oppose  any  effort  to  weaken  the  CZMA  requirements  for 
coordination and consistency with state plans. 

2. Assistance for Coastal Communities: 

One  of  the  most  critical  sections  of  S.  360  from  South  Carolina’s  perspective  is 
Section 11, Coastal Community Program. We have several initiatives underway 
that this legislation will complement, resulting in improved conservation, infra-
structure  planning,  growth  and  development  along  our  coast.  By  providing  in-
centives  to  local  government  for  actions  that  resolve  important  habitat  protec-
tion conflicts, revitalize previously developed areas and coordinate conservation 
efforts,  Congress  will  enable  state  and  local  governments  to  better  manage  our 
nationally important coastal zones. 

Thank you for your consideration. 

Sincerely, 

cc: Hon. Lindsey Graham and Hon. Jim DeMint 

MARK SANFORD, 

Governor. 

STATE OF ALABAMA OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 

Montgomery, AL, May 20, 2005 

Hon. RICHARD SHELBY, 
110 Hart Senate Building, 
Hon. JEFF SESSIONS, 
335 Russell Senate Building, 
Washington, DC. 

RE: REAUTHORIZATION OF THE COASTAL ZONE MANAGEMENT ACT 

Dear Senators: 

On  behalf  of  the  State  of  Alabama  this  year,  I  am  writing  to  urge  the  Senate  to 
reauthorize  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA).  Both  the  President’s  U.S. 
Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  Final  Report  rec-
ommended  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and  highlighted  its  importance  in  in-
suring  economically  vibrant  and  ecologically  sustainable  coastal  and  ocean  re-
sources. We encourage Congress to reauthorize and amend CZMA as a critical, high 
priority action for improved coastal and ocean management. We support full funding 
and  strengthening  of  elements  of  the  CZMA,  including  habitat  restoration,  commu-
nity planning and programs, watershed management and special area management 
planning.  The  CZMA  is  an  important  vehicle  for  implementation  of  a  wide  range 
of  Ocean  Commission  and  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  recommendations,  because  it 
takes  an  integrated  approach  and  is  a  true  cooperative  program  between  the  Fed-
eral, state and local governments. This partnership is vital to addressing ecosystem 
management,  and  we  believe  that  the  state  and  local  governments  should  have  an 
important  role  in  this  process.  A  reauthorized  CZMA  needs  to  retain  its  focus  on 
partnerships—the  state’s  working  hand-in-hand  with  local  governments.  CZMA 
needs to maintain the state’s ability to implement programs that meet Federal goals 
that best fit each state’s ecological, geographical and political sceneries. A reauthor-
ized  CZMA  needs  to  allow  for  flexible  state  programs  and  provide  for  a  program  to 
encourage  strong  planning  at  the  local  government  level.  We  support  an  incentive- 
based approach to expanding partnerships under the CZMA and increasing focus on 
watershed issues and local planning. 

We  face  significant  challenges  along  our  coast  that  can  have  a  negative  impact 
on  both  the  health  and  economic  well  being  of  this  state  and  our  citizens.  In  Ala-
bama,  CZMA  funds,  which  are  matched  by  the  state  agencies,  local  governments 
and academic institutions, are used to address the following priority issues: Coastal 
non-point  source  pollution,  beach  monitoring  and  restoration,  research  and  edu-
cation,  public  access,  habitat  restoration  and  land  acquisition  programs,  I  under-
stand that the Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee will begin 
consideration  of  CZMA  reauthorization  during  a  hearing  on  S.  360  (sponsored  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Senators  Olympia  Snowe  and  John  Kerry)  that  is  scheduled  for  Wednesday,  May 
25, 2005. 

The  following  issues  are  of  primary  importance  when  considering  reauthorization 

of the CZMA: 

1. Increase support for state and territorial coastal zone management programs 
through  administration  and  implementation  grant  programs  and  tools.  These 
grant programs are critical to meeting the increased challenges along Alabama’s 
coast.  The  authorization  of  the  Coastal  Resource  Improvement  Program,  under 
Section 306A, and Coastal Zone enhancement Grants, under Section 309, is im-
portant  to  providing  much  needed  assistance  to  local  communities  for  local 
beach and dune monitoring, enforcement and planning programs. 
2.  Authorize  a  Coastal  Community  Restoration  Program.  By  providing  incen-
tives  to  local  government  for  actions  that  resolve  important  habitat  protection 
conflicts,  revitalizing  previously  developed  areas  and  coordinating  conservation 
efforts,  Congress  will  enable  state  and  local  governments  to  better  manage  our 
nationally important coastal zones. 
3.  Maintain  existing  Federal  consistency  provisions.  The  Federal-state  partner-
ship  established  under  the  CZMA  enables  state  review  of  Federal  activities  to 
ensure  compliance  with  state  plans.  In  Alabama,  Federal  consistency  has  not 
limited  reasonable  activities  and  development  of  resources  in  the  coastal  zone, 
including  the  development  of  offshore  gas  production.  I  would  oppose  any  ac-
tions  to  weaken  the  CZMA  requirements  for  coordination  and  consistency  with 
state plans. 

l  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  necessary  changes 
to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  this  109th  Session  of  Congress.  Thank 
you for taking up this important matter at this time. 

Sincerely, 

BOB RILEY, 

Governor. 

cc: Congressman Jo Bonner and Senate Commerce Committee Staff 

COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 

Richmond, VA, May 23, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

I am writing to urge the Senate to reauthorize the Coastal Zone Management Act 
(CZMA).  Both  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on 
Ocean  Policy’s  Final  Report  recommended  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and 
highlighted  its  importance  in  ensuring  economically  vibrant  and  ecologically  sus-
tainable coastal and ocean resources. 

We  face  significant  challenges  along  our  coast  that  may  have  a  negative  impact 
on  both  the  health  and  economic  well-being  of  this  state  and  our  citizens.  In  Vir-
ginia,  CZMA  funds,  which  are  matched  by  the  state,  are  used  to  address  critically 
important coastal issues such as wetlands protection, sea grass and oyster reef res-
toration, ecotourism development, technical assistance to local governments, coastal 
land acquisition, nonpoint source pollution solution, and provision of maps of coastal 
resources and information through the Internet and other media. I understand that 
the  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee  will  begin  consider-
ation  of  CZMA  reauthorization  during  a  hearing  on  S.  360  (sponsored  by  Senators 
Olympia Snowe and John Kerry) that is scheduled for May 25. 

The  following  issues  are  of  primary  importance  when  considering  reauthorization 

of the CZMA: 

1.  Increase  support  for  state  and  territorial  coastal  zone  management  programs 
through management and implementation of grant programs and tools. These grant 
programs  are  critical  to  meeting  the  increasing  challenges  along  Virginia’s  coast. 
Virginia’s coastal population is growing (63 percent of Virginians live on the 22 per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

cent  of  land  that  comprises  our  coastal  zone),  yet  our  Federal  funding  for  CZM  has 
decreased. Exacerbating the problem is the fact that even prior to the FY 2005 CZM 
cuts, funding had been level since about 1988. In the face of only mild inflation, this 
has  translated  to  the  equivalent  of  roughly  a  70  percent  cut  in  Federal  funds.  In 
other words Virginia’s FY 2005 award of approximately $2.7 million is worth about 
$635,000  in  1988  dollars;  at  that  time  Virginia  was  receiving  about  $2  million. 
While  the  growth  of  the  Federal  budget  has  outpaced  the  rate  of  inflation,  almost 
none  of  those  increased  expenditures  have  been  allocated  for  CZM  appropriations. 
The  authorization  of  the  Coastal  Resource  Improvement  Program,  under  Section 
306A,  and  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Grants,  under  Section  309,  is  important  to 
providing  much  needed  assistance  to  local  communities.  In  Virginia  these  funds 
have helped in the acquisition of the most sensitive coastal areas (Virginia has only 
been  able  to  set  aside  about  $200,000  per  year  for  this  purpose,  and  far  more  is 
needed);  in  building  boardwalks,  nature  trails  and  other  public  access  amenities 
critical  to  supporting  Virginia’s  growing  ecotourism  industry;  and  for  the  develop-
ment  of  new  policies  to  protect  special  areas  such  as  the  biologically  diverse  south-
ern  watersheds  of  Virginia  Beach,  Chesapeake  and  the  Middle  Peninsula’s  Dragon 
Run. Section 309 is also funding the development of an integrated Blue-Green Infra-
structure Internet Mapping System which will allow anyone to access, via the Inter-
net,  maps  of  the  various  important  coastal  resources  on  the  land  and  in  the  water 
so that planning and decision-making can be better conducted with full and accurate 
information. 

2.  Authorize  a  Coastal  Community  Restoration  Program.  By  providing  incentives 
to  local  government  for  actions  that  resolve  important  habitat  protection  conflicts, 
revitalize  previously  developed  areas,  assess  and  manage  growth  and  coordinate 
conservation  efforts,  Congress  will  enable  state  and  local  governments  to  better 
manage  our  nationally  important  coastal  zones.  In  Virginia,  controlling  growth  and 
development  is  largely  within  our  local  governments’  purview.  Many  of  Virginia’s 
coastal  counties  are  rural  and  lack  the  funds  to  hire  full-time  planners  and  zoning 
administrators,  yet  they  are  facing  unprecedented  demands  for  more  housing  and 
development, particularly on the fragile waterfront. Carefully planning and carrying 
out  growth  in  our  coastal  zones  is  critical  to  the  long-term  protection  of  our  ocean 
and coastal resources. 

3. Maintain existing Federal consistency provisions. The Federal-state partnership 
established  under  the  CZMA  enables  state  review  of  Federal  activities  to  ensure 
compliance with state plans. In Virginia Federal consistency has not limited reason-
able activities and development of resources in the coastal zone. I would oppose any 
actions  to  weaken  the  CZMA  requirements  for  coordination  and  consistency  with 
state  plans.  Federal  consistency  provisions  have  minimized  negative  environmental 
consequences of projects while still allowing appropriate development to proceed. 

I  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  necessary  changes 
to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  this  109th  Session  of  Congress.  Thank 
you for addressing this important matter. 

Sincerely, 

MARK. R. WARNER, 
Governor. 

cc: Virginia Congressional Delegation 

STATE OF CALIFORNIA RESOURCES AGENCY 

Sacramento, CA, May 24, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

I  am  writing  to  express  our  support  for  S.  360,  the  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement 
Reauthorization  Act  of  2005.  California,  like  many  other  states,  faces  significant 
challenges  in  encouraging  economic  development  in  its  coastal  communities  while 
coping with the resultant growth. If enacted, the provisions of S. 360 would greatly 
increase the ability of California’s three Coastal Zone Management agencies to tack-
le  these  challenges.  The  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA)  of  1972  provides 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

grant  funds  to  states  that  are  matched,  and  used  to  leverage  significant  additional 
investment. These funds are critical to support community efforts to manage coastal 
resources  and  to  abate  nonpoint  source  pollution.  The  health  and  prosperity  of  our 
coastal communities depends on continued investment in our nation’s coastal legacy 
for future generations. 

Both  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean 
Policy’s  Final  Report  recommended  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and  high-
lighted  its  importance  in  protecting  and  managing  this  nation’s  coastal  and  ocean 
resources.  In  his  June  3,  2004  letter  to  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  and 
in  his  Ocean  Action  Plan,  Governor  Schwarzenegger  supported  the  reauthorization 
of  the  CZMA  to  strengthen  provisions  for  addressing  nonpoint  source  pollution  and 
to  maintain  the  Federal  consistency  provisions  that  allow  California  to  address  the 
adverse  impacts  of  Federally  approved  activities  such  as  oil  and  gas  development 
off our coast. 

The following two issues are of primary importance when considering reauthoriza-

tion of the CZMA: 

Maintain  existing  Federal  consistency  provisions.  The  landmark  Federal  CZMA 
is  the  only  land  and  water  use  planning  and  management  law  at  the  national 
level.  It  represents  a  unique  and  carefully  crafted  partnership  between  coastal 
states  and  the  Federal  Government.  Through  this  partnership,  the  CZMA  has 
also,  for  the  first  time,  given  local  coastal  government  a  meaningful  voice  in 
Federal  actions  and  decisions  that  directly  affect  the  environmental  quality  of 
their  local  communities.  We  oppose  any  change  to  the  consistency  rules  that 
would  weaken  states’  rights  to  have  an  equal  voice  in  vital  decision-making 
dealing with activities that can have significant adverse effects on local coastal 
communities and other coastal resources. 
Provide  Sufficient  Funding  for  Coastal  Non-Point  Source  Pollution  Programs. 
The U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy and the Pew Ocean Commission reported 
polluted runoff as the top threat to our nation’s coastal and ocean resources. In 
addition,  the  U.S.  EPA  has  identified  runoff  from  impervious  surfaces  as  the 
number  one  threat  to  the  Nation’s  water  quality.  Congress  should  adequately 
fund  nonpoint  source  pollution  grants  (CZMA  Section  6217)  to  allow  coastal 
states to address one of the most significant sources of pollution to the Nation’s 
coastal waters. 

We would like to work with you in the coming months on any necessary changes 
to S. 360 and to ensure its passage during this 109th Congress. Thank you for tak-
ing up this important matter at this time. 

Sincerely, 

California Secretary for Resources. 

MIKE CHRISMAN, 

cc. Meg Caldwell, Chair, California Coastal Commission 

THE COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS STATE HOUSE 

Boston, MA, May 20, 2005 

Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Snowe: 

On behalf of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, I am writing to urge the Sen-
ate  to  reauthorize  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA).  Both  the  President’s 
U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  Final  Report 
recommended  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and  highlighted  its  importance  in 
ensuring  economically  vibrant  and  ecologically  sustainable  coastal  and  ocean  re-
sources. 

We  face  significant  challenges  along  our  coast  that  can  have  a  negative  impact 
on  both  the  health  and  economic  well-being  of  this  state  and  our  citizens.  Here  in 
Massachusetts,  CZMA  funds,  which  are  matched  by  the  state,  are  used  to  address 
the  following  priority  issues:  ocean  resource  management,  smart  growth  for  coastal 
communities, beach protection, and wetland restoration. I understand that the Sen-
ate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee  will  begin  consideration  of 
CZMA  reauthorization  during  a  hearing  on  S.  360  (sponsored  by  Senators  Olympia 
Snowe and John Kerry) that is scheduled for Wednesday, May 25, 2005. 

The  following  issues  are  of  primary  importance  when  considering  reauthorization 

of the CZMA: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

1. Increase support for state and territorial coastal zone management programs 
through  administration  and  implementation  grant  programs  and  tools.  These 
grant  programs  are  critical  to  meeting  the  increased  challenges  along  Massa-
chusetts’  coast.  The  Coastal  Zone  Management  regional  staff  provide  technical 
assistance on complex scientific and regulatory issues that is critical to local de-
cision-making  under  our  strong  home-rule  traditions.  The  authorization  of  the 
Coastal Resource Improvement Program, under Section 306A, and Coastal Zone 
Enhancement  Grants,  under  Section  309,  are  important  to  providing  much 
needed assistance to coastal areas. The flexibility in this voluntary program al-
lowed  Massachusetts  to  use  Federal  funds  to  initiate  the  Ocean  Management 
Task  Force  process  in  response  to  the  increase  in  offshore  ocean  projects  like 
Cape Wind and the Hubline gas pipeline. 
2.  Authorize  a  Coastal  Community  Restoration  Program.  By  providing  incen-
tives  to  local  government  for  actions  that  resolve  important  habitat  protection 
conflicts,  revitalize  previously  developed  areas  and  coordinate  conservation  ef-
forts Congress will enable state and local governments to better manage our na-
tionally  important  coastal  zones.  CZM’s  efforts  at  coastal  smart  growth  are  a 
step  in  the  right  direction,  but  much  more  capacity  is  needed  at  the  local  level 
to deal with sprawl and its impacts on water quality, beach access, and coastal 
habitat protection. 
3.  Maintain  existing  Federal  consistency  provisions.  The  Federal-state  partner-
ship  established  under  the  CZMA  enables  state  review  of  Federal  activities  to 
ensure  compliance  with  state  plans.  In  Massachusetts,  Federal  consistency  has 
not  limited  reasonable  activities  and  development  of  resources  in  the  coastal 
zone. I would oppose any actions to weaken the CZMA requirements for coordi-
nation and consistency with state plans. The unique and critical role of Federal 
consistency  review  for  projects  just  offshore  the  Commonwealth  has  been  high-
lighted by the Cape Wind wind farm, Northeast Gateway and the Neptune Liq-
uid Natural Gas proposals. 

I  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  necessary  changes 
to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  this  109th  Session  of  Congress.  Thank 
you for taking up this important matter at this time. 

Sincerely, 

MITT ROMNEY, 

Governor. 

STATE OF MAINE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 

Augusta, ME, May 23, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

On behalf of the State of Maine, I am writing to urge the Senate to take positive 
action  on  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  this  year,  and  to 
thank you for scheduling a hearing this week on S. 360, the Coastal Zone Enhance-
ment  Reauthorization  Act.  I  would  especially  like  to  acknowledge  Senator  Snowe’s 
ongoing leadership in support of the CZMA, as co-sponsor of S. 360 (along with Sen-
ator  Kerry.)  I  am  encouraged  that  the  Senate  is  moving  on  the  CZMA  as  called  for 
in  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan,  in  my  detailed  comments  in  response  to 
the  Ocean  Commission,  I  emphasized  the  importance  of  an  enhanced  Coastal  Zone 
Management Act as the vehicle for delivering on-the-ground environmental improve-
ments  and  ensuring  economically  vibrant  and  ecologically  sustainable  coastal  and 
ocean resources. 

In  Maine,  CZMA  funds,  which  are  matched  by  the  state,  are  used  for  protecting 
ocean  and  coastal  water  quality,  assisting  coastal  communities  with  the  impacts  of 
growth,  restoring  coastal  habitats,  enhancing  public  access  and  mitigating  coastal 
hazards.  We  have  a  strong  Maine  Coastal  Program  with  a  twenty-seven  year  track 
record  of  success.  However,  we  continue  to  face  significant,  increasingly  complex 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

challenges  along  our  coast  that  can  have  a  negative  impact  on  both  the  health  and 
economic well-being of this state and our citizens. 

I  would  like  to  underscore  a  few  areas  of  primary  importance  to  Maine  as  you 

consider reauthorization of the CZMA: 

1.  Increase  support  for  state  coastal  zone  management  programs.  CZM  grants  are 
critical to meeting increased challenges along Maine’s coast. Section 306 grants have 
supported  the  formation  of  Maine’s  Working  Waterfront  Coalition,  development  of 
a  municipal  technical  assistance  effort  and  a  local  grants  program,  all  aimed  at 
stemming the tide of conversion of Maine’s small working harbors to residential and 
tourist-related uses. 

The  authorization  of  the  Coastal  Resource  Improvement  Program,  under  Section 
306A,  and  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Grants,  under  Section  309,  are  important  to 
providing much needed assistance to local communities. Section 309 funds now sup-
port  our  2  year  bay  management  study,  helping  us  to  determine  how  to  work  more 
effectively  with  towns  and  other  stakeholders  to  ensure  balanced  development  and 
conservation of nearshore waters. 

Decreases in Federal CZM funding in 2005 caused the Maine Coastal Program to 
reduce  staff  and  services.  A  $500,000  reduction  in  funding  severely  impacted  our 
local  grants  program,  and  our  nonpoint  source  pollution  program.  Maine  supports 
the  authorization  levels  proposed  by  the  Coastal  States  Organization,  but  calls  at-
tention  to  the  need  for  funds  to  sufficiently  address  polluted  runoff  in  addition  to 
the myriad of other eligible priority needs. 

2. Authorize a Coastal Communities Program. By providing incentives to local gov-
ernment, Congress will enable state and local governments to better manage our na-
tionally  important  coastal  zones.  CZM  funds  in  Maine  currently  support  a  twelve- 
town habitat and open space planning initiative in which the municipalities are ex-
pected  to  develop  joint  programs  for  protection  of  regionally  significant  habitats. 
Further  down  the  coast,  a  groundbreaking  agreement  on  the  Penobscot  River  will 
result  in  significant  habitat  improvement  while  protecting  hydropower  opportuni-
ties.  Coastwide,  more  than  30  towns  have  been  assisted  with  habitat  protection 
strategies.  The  cost  to  fully  implement  these  programs  is  substantial  and  requires 
a strong commitment on the part of our local/state/Federal partnership. 

3. Provide ongoing funding for Coastal NonPoint Pollution Control. It is estimated 
that  more  than  80  percent  of  pollution  entering  Maine’s  coastal  waters  is  from  dif-
fuse sources of coastal runoff, yet most programs that assist states with control and 
elimination  of  polluted  runoff  are  being  cut.  To  not  target  significant  funding  to-
wards a priority problem is an inefficient use of Federal and state resources. S. 360 
allows  CZM  programs  to  direct  funds  towards  pollution  programs  in  addition  to 
other state priorities. 

4. Maintain existing Federal consistency provisions. The Federal-state partnership 
established  under  the  CZMA  enables  state  review  of  Federal  activities  to  ensure 
compliance  with  state  plans.  In  Maine,  Federal  consistency  has  not  limited  reason-
able  activities  and  development  of  resources  in  the  coastal  zone.  To  the  contrary, 
our staff has been praised by Federal agencies, military staff and private sector de-
velopers for their fair, thorough and timely response to Federal actions in the coast-
al zone. I would oppose any actions to weaken the CZMA requirements for coordina-
tion and consistency with state plans. 

5. Increase opportunities for regional cooperation. Finally, I am aware of the work 
of  NOAA  and  other  agencies  to  reorient  existing  programs  towards  an  ecosystem- 
based  management  framework.  In  the  Gulf  of  Maine,  we  have  the  beginnings  of 
such  an  innovative  approach  to  regional  governance  in  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Council, 
the  Regional  Association  for  Research  on  the  Gulf  of  Maine  and  the  GOM  Ocean 
Observing  System  (GoMOOS).  S.  360  could  be  further  strengthened  by  including 
provisions  for  regional  cooperation  and  a  grants  program  to  provide  incentives  for 
states to pursue regional pilot projects that demonstrate success in ecosystem-based 
management. 

I  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  necessary  changes 
to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  this  109th  Session  of  Congress.  Thank 
you for taking up this important matter at this time. 

JOHN ELIAS BALDACCI, 

Governor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

STATE OF OREGON STATE CAPITOL 

Salem, OR, May 25, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Stevens: 

On  behalf  of  the  State  of  Oregon,  I  want  to  express  my  strong  support  for  reau-
thorization  of  the  national  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA).  The  CZMA  has 
been  instrumental  in  helping  Oregon  to  balance  growth  and  economic  development 
in coastal communities with protection of the outstanding scenic and environmental 
resources of the Oregon coast. Reauthorizing this important Act will affirm the val-
ues and importance of our coasts to the Nation and underscore the need to manage 
and protect them for the future. 

For nearly three decades, Oregon and the Nation have benefited from unique pro-
visions  of  the  Act  that  promote  partnerships  among  states,  local  governments,  and 
Federal  agencies  to  address  crosscutting  issues  affecting  coastal  watersheds, 
shorelands, estuaries and ocean resources. Funding under the Act has been vital to 
building  capacity  in  local  governments  and  state  agencies  to  protect  coastal  re-
sources, provide public amenities and manage growth. Many cities simply could not 
do the job of protecting coastal resources, providing public access, or creating livable 
communities  without  this  Federal  funding.  The  Act’s  unique  ‘‘Federal  consistency’’ 
provisions enable Oregon to review Federal agency actions to ensure that they meet 
state and local needs and requirements. 

The recent report of the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy described many issues 
facing  the  Nation’s  coasts  and  oceans  that  I  believe  can  be  most  effectively  ad-
dressed through strengthened state coastal management programs. These issues in-
clude  managing  urban  growth,  protecting  and  restoring  coastal  habitats,  reducing 
pollution from watersheds into coastal waters, avoiding or reducing natural hazards 
on  coastal  shorelands  and  in  floodplains,  planning  and  managing  ocean  resources, 
reinvesting  in  port  and  harbor  facilities,  providing  public  access,  education,  and  in-
formation,  and  protecting  special  coastal  and  ocean  areas.  Thus  I  believe  that  it 
makes sense to not only reauthorize the CZMA but also strengthen it based on need 
and experience. 

I  urge  the  Congress  to  add  a  Coastal  Communities  Program,  as  recommended  by 
the  Coastal  States  Organization,  to  address  development  and  conservation  through 
community assessments, planning, and demonstration projects. Oregon has targeted 
significant  state  and  Federal  CZMA  financial  and  technical  resources  to  local  gov-
ernments  to  assist  in  managing  growth  and  development  while  protecting  coastal 
resources.  Based  on  our  experience,  I  firmly  believe  that  a  robust  Coastal  Commu-
nities Program would pay big dividends to the Nation in protecting coastal resources 
while growing coastal communities. 

Because  meeting  the  increasing  challenges  of  coastal  management  through  the 
CZMA  will  require  increased  funding,  I  also  encourage  the  Committee  to  support 
significantly  higher  levels  of  Federal  Appropriations  for  coastal  zone  management 
to  help  states  and  local  governments,  as  well  as  related  special  programs  such  as 
the  NOAA  Coastal  Services  Center,  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  system, 
and  research  on  nearshore  ecosystems  and  fisheries  on  which  our  coastal  commu-
nities depend. 

I thank you and the Committee for your important work on this vital piece of leg-
islation. If I can provide you with more information about coastal zone management 
in Oregon, please do not hesitate to contact me. 

Very truly yours, 

THEODORE R. KULONGOSKI, 

Governor. 

cc: Oregon Congressional Delegation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

STATE OF WASHINGTON OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 

Olympia, Washington, June 6, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

On behalf of the state of Washington, I am writing to urge the Senate to reauthor-
ize the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). Both the President’s U.S. Ocean Ac-
tion  Plan  and  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  final  report,  An  Ocean  Blue-
print  for  the  21st  Century,  recommended  reauthorizing  the  CZMA  and  highlighted 
its importance in ensuring economically vibrant and ecologically sustainable coastal 
and ocean resources. 

We face significant challenges along our coast that can impair the health and eco-
nomic  wellbeing  of  our  state  and  its  citizens.  The  CZMA  funds  are  matched  by 
Washington State to help protect coastal resources and support waterfront and port 
development,  recreation,  and  tourism.  We  are  addressing  salmon  recovery  in  Puget 
Sound,  water  quality  problems  in  Hood  Canal,  shoreline  erosion  on  the  Pacific 
Coast, and other difficult coastal management issues. To meet these challenges and 
to advance the President’s Ocean Action agenda, it is critical that we increase CZM 
resources to support local shoreline planning, watershed protection, and habitat con-
servation. 

I am informed that the Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee 
began  considering  the  CZMA  reauthorization  at  a  hearing  on  S.  360  (sponsored  by 
Senators  Olympia  Snowe  and  John  Kerry)  on  Wednesday,  May  25.  The  following 
issues  are  of  primary  concern  to  our  state  in  considering  reauthorization  of  the 
CZMA: 

1.  Increase  support  for  state  and  territorial  coastal-zone  management  programs 
to  provide  funding  and  assistance  to  help  our  communities  anticipate  and  ac-
commodate  growth  while  protecting  coastal  resources.  The  authorization  of  the 
Coastal Resource Improvement Program, under Section 306A, and Coastal Zone 
Enhancement  Grants,  under  Section  309,  provides  much-needed  assistance  to 
local  communities  updating  their  shoreline  plans  and  conserving  natural  re-
sources. 
2. Authorize a Coastal Community Program to provide funding and technical as-
sistance to help local governments plan for growth, reduce nonpoint-source pol-
lution,  protect  and  restore  important  habitat  areas,  and  revitalize  waterfront 
areas. Coastal communities in Washington—from our urban cities on the shores 
of  Puget  Sound  to  our  rural  communities  on  the  Pacific  Coast—are  in  direct 
need of additional assistance in meeting these challenges. 
3.  Maintain  existing  Federal  consistency  provisions.  The  Federal-state  partner-
ship established under the CZMA gives states the power to ensure that Federal 
activities,  such  as  dam  re-licensing  and  dredging  projects,  are  consistent  with 
the  state’s  coastal  program.  In  Washington  State,  Federal  consistency  has  not 
limited  reasonable  activities  and  development  in  the  coastal  zone.  I  oppose 
weakening the CZMA requirements for coordination and consistency with state 
plans. 

Reauthorizing  the  CZMA  will  enable  state  and  local  governments  to  better  man-
age  locally  and  national  significant  coastal  areas.  These  programs  invigorate  our 
economy  and  improve  quality  of  life  for  the  citizens  of  Washington.  For  all  of  these 
reasons, I request your support of S. 360 this year. 

Thank  you  for  your  attention  to  these  concerns.  Please  let  me  know  how  I  can 

help. 

Sincerely, 

CHRISTINE O. GREGOIRE, 

Governor. 

Ms.  COOKSEY.  Many  coastal  States  are  taking  the  lead  in  re-
sponding  to  these  plans  for  action.  Hawaii,  California,  and  Alaska 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

have established ocean councils. Alaska is in the process of success-
fully  completing  amendments  to  its  CZM  program.  Massachusetts 
has proposed legislation to develop a comprehensive ocean manage-
ment  plan.  South  Carolina  is  developing  recommendations  for  its 
coastal  future.  The  New  Jersey  Governor  recently  announced  a 
coastal  action  plan.  There  are  also  significant  state-led  plans 
throughout the Nation, Pacific Islands, and Alaska. 

CSO’s  recommendations  largely  track  the  Ocean  Commission 
blueprint  and  the  proposals  already  included  in  S.  360  in  the  four 
following  areas:  support  for  coastal  program  implementation  and 
enhancement grants shared by all States under CZMA sections 306 
and  309;  support  for  proposals  for  resource  improvement  grants 
under  section  306A  and  community  grants  under  the  new  section 
309[a];  continued  support  for  Federal  consistency  authority  under 
CZMA section 307; clear authority and funding for the National Es-
tuarine  Research  Reserves’  research,  education,  and  stewardship 
missions  under  section  315  and  318;  and  additional  authority  to 
foster regional ecosystem management under section 308 and man-
agement-oriented  research  and  technical  assistance  under  section 
310. 

CSO strongly supports the recommended authorization levels for 
State  grants  under  sections  306,  306A,  and  309.  The  language 
added  under  306[c]  providing  for  equitable  sharing  of  increased 
funds by all States is important to assure that States whose grants 
have  been  capped  over  the  past  6  to  10  years  will  receive  a  fair 
share of increased funding. 

We  request  the  Committee  also  make  changes  to  section  309  to 
expand  eligibility  for  enhancement  grants,  to  include  not  just  for-
mal  program  changes  but  also  projects  or  activities  that  support 
improved ecosystem-based management, or demonstrate significant 
potential  for  improving  integrated  coastal  watershed  and  ocean 
management. 

CSO  strongly  supports  a  proposal  under  Senate  Bill  360  to  sup-
port  resource  improvement  grants  that  are  listed  under  section 
306A and the coastal community grants under 309[a]. 

There seems to be considerable confusion about both the purpose 
and  application  of  the  CZMA  Federal  consistency  authority.  It  has 
wrongly  been  characterized  as  a  duplicative  level  of  authority  and 
review. On the contrary, the clear objective and function of consist-
ency  is  to  support  a  process  for  coordination  and  cooperation.  This 
is how it actually works in the vast majority of States and it works 
well, including in Delaware. 

While  all  Federal  activities  and  permits  that  may  affect  re-
sources and uses of a State coastal zone will trigger consistency, it 
does  not  impose  new  regulatory  requirements.  It  simply  provides 
that  that  activity  must  be  consistent  with  those  applicable  State 
enforceable policies that already exist and are incorporated into the 
Federally approved program. 

CSO  does  not  support  piecemeal  amendments  to  the  CZM  that 
have  been  proposed  in  the  various  versions  of  the  energy  bill  that 
Senator  Nelson  mentioned  this  morning.  CSO  and  NERRA  are 
pleased  that  Senate  Bill  360  clarifies  the  authority  of  the  reserve 
system  to  include  education  and  resource  stewardship  in  addition 
to research. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

We urge the Committee to consider amending the CZMA or pass-
ing  companion  legislation  to  provide  additional  support  for  State- 
regional collaborations. Currently CZMA section 308 authorizes the 
use  of  the  CZM  management  fund  for  other  things,  projects  to  ad-
dress  management  issues  that  are  regional  in  scope,  projects  in-
cluding interstate projects, and demonstration projects, which have 
a high potential for improving coastal zone management, especially 
at  the  local  level.  We  propose  that  these  specific  authorities  be  re-
tained  and  amended  to  support  adaptive  ecosystem-based  manage-
ment, rather than direct the CZM fund to NOAA to offset operating 
and administrative costs. 

CSO  also  recommends  strengthening  the  provisions  of  section 
310 to include support for a regional coastal services center. As rec-
ommended  by  the  Ocean  Commission,  funding  should  be  author-
ized annually for grants to States under this section. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  CSO  is  ready  to 
work  with  you  in  any  way  to  support  passage  and  reauthorization 
of the Coastal Zone Management Act. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Cooksey follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SARAH W. COOKSEY, ADMINISTRATOR, DELAWARE COASTAL 

PROGRAMS; BOARD MEMBER AND FORMER CHAIR, COASTAL STATES ORGANIZATION 

Introduction 

I want to thank Committee Chairman Ted Stevens, Subcommittee Chair Olympia 
Snowe,  as  well  as  Ranking  Members,  Senators  Daniel  Inouye  and  Maria  Cantwell, 
and  other  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  testify 
today  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA).  On  be-
half  of  my  colleagues  in  the  coastal  states,  I  also  want  to  express  our  appreciation 
for your leadership in supporting the CZMA and other crucial coastal and ocean leg-
islation. 

My  name  is  Sarah  Cooksey.  I  am  the  Administrator  of  Delaware’s  Coastal  Man-
agement  Programs,  which  includes  both  the  coastal  management  and  the  research 
reserve  programs.  I  am  testifying  today  in  my  role  as  Board  Member  and  former- 
Chair of the Coastal States Organization (CSO). I want to extend the regrets of the 
current  CSO  Chair,  Phil  Hinesley  from  Alabama,  who  couldn’t  be  with  us  today  as 
he  is  in  American  Samoa  celebrating  the  25th  Anniversary  of  their  CZM  Program. 
Since  1970,  CSO  has  represented  the  interests  of  the  coastal  states,  including  the 
Great  Lakes  and  island  territories  on  matters  related  to  coastal,  Great  Lakes  and 
ocean  resource  protection,  management  and  development.  CSO’s  membership  con-
sists of Delegates appointed by the Governors from the 35 States, Commonwealths, 
and  Territories.  The  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  Association  (NERRA)  is 
also  an  affiliate  member  of  CSO.  For  the  record,  I  request  that  this  testimony  be 
added  to  the  record  and  have  also  attached  a  copy  of  the  National  Governors  Asso-
ciation (NGA) policy that calls for CZMA reauthorization. 

It is fitting that the CZMA, which was originally passed to support recommenda-
tions  of  the  1969  Stratton  Commission,  will  be  reauthorized  to  address  the  recent 
and  important  call  to  action  detailed  in  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  final 
report and the President’s U.S. Ocean Action Plan. Both documents identified reau-
thorization  of  the  CZMA  as  a  priority.  Legislative  priorities,  in  addition  to  the 
CZMA,  that  were  identified  by  both  the  Ocean  Commission  and  the  Action  Plan 
under the jurisdiction of this Committee include a NOAA Organic Act, and the Mag-
nuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Conservation  and  Management  Act.  We  hope  to  see  action 
this  year  on  these  fundamental  building  blocks  of  any  national  coastal  and  ocean 
policy. The time for action is now. 

Our Nation’s history, economy and culture are inextricably linked to and depend-
ent  upon  the  natural  resources  and  economic  vitality  of  the  coasts—from  the  ports 
around  which  our  nation’s  largest  cities  grew;  to  the  fishing  communities  along  the 
coast  of  Maine;  to  the  beaches  from  Cape  Cod  to  California;  to  the  habitats  of  Gal-
veston  Bay  and  wetlands  of  Louisiana;  to  unique  landscape  and  indigenous  peoples 
of  Alaska  and  the  Pacific  islands.  It  has  been  estimated  that  1  out  of  6  U.S.  jobs 
is marine related, and 1⁄3 of the Gross Domestic Product is produced in coastal coun-
ties.  The  180  million  American  and  international  visitors  who  enjoy  coastal  areas 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

and  coral  reefs  each  year  account  for  85  percent  of  U.S.  tourism  revenues.  Inter-
national  shipping  brings  more  than  $700  billion  in  goods  to  U.S.  ports.  Coasts— 
where our nation’s major river basins connect our inland watersheds to our oceans— 
are truly a national resource. 
The Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA) 

The CZMA is the only national program that supports a Federal-state partnership 
with  the  goal  of  improving  both  the  quality  of  life  in  coastal  communities  and  en-
hancing  the  stewardship,  sustainable  use  and  conservation  of  coastal  and  ocean  re-
sources for the benefit of current and future generations. Congress was prescient in 
1972  when  it  passed  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA)  to  provide  incen-
tives: 

to  encourage  and  assist  the  states  to  exercise  effectively  their  responsibilities 
in  the  coastal  zone  through  the  development  and  implementation  of  manage-
ment  programs  to  achieve  the  wise  use  of  the  land  and  water  resources  of  the 
coastal  zone,  giving  full  consideration  to  ecological,  cultural,  historic,  and  es-
thetic  values  as  well  as  the  needs  for  compatible  economic  development 
programs . . . . (16 USC 1452(2)) 

The CZMA is unique in linking Federal, state and community-based coastal man-
agement efforts. The CZMA furthers national goals by supporting the identification 
of  priorities  and  implementation  of  local  strategies  in  the  three  fundamental  ways. 
• It  provides  a  national  framework  and  matching  grants  that  support  states,  in 
working  with  local  communities  and  Federal  agencies  partners,  to  develop  and 
implement  coastal  and  ocean  management  plans,  program  and  policies,  which 
are  based  on  local  priorities  and  further  the  national  economic,  environmental 
and societal objectives set out in the Act. 
• It  provides  a  process  for  coordinating  state  and  Federal  activities,  licenses  and 
permits to assure that they are consistent with the applicable policies of Feder-
ally  approved  state  coastal  zone  management  programs.  (This  is  commonly  re-
ferred to as ‘‘consistency authority.’’) 
• It  establishes  and  supports  a  network  of  26  National  Estuarine  Research  Re-
serves representing diverse estuarine and coastal ecosystems, which play a crit-
ical  role  in  national  efforts  to  understand  and  sustain  healthy  estuaries  and 
coastal communities. 

Thirty  four  of  the  35  eligible  state  have  developed—and  the  35th  state,  Illinois, 
is in the process of developing—comprehensive coastal programs which are designed 
to protect and restore wetlands and other critical habitats; increase recreational op-
portunities and public access to shorelines; reduce the threats of coastal hazards to 
public  health  and  property;  and  reduce  coastal  pollution  and  cumulative  and  sec-
ondary that can degrade coastal waters; as well as, to support well-planned coastal 
communities, compatible coastal dependent development and revitalize waterfronts. 
The  26  estuaries  have  been  designated  as  part  of  the  National  Research  Reserve 
System  (NERRS)  include  sites  from  Alaska  to  Puerto  Rico,  with  an  additional  site 
in  Texas  expected  to  be  designated  later  this  year.  NERRS  serve  as  local  labora-
tories  and  regional  centers  of  excellence.  At  Reserve  sites,  coastal  communities  can 
access  a  broad  array  of  critical  information  and  coastal  services.  These  services  in-
clude:  (1)  training  to  promote  informed  environmental  decision-making;  (2)  a  na-
tional monitoring program for estuaries; and (3) education opportunities for students 
and  the  public.  With  these  key  elements,  the  reserve  system  is  in  the  unique  posi-
tion  of  serving  the  national  interest  while  responding  to  local  needs.  They  have  de-
veloped several unique system-wide national programs including system-wide moni-
toring, graduate research fellowships and coastal training programs. 

Many  coastal  states  are  taking  the  lead  in  building  on  these  efforts.  In  Hawaii, 
California,  and  Alaska,  the  Governors  have  established  Ocean  Councils  to  take  a 
more  integrated  and  comprehensive  look  at  coastal  and  ocean  management  prior-
ities. As you will hear about in later testimony, Alaska is in the process of success-
fully  completing  amendments  to  its  CZM  program.  The  Governor  of  Massachusetts 
has proposed legislation to improve management of coastal estuaries and to develop 
a comprehensive ocean management plan. South Carolina has completed an assess-
ment  and  developed  recommendations  for  its  ‘‘Coastal  Future.’’  The  New  Jersey 
Governor  recently  announced  a  Coastal  Action  Plan.  Other  states  are  developing 
equally ambitious coastal and ocean agendas. There are also significant state-led re-
gional efforts in the Gulf of Maine, Mid-Atlantic, Gulf of Mexico, and the Pacific Is-
lands. 

Enacting many of the recommendations proposed in S. 360, The Coastal Zone En-
hancement Reauthorization Act of 2005, will provide much needed support for these 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

ongoing  efforts,  encourage  increased  coordination,  and  improve  partnerships  with 
Federal agencies, as well as the private and public sector that will be crucial to our 
nation’s future success in managing coastal and ocean resources. 
Coastal  and  Ocean  Stewardship  Challenges:  A  Roadmap  for  CZM 

Reauthorization 

The  final  report  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  (April  2004)  documents 
the  challenges  and  sets  out  a  vision  and  blueprint  for  action  for  the  future  of  our 
nation’s  coasts  and  oceans.  To  address  the  many  challenges  outlined  in  the  Report, 
the Ocean Commission Coastal population is increasing by 3,600 per day—a rate of 
growth that may result in 27 million more residents per, in an area that is already 
the  most  densely  populated  in  the  country.  The  impact  of  resulting  land  consump-
tion  and  development  can  outstrip  population  increased  by  3–5  times  the  pace  of 
population.  That  rate  of  harmful  algal  blooms  (HAB)  outbreaks  and  appearances  of 
‘‘dead zone’’ are increasing. In 1997, HABs cost the Maryland seafood and recreation 
industry  more  than  $50  million.  Hurricanes  and  tropical  storms  are  predicted  to 
continue to threaten coastal communities. 

Although less comprehensive than the Ocean Commission Report, the President’s 
U.S.  Action  Plan  (September  2004)  recognizes  the  need  to  support  adaptive,  eco-
system-based approach management and to facilitate regional management. The Ac-
tion Plan specifically calls on Congress to work with the Administration to reauthor-
ize  the  CZMA.  The  Ocean  Commission  Report  recommends  significantly  increased 
funding  for  states  to  undertake  coastal  and  ocean  programs  and  activities.  The  Re-
port also calls for implementation of improved regional ecosystem-based approaches 
to  management  to  address  the  growing  pressures  of  coastal  development,  emerging 
uses  and  conflicts  in  ocean  areas,  including  ecosystem  assessments,  improved  sci-
entific information, monitoring, and research to support adaptive coastal and water-
shed management. 

The  Ocean  Commission  Report  specifically  recommends  that  the  following  be  in-

cluded in CZMA reauthorization: 

community development; 

dress watershed and ocean planning; 

• strengthen  the  planning  and  coordination  capabilities  of  coastal  states  to  ad-
• increase  Federal  financial,  technical  and  institutional  support  for  sustainable 
• expand  investment  in  the  conservation  and  restoration  of  coastal  habitats;  and 
• support state coastal resource assessments. 
In  response  to  the  Ocean  Commission  Report,  President  George  Bush  put  forth 
the U.S. Ocean Action Plan (September 2004) which recognizes the need to support 
adaptive, ecosystem-based approach management and to facilitate regional manage-
ment.  The  Action  Plan  specifically  calls  on  Congress  to  work  with  the  Administra-
tion to reauthorize the CZMA. 

S.  360,  at  least  in  part,  addresses  all  of  these  recommendations.  A  more  specific 
discussion of S. 360, as well as CSO and NERRA recommendations for reauthoriza-
tion is set out in the following section. 
S. 360—Reauthorization Recommendations 

The coastal states have several recommendations which should be included in leg-
islation  to  reauthorize  the  CZMA.  These  changes  will  substantially  improve  the  ca-
pacity  of  states  to  meet  the  national  goals  of  the  CZMA,  as  well  as  the  challenges 
identified  in  the  Ocean  Commission  Report  and  the  President’s  U.S.  Action  Plan. 
The  states  appreciate  that  their  recommendations  have  largely  been  addressed  in 
S. 360. 
Summary of Primary Recommendations 

• Provide increased funding and support for all eligible coastal management pro-
grams  to  increase  their  capacity  to  address  the  challenges  identified  in  the 
Ocean Commission Report. Assure that all eligible states share equitably in the 
increased funding. (See S. 360, Sections 3, 7 and 17) 
• Authorize  additional  support  for  grants  to  states  for  resource  management  im-
provements  including  habitat  restoration,  reduction  of  coastal  nonpoint  pollu-
tion and support for well-planned community development. (See S. 360, Sections 
8, 11 and 17.) 
• Continue  support  for  governmental  coordination  and  consistency  of  Federal  ac-
tivities and permits activities that may affect state coastal resources with appli-
cable, Federally approved state coastal management policies, as provided in Sec-
tion 307 of the CZMA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

• Clarify the authority and increase funding for the NERRS system including core 
program  administration,  coastal  training,  site  stewardship,  system-wide  moni-
toring  and  research,  national  education  initiatives,  and  construction  of  projects 
at Reserves (See S. 360, Sections 4, 5, 15, and 17). 

Discussion and Additional Recommendations 
Program Implementation and Enhancement Grants 

Consistent with the recommendations of the Ocean Commission, S. 360 strength-
ens states’ capacity to further the national goals of the Act and improve integration 
of  coastal,  watershed  and  ocean  management  activities.  CSO  strongly  supports  the 
recommendation  for  increased  authorization  levels  beginning  at  $90.5  million  in 
2006 for state grants under sections 306, 306A and 309. The language added to sec-
tion  306(c)  providing  for  equitable  sharing  of  increased  funds  by  all  states  reflects 
language that has been included in appropriations bills over the past several years. 
This  provision  is  important  to  assure  that  states  whose  grants  have  been  ‘‘capped’’ 
over the past 6-10 years will receive a fair share of increased funding (Capped states 
include but are not limited to AK, ME, LA, WA, TX, MA, NC, NJ, CA, SC, MI, and 
MD).  CSO  also  supports  the  proposed  changes  that  would  eliminate  the  specific  10 
percent cap on resource improvement grants under section 306A and the $10 million 
limit on section 309 program enhancement grants. 

We request the Committee to consider making a few additional changes to Section 

309. 

• Amend  subsection  (b)(1)  to  expand  eligibility  for  enhancement  grants  beyond 
‘‘program  changes’’  to  include  ‘‘projects  or  activities  that  support  multi-jurisdic-
tional,  multi-state  or  regional  ecosystem-based  management,  or  demonstrate 
significant  potential  for  improving  integrated  coastal,  watershed  and  ocean 
management.’’ 
• Rather  than  have  the  Secretary  rank  state  enhancement  proposals  under  sub-
section (c); provide states with the option to set aside up to 20 percent of grants 
annually  for  CZM  program  enhancements.  This  change  would  more  accurately 
reflect  current  practice,  since  currently  there  is  no  actual  ranking  or  competi-
tion for enhancement grants. 

These changes would provide states with the flexibility they need to adopt innova-
tive projects and strategies, as well as formal program elements, to enhance the ef-
fectiveness of coastal, watershed and ocean management efforts. 
Resource Improvement and Community Grants 

The  expanded  authority  and  funding  provided  in  S.  360  to  support  resource  im-
provement grants, under Section 306A, and coastal community grants, under 309A, 
will provide critical resources to support critical implementation actions that will re-
sult  in  increased  public  access  and  waterfront  revitalization;  protection  of  cultural 
and historic resources; habitat conservation and restoration; coastal hazards mitiga-
tion; control of aquatic invasive species; reduction of hypoxia, harmful algal blooms, 
and  polluted  runoff.  It  will  also  improve  state  capacity  to  provide  technical  assist-
ance to coastal communities that support well-planned development and sustainable 
economic growth. 

One  change  the  states  suggest  the  Committee  make  to  these  provisions  is  that, 
rather than directing the states to set aside $10 million out of the section 309A com-
munity grants for coastal nonpoint pollution as provided in section 17(1) of the bill, 
additional  funding  be  provided  for  states  to  use  in  a  flexible  way  to  take  actions 
they deem necessary to be effective in protecting coastal water quality. 
Federal Consistency Authority 

There seems to be considerable confusion about both the purpose and application 
of  CZMA  Federal  consistency  authority.  It  has  wrongly  been  characterized  as  a  du-
plicative  level  of  review  or  an  additional  state  requirement.  On  the  contrary,  the 
clear  objective  and  function  of  consistency  is  to  support  a  process  for  ‘‘coordination 
and cooperation’’ of all applicable reviews at the Federal and state level. The CZMA 
correctly recognizes that that most effective way to further the national objective of 
the Act is to assure that Federal activities and permits incorporate applicable state 
requirements early in the process of developing there projects or activities. 

In  the  case  of  Federal  activities  or  permits  that  may  affect  state  coastal  uses  or 
resources,  Federal  agencies  or  applicants  are  required  to  determine  ‘‘at  the  earliest 
practical  time’’  whether  there  are  state  requirements  that  apply  and  how  they  will 
be  incorporated  into  the  planned  activity.  The  states  are  required  to  respond  the 
consistency  determination  with  any  concerns  ‘‘at  the  earliest  practical  time.’’  This 
is  how  it  actually  works  in  the  vast  majority  of  cases—and  it  works  well—in  Dela-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

ware and other states. Pending amendments to the consistency regulation proposed 
by the Administration would reinforce the requirements for early consideration and 
coordination of all reviews. 

While  all  Federal  activities  and  permit  that  ‘‘may  affect’’  resources  and  uses  of  a 
state’s coastal zone trigger consideration of consistency, it does not impose new reg-
ulatory  requirements.  It  simply  provides  that  that  the  activity  must  be  consistent 
with  those  applicable  enforceable  policies  that  already  exist  and  that  are  incor-
porated  into  the  Federally  approved  coastal  management  programs  and  are  recog-
nized  as  furthering  the  national  goals  of  the  Act.  The  CZMA  provides  further  safe-
guards  for  the  agencies  and  applicants  by  providing  for  an  appeal  to  the  Secretary 
of  Commerce  to  assure  that  decisions  are  consistent  with  the  national  objectives  of 
the  CZMA  and  national  security.  Provisions  are  set  in  the  CZMA  and  consistency 
regulations  that  allow  states  to  identify  what  Federal  activities  and  permits  affect-
ing the coastal zone they want to review, including what they do not want to review, 
and  to  work  with  Federal  agencies  on  coordinated  review  processes.  These  provi-
sions include listed and unlisted activities, geographic location, and exceptions of de 
minimus impacts (See e.g. 15 C.F.R. sections 930.34 and 930.53.) These regulations 
should provide the necessary flexibility for the state to determine how to assure that 
applicable state requirements can most effectively provide for consistency of Federal 
activities that affect state coastal resources. 
NERRS 

Of  particular  importance  to  the  NERRS  is  the  framework  provided  by  the  CZMA 
to  meet  the  need  for  informed  decision-making  at  the  Federal,  state,  and  local  lev-
els. Amendments to the Act should: 

coastal communities at local and regional scales 

• Provide effective mechanisms to assess the technology and information needs of 
• Strengthen  the  capacity  of  the  state-Federal  partnership  to  support  research 
• Improve the access and delivery of science-based information to coastal commu-
nities, and evaluate the performance of the state-Federal partnership in support 
of informed coastal decisions. 

and monitoring relevant to local and regional needs, and 

CSO  and  NERRA  are  pleased  that  S.  360  broadens  the  authority  of  the  Reserve 
System  to  include  education  and  resource  stewardship  in  addition  to  research.  We 
want to assure that the final language provides adequate authority for NERRS’ pri-
mary research and education elements including the Coastal Training, System-Wide 
Monitoring,  Graduate  Research  Fellowships,  and  K–12  Estuarine  Education  Pro-
gram. 

We  would  respectfully  suggest  that  a  vision  for  expansion  of  the  NERRS  be  in-
cluded  in  a  reauthorization  bill.  NERRA  vision  is  to  enhance  research,  education, 
and  stewardship  activities  nationwide  through  the  establishment  of  Reserves  in 
every  coastal  and  Great  Lakes  state,  as  the  resources  become  available.  With  re-
spect  to  authorization  levels,  NERRA  recommends  that  a  stable  base  for  each  Re-
serve be provided to support basic operations and research, education, and steward-
ship programs. 

NERRA supports a 5-year reauthorization beginning at $22 million and increasing 
by  $1  million  per  year  to  accommodate  new  sites,  expansion  of  products  and  serv-
ices, and cost of living increases. 

CSO  and  NERRA  strongly  endorse  incorporation  of  funding  for  construction  and 
land  acquisition  into  the  reauthorization  measure  as  stated  in  S.  360.  The  NERRS 
have  established  procedures  for  setting  priorities  for  construction  and  land  acquisi-
tion, and recently assembled long-term plans to meet construction and land acquisi-
tion needs. Incorporation of funds for these purposes—$15 million per year, as stat-
ed  in  S.  360—into  the  CZMA  will  provide  a  stable,  long-term  source  of  funding  for 
the NERRS to maintain facilities in support of research, education, and stewardship 
programs,  as  well  as  to  acquire  priority  land  and  water  areas  for  watershed  man-
agement. 
Fostering Regional Partnerships and Management-Oriented Research 

We  urge  the  Committee  to  consider  amending  the  CZMA  to  provide  additional 
support  for  state-regional  collaborations  that  identify  priority  coastal  and  ocean 
management  issues  and  develop  implementation  strategies  based  on  best  science 
available.  Both  the  Ocean  Commission  and  Administration’s  Action  Plan  call  for  a 
more  ecosystem-based  regional  coastal  watershed  and  ocean  management  strategy, 
and  support  for  regional  pilot  projects  that  build  on  existing  plans  and  processes. 
The  CZMA  can  provide  a  direct  link  now  to  these  regional  efforts  through  states 
coastal and ocean management plans, based on consideration of public trust, public 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

health  and  safety  interests.  Currently,  CZMA  section  308  authorizes  the  use  of  the 
Coastal Zone Management Fund for, among other things: ‘‘projects to address man-
agement  issues  that  are  regional  in  scope  projects,  including  interstate  projects,’’ 
and ‘‘demonstration projects which have a high potential for improving coastal zone 
management, especially at the local level.’’ 

We propose that these specific authorities be retained and amended to reflect sup-
port  for  adaptive,  ecosystem  based  management  of  coastal  watershed  and  oceans. 
Rather  than  redirect  the  CZM  Fund  to  NOAA  top  offset  operating  and  administra-
tive  costs  as  proposed  by  S.  360,  Section  9,  the  current  balance  in  the  fund  as  well 
as future payments should be dedicated to the states as originally intended for these 
regional,  interstate,  and  ecosystem  based  watershed  projects  and  activities.  Addi-
tional  funding  should  be  authorized  and  deposited  in  the  Fund  to  support  competi-
tive  grants  for  such  multi-jurisdictional,  interstate  or  regional  partnership  projects, 
taking  into  account  a  balance  of  regional  needs,  state  priorities,  and  a  variety  of 
project types and scales. While the oil and gas loan repayments that have tradition-
ally  supported  the  CZM  Fund  are  scheduled  to  diminish  in  coming  years,  Congress 
should  consider  replenishing  the  Fund  through  both  annual  appropriations  and 
dedicating  new  revenues  generated  from  permitting  offshore  uses  such  as  aqua-
culture,  transportation  and  other  support  facilities  for  oil  and  gas,  and  renewable 
energy activity. 

The Ocean Commission report recognized the importance of investing in improved 
understanding  of  the  coastal  and  ocean  ecosystems,  and  recommended  support  of 
coastal  assessments  and  regional  information  programs  led  by  the  states.  To  ad-
dress  this  recommendation  in  part,  CSO  recommends  amending  the  provisions  of 
CZMA  section  310,  which  require  the  Secretary  to  conduct  a  program  of  ‘‘technical 
assistance  and  management-oriented  research’’  necessary  to  support  the  implemen-
tation of State coastal management programs. The section’s current limitation to as-
sistance  and  research  related  to  ‘‘program  amendments  under  Section  309’’  should 
be  eliminated.  Provisions  should  be  strengthened  that  require  the  Secretary  to  co-
ordinate efforts relevant to intra- and inter-agency Federal agency research, studies 
and technical assistance activities. CSO supports the proposal in S. 360, Section 12 
that  would  authorize  the  Secretary  to  establish  a  program  enter  into  cooperative 
agreements  to  support  development  of  innovative  coastal  and  estuarine  technology. 
That  section  should  be  expanded  to  authorize  regional  coastal  service  centers,  as 
needed,  charged  with  coordinating  and  facilitating  access  to  NOAA  and  other  Fed-
eral  agency  research  and  technical  assistance,  disseminating  relevant  information 
and provide technical assistance, training and transfer best coastal and ocean man-
agement  practices.  Subsection  310(b)(3)  should  be  amended  ‘‘establishes  and  sup-
ports  a  routine  process  to  assure  that’’  the  Secretary  consults  with  states  on  a  reg-
ular basis regarding ‘‘coastal and ocean research and information needs,’’ as well as 
development and implementation of programs under the section. 

Finally, $30 million should be authorized annually for grants to states under this 
section  to  undertake  periodic  ecosystem  assessments  of  natural,  cultural  and  eco-
nomic  coastal  resources  to  support  development  of  relevant  performance  indicators 
and  sound  coastal  and  ocean  management  decisions.  This  funding  can  be  used  to 
identify  gaps  in  monitoring  and  research  needs  and  to  make  relevant  information 
available  to  the  public  through  mechanisms  such  as  the  ‘‘state  coastal  atlas’’  devel-
oped by Oregon or other information management or geospatial information tools or 
techniques. NOAA should support efforts to link these state assessments to broader 
regional ecosystem assessments and ocean observations systems. 
Conclusion 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  CSO  is  ready  to  work  with  you 
in  any  way  to  support  passage  of  S.  360  and  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone 
Management Act this year. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Cooksey,  and  I  want  to  thank 

all our panelists. 

I  would  like  to  address  one  of  the  first  issues,  and  I  know  Sen-
ator Nelson has raised it with the imminent markup of the energy 
bill  in  the  Energy  Committee.  With  the  Senate  being  on  the  verge 
of considering new energy legislation and new energy policy, one of 
the  issues  that  has  surrounded  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal 
Zone  Management  Act—and  in  fact  has  been  a  barrier  to  securing 
reauthorization,  as  Chairman  Stevens  said,  since  1999—has  been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

clarity and predictability with respect to the regulatory process and 
the consistency requirements under the legislation. 

I would like to be able to work through some of these issues and 
to separate fact from fiction, because, as you mentioned, Dr. Kitsos, 
in  your  remarks  here  this  morning,  States  have  concurred  with 
about  95  percent  of  the  projects  that  they  have  reviewed  under 
these  consistency  provisions.  So  exactly  what  is  the  essence  of  the 
problem here? 

There  is  a  lot  of  exaggeration  with  respect  to  this  process.  It  is 
an  issue  that  we  are  going  to  have  to  grapple  with.  We  are  facing 
some  of  these  challenges  because  if  they  attempt  to  lessen  States’ 
rights  or  circumvent  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  in  the  en-
ergy  legislation,  we  have  to  counter  those  attempts  with  the  facts. 
So  can  you  clarify  the  regulatory  process  and  exactly  what  is  at 
issue  here,  especially  regarding  claims  about  an  unlimited  process 
that  they  now  want  to  reduce?  I  know  the  Commerce  Department, 
in  conjunction  with  Interior,  has  recommended  a  270-day  process, 
for example. Tell me, what has generally been the standard for this 
consistency requirement process? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Well,  the  standard,  Senator  Snowe,  is  that  States 
have  an  approved  program  that  includes  specific  enforceable  poli-
cies  and  that  Federal  agencies  or  that  private  applicants  for  Fed-
eral licenses and permits conduct activities that are consistent with 
those enforceable policies. In a very general way, that is sort of the 
consistency principle. 

It has been subject to some controversy. On behalf of NOAA, we 
do  not  believe  that  it  is  as  controversial  as  other  folks  have  as-
serted, and the statistics as you quoted from my written testimony 
are in fact accurate. 

Now, some will argue those statistics leave out a number of cases 
where  States  have  used  consistency  as  leverage  to  bring  people  to 
the table to get some things done that the applicant or the Federal 
agency  might  not  otherwise  have  wanted  to  do.  Our  response  to 
that is that is the purpose of section 307 of the CZMA. It is called 
the intergovernmental cooperation section and it is intended to try 
to get Federal Government and State governments and local appli-
cants  to  work  together  to  make  sure  that  their  activities  are  not 
inconsistent with approved CZMA programs. 

Some  of  the  more  high  visibility  cases  deal  with  offshore  oil  and 
gas  and  I  think  the  witness  for  the  National  Ocean  Industries  As-
sociation  later  today,  this  morning,  will  talk  about  those  perhaps 
in some greater detail. But there have only been about 14 of those 
and  7  have  come  down  on  the  side  of  the  State  and  7  have  come 
down on the side of the—— 

Senator SNOWE. So there are 14? 
Dr.  KITSOS.  14  cases  have  gone  to  appeal  to  the  Secretary  of 

Senator SNOWE. Out of how many, would you say? 
Dr. KITSOS. Thousands. 
Senator SNOWE. Thousands? 
Dr. KITSOS. Thousands and thousands. Thousands and thousands 
of  exploration  plans  and  development  and  production  plans  and 
lease sales over the years since 1978, since the OCS Lands Act was 
amended. Now, most of those of course come from the Gulf of Mex-

Commerce. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

ico, Mississippi, Alabama, particularly Louisiana and Texas, where 
the  acceptance  of  offshore  oil  and  gas  of  course  is  quite  positive, 
and the consistency issue has not been a matter of contention. 

The number of cases that have reached the level of the Secretary 
of Commerce generally come from outside the Gulf of Mexico, some 
in California of course. 

So  our  sense  is  that  consistency  is  working.  It  is  working,  it  is 
working  well.  We  believe  that  your  legislation,  which  has  not 
opened  that  up,  is  a  good  idea  and  that,  as  Dr.  Cruickshank  has 
indicated,  the  Interior  and  Commerce  Departments  have  worked 
well  together  on  crafting  a  proposed  regulation  that  we  hope  will 
become  final.  It  is  a  potential  rule  that  we  hope  will  become  final, 
that  deals  with  issues  of  streamlining,  the  kind  of  record  that 
needs  to  be  put  before  the  Secretary  of  Commerce,  and  the  time 
limits involved in the Secretary making appeal decisions. 

But  we  believe  that  that  addresses  the  issues  that  were  in  the 
Vice  President’s  energy  report  and  should  resolve  a  number  of 
problems. 

Senator  SNOWE.  For  the  record,  could  you  explain  what  happens 

in the 270 days? Is that correct? 

Dr. KITSOS. Well, it is a little more detailed than that, but essen-
tially  the  270  days  is  the  time  for  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to 
keep  the  record  open.  Then  once  the  record  closes,  under  current 
law there is a 90-day period for the Secretary to make a final deci-
sion,  and  if  he  needs  another  45  days  he  can  have  that.  But  then 
he must issue a decision. 

There  is  an  agreement  between  the  Commerce  Department  and 
Interior  Department  that  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  should  not 
have  an  unlimited  amount  of  time,  as  long  as  he  has  the  material 
needed  to  make  a  decision,  in  order  to  make  an  appeal  decision 
about a consistency case. We believe that the regulation that is cur-
rently being considered addresses that directly. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Dr.  Cruickshank,  could  you  speak  to  that  as 

well, from your perspective in the Interior Department? 

Dr. CRUICKSHANK. Yes. I would agree with Dr. Kitsos’ statement 
that—with  one  minor  exception.  Our  count  is  there  have  been  17 
appeals,  14  of  which  actually  came  to  decision  with  the  Secretary 
of  Commerce.  Three  were  actually  resolved  during  the  appeals 
process  before  a  decision  was  required.  But  the  numbers  are  very 
similar in that regard. 

But we also feel that the issues that have been raised are issues 
that can and should be dealt with through the rulemaking process, 
and  we  have  been  working,  as  Dr.  Kitsos  indicated,  very  closely 
with NOAA and we are very pleased with the way the rulemaking 
process has gone. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Ms.  Cooksey,  would  you  like  to  speak  to  that? 
Ms. COOKSEY. Just very briefly. States believe it is fair and it is 

based on State enforceable policies. It levels the playing field. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  know  you  have  mentioned  in  your  testimony 
that  the  consistency  requirements  have  been  mischaracterized.  I 
would concur with you, and this speaks to the issue in terms of the 
track record. So the 270-day period, does that—— 

Ms. COOKSEY. That is not a problem. 
Senator SNOWE. It is not a problem, OK. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Chairman Stevens. 
The CHAIRMAN. Dr. Kitsos, I participated in the 1996 amendment 
that  would  require  issuing  a  final  decision  for  an  appeal  90  days 
after the issuance of a notice of decision and the record was closed. 
I have before me the list of those consistency appeals. I think there 
are  only  two  that  were  decided  in  less  than  a  year.  The  months 
elapsed run from 23 months, 15 months, 16 months, 25 months, 39 
months,  49  months,  48  months,  50  months,  38  months,  and  50 
months. Two of them were withdrawn, one after 50 months. 

That  does  not  sound  to  me  like  what  you  have  just  testified,  a 
year  plus  90  days.  We  had  a  law  that  said  you  would  close  the 
record  within  a  reasonable  period  of  time,  and  90  days  after  that 
you  would  make  a  decision.  Now,  it  seems  to  me  through  rule-
making  you  have  decided  that  270  days  is  a  reasonable  period  of 
time. Where did you get that? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Well,  that  is  based  on  the  experience  of  the  Depart-
ment on how much time it takes to deal with some of these difficult 
consistency  issues.  Senator,  I  do  not  have  that  list  in  front  of  me. 
The CHAIRMAN. I would be glad to put it in the record. The ques-
tion  is,  how  long  does  it  take  from  the  objection  date?  You  are  an-
swering  from  the  decision  to  close;  the  question  is  from  objection 
to close. We have got some interesting times coming. 

Just  for  instance,  I  am  sure  we  will  hear  about  this  later,  but  I 
was  told  just  last  week  that  by  2015  we  will  be  importing  40  per-
cent  of  our  natural  gas.  There  are  only  two  places  in  the  United 
States  will  allow  that  to  be  done  now,  despite  repeated  attempts. 
So  the  industry  now  is  going  to  Mexico  on  the  West  Coast.  I  as-
sume they will go to Canada on the East Coast. There is one place 
in Maine where they now can go, I understand, one place, a Native 
reservation in Maine. 

But  do  you  think  you  can  have  this  record  duplicated  in  connec-

tion with those offshore plants? 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

OCS-Related Coastal Zone Consistency Appeals 

Since 1982 there have been 14 appeals that have had Secretarial decisions issued and of those, 7 of the 

State’s  objections  have  been  overridden.  There  have  been  others  which  were  settled,  dismissed  on  proce-
dural  grounds,  or  withdrawn  before  getting  to  a  Secretarial  decision.  There  are  no  active  OCS  activity  ap-
peals. 

Consistency 

Appeals 

Company 

State 

Objection 

Date 

Appeal 
Filed 

Months 
Elapsed 

Decision 

Date 

Decision 

Union 

CA 

11/17/82 

12/17/82 

Exxon 

Exxon 

CA 

CA 

7/26/83 

8/26/83 

6/23/83 

7/22/83 

23 

15 

16 

11/9/84  Granted 

11/14/84  Denied 

11/18/84  Partial Deci-
sion; 6/87 
Agree-
ment 
12/23/85  Granted 

CA 

2/14/85 

3/13/85 

9 

CA 

11/14/86 

12/12/86 

25 

1/19/89  Granted 

P-OCS 0203 Ex-
ploration Plan 

Santa Rosa Ex-

ploration Plan 

Santa Ynez De-

velopment 
and Produc-
tion Plan 

P-OCS 0505 Ex-
ploration Plan 
NPDES Permit* 

P-OCS 0512 Ex-
ploration Plan 
P-OCS 0522 Ex-
ploration Plan 
P-OCS 0525 Ex-
ploration Plan 

Pulley Ridge 
Blocks 629 
630 Explo-
ration Plan 
Pulley Ridge 
Blocks 799 
Exploration 
Plan 

Galahad Pros-
pect Explo-
ration Plan 
Manteo Pros-

pect NPDES 
Permit 

Manteo Pros-
pect Block 
467 Explo-
ration Plan 

Diamond/Emer-
ald Prospects 
Exploration 
Plan 

Destin Dome 

Block 97 Ex-
ploration Plan 
Pensacola Block 

889 Supple-
mental Explo-
ration Plan 
Destin Dome 

Block 56 Unit 

Gulf/Chev-

ron 

Korea 
Drilling 

Co. 

Texaco 

Conoco 

Chevron 

CA 

CA 

CA 

2/23/88 

3/23/88 

6/9/88 

6/29/88 

6/9/88 

7/1/88 

14 

39 

28 

49 

5/19/89  Granted 

9/23/91  Withdrawn 

10/29/90  Denied 

1/7/93 

Denied 

Unocal 

FL 

11/22/88 

12/21/88 

Mobil 

FL 

12/16/88 

1/11/89 

48 

1/7/93 

Denied 

Amoco 

AK 

3/6/89 

4/3/89 

15 

7/20/90  Granted 

Mobil 

NC 

7/17/90 

7/27/90 

50 

9/2/94 

Denied 

Mobil 

NC 

11/19/90 

12/6/90 

45 

9/2/94 

Denied 

Texaco 

AK 

11/9/90 

12/7/90 

3 

With-
drawn 

3/91 Agree-

ment 

Chevron 

FL 

2/26/91 

3/11/91 

22 

1/8/93 

Granted 

Mobil 

FL 

4/6/92 

4/29/92 

38 

6/20/95  Granted 

Chevron 

FL 

2/17/98 

3/9/98 

50 

With-
drawn 

Reached 
Agree-
ment 5/02; 
Executed 
Agree-
ment 7/02 

*National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Timeline for Selected Appeals 

Union Exploration Partners Consistency Appeal Pulley Ridge 

Union  Submitted  Proposed  Plan  of  Exploration  (and  accompanying  Environ-

mental Report (ER)) 

MMS Determined Union’s Plan and ER Complete 
State of Florida (Florida Dept. of Environmental Regulation) Began Review of 

Union’s Consistency Certification 

MMS  Approved  Union’s  Plan  and  ER  Subject  to  State  Consistency  Certifi-

cation 

State  Notified  MMS  that  Could  Neither  Concur  nor  Object—Needed  Informa-
tion  from  Two  FL/DOI  Task  Groups  and  State  Requested  Additional  Infor-
mation from Union 

Union Provided Additional Information 
State  Objected  to  Union’s  Proposed  Plan  of  Exploration  (Inconsistent  with 
State CMP—Unique ecosystem and socioeconomic effects not adequately con-
sidered) 

Union  Filed  Appeal  to  Secretary  of  Commerce  and  Requested  30  Day  Exten-

sion from Briefing Schedule Issuance 

DOC Granted Union’s Request for an Extension 
Federal Register Notice of Appeal and Request for Comments 
Union Filed Timely Brief for Appeal 
FL Newspaper Request for Comments on Appeal 
DOC Solicited Views of 5 Federal Agencies and the National Security Council 
DOC Granted State Time Extension for Response 
State  Requested  a  Public  Hearing  on  Issues  from  this  Appeal  and  Companion 

Appeal of Mobil 

NOAA Granted State’s Request 
State Filed Timely Brief in Response to Union’s Appeal 
Local Hearings Held on Both Union and Mobil Appeals 
2 FL/DOI Task Group Reports Admitted to Record (‘‘Oil Spill Risk Assessment 
Task  Force  Report’’  &  ‘‘Southwest  Florida  OCS  Drilling  Impact  Assessment 
Task Force Report’’) 

Union Filed Supplemental Information to Its Appeal 
Record Closed to Public Comment 
Union,  Mobil.  and  the  State  Mutually  Agreed  Secretary  Should  Delay  Estab-
lishment  of  Final  Briefing  Schedule  (until  after  release  of  President’s  Outer 
Continental  Shelf  Leasing  and  Development  Task  Force  report—Unless  re-
port not released by end of January 1990) 

Secretary  of  Commerce  established  Final  Briefing  Schedule  (President’s  Task 

Force Report not out) 

State Requested Stay of Briefing Schedule 
Union Opposed Stay 
Union and State Both Filed Timely Final Briefs 
DOC Denied Stay 
Union and State Both Filed Timely Supplemental Final Briefs 
President  Imposed  Moratorium  on  Oil  and  Gas  Leasing  and  Development  off 

Coast of Florida 

Secretary  of  Commerce  Denies  Union’s  Appeal—(Ground  1:  Not  consistent 
with  the  objectives  of  the  CZMA  due  to  the  value  of  the  environmental  re-
sources  and  the  potential  for  significant  damage  if  impacted  by  oil.  Ground 
2: National Security not significantly impaired.) 

02/18/88 

04/08/88 
04/14/88 

06/03/88 

08/16/88 

09/08/88 
11/22/88 

12/21/88 

03/09/89 
03/29/89 
04/19/89 
04&05/89 
04/28/89 
05/11/89 
05/24/89 

06/02/89 
07/06/89 
09/89 
10/12/89 

10/12&13/89 
10/15/89 
11/20/89 

04/06/90 

05/21/90 
05/22/90 
05/25/90 
06/07/90 
06/08/90 
06/26/90 

01/07/93 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Timeline for Selected Appeals 

Mobil Exploration & Producing U.S. Inc. Consistency Appeal Pulley Ridge 
Mobil Submitted Proposed Plan of Exploration (and accompanying documents) 
MMS Determined Mobil’s Plan and Accompanying Documents Complete 
State of Florida (Florida Dept. of Environmental Regulation) Began Review of 

Mobil’s Consistency Certification 

MMS  Approved  Mobil’s  Plan,  Environmental  Report,  Environmental  Assess-
ment  and  Informed  Mobil  that  Drilling  Permits  Would  Not  be  Issued  Pend-
ing  State  Consistency  Certification  Review  and  MMS  Approval  of  a  Biologi-
cal Monitoring Plan 

State  Notified  MMS  that  Could  Neither  Concur  nor  Object—Needed  Informa-

tion from Two FL/DOI Task Groups 

State Objected to Mobil’s Proposed Plan of Exploration and Accompanying Doc-
uments  (Proposed  activity  inconsistent  with  the  provisions  of  Florida  stat-
utes.) 

Mobil Filed Appeal to Secretary of Commerce and Requested 30 Day Extension 

from Briefing Schedule Issuance 

DOC Granted Mobil’s Request for an Extension 
Federal Register Notice of Appeal and Request for Comments 
Mobil Filed Timely Brief for Appeal 
FL Newspaper Request for Comments on Appeal 
DOC Solicited Views of Federal Agencies and the National Security Council 
State  Requested  a  Public  Hearing  on  Issues  from  this  Appeal  and  Companion 

Appeal of Union 

NOAA Granted State’s Request 
State Filed Timely Brief in Response to Mobil’s Appeal 
Local Hearings Held on Both Mobil and Union Appeals 
2 FL/DOI Task Group Reports Admitted to Record (‘‘Oil Spill Risk Assessment 
Task  Force  Report’’  &  ‘‘Southwest  Florida  OCS  Drilling  Impact  Assessment 
Task Force Report’’) 

Mobil Filed Supplemental Information to Its Appeal 
Record Closed to Public Comment 
Mobil,  Union,  and  the  State  Mutually  Agreed  Secretary  Should  Delay  Estab-
lishment  of  Final  Briefing  Schedule  (until  after  release  of  President’s  Outer 
Continental  Shelf  Leasing  and  Development  Task  Force  report—Unless  re-
port not released by end of January 1990) 

Secretary  of  Commerce  established  Final  Briefing  Schedule  (President’s  Task 

Force Report not out) 

State  Requested  Stay  of  May  25,  1990  Final  Brief  Filing  and  June  8,  1990 

Supplemental Final Brief Filing Deadlines 

Mobil Opposed Stay 
DOC Denied Stay 
President  Imposed  Moratorium  on  Oil  and  Gas  Leasing  and  Development  off 

Coast of Florida 

Secretary of Commerce Denies Mobil’s Appeal—(Ground 1: Not consistent with 
the  objectives  of  the  CZMA  due  to  over-all  adverse  effects  presumed  to  be 
substantial. Ground 2: National Security not significantly impaired.) 

05/13/88 
06/13/88 
06/15/88 

07/13/88 

09/12/88 

12/14/88 

1/12/89 

03/09/89 
03/29/89 
04/19/89 
04&05/89 
04/28/89 
05/22/89 

06/02/89 
06/15/89 
09/89 
10/12/89 

10/12/89 
10/15/89 
11/20/89 

04/06/90 

05/21/90 

05/22/90 
06/07/90 
06/26/90 

01/07/93 

Dr.  KITSOS.  I  think  that  if  the  proposed  rule  becomes  final  you 
will  see  those  time  limits  reduced  substantially.  One  of  the—my 
sense of the data that you just quoted, Senator—and I would need 
to get back to you with a more detailed response for the record. But 
one  of  the  issues  in  the  1996  amendments  was  that  there  was  no 
time  limit  on  when  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  could  close  the 
record. Once the record was closed, then there were clear time lim-
its. 

The CHAIRMAN. We were told at the time that they would decide 

what was a reasonable time. Do you remember that? 

Dr. KITSOS. Yes. I was not involved in that, but I do know a little 
bit  about  the  history  of  that.  But  the  record  was  kept  open  appar-
ently in a number of cases longer than what others might consider 
a reasonable amount of time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

The  proposed  rule  does  address  that,  though,  and  would  put 

clearer time limits on the Secretary to close the record. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  as  Senator  Snowe  said,  the  energy  provi-
sions  are  unacceptable.  One  establishes  a  deadline  for  decision  on 
appeals of a consistency determination. You have just said you are 
ready to set a deadline of a year; is that right? 

Dr. KITSOS. Well, it is approximately a year. There is 30 days to 
notify.  I  believe  the  rule  says  30  days  to  notify  everyone  that  an 
appeal has been received. The record is kept open for 270 days for 
the  Secretary  to  gather  the  material  that  he  needs,  and  then  he 
must issue a decision within 90 days after that. 

The CHAIRMAN. Unless he decides to add 45 days more. 
Dr. KITSOS. Exactly. But that would—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  The  other  amendment  is  that  the  FERC  record 
be the sole record for the administrative agency proceedings for ap-
plication for authorization of offshore LNG or natural gas pipelines. 
That is highlighting what I have just said. That is the most critical 
problem facing the United States today, is how to get those onshore 
plants—how to get that LNG, natural gas—onshore. And we are to 
see  at  least  a  year  and  a  half  just  on  this  kind  of  decision?  There 
are lots of other decisions that have to be made about the pipelines 
beyond the CZMA hearing. 

So  these  are  going  to  just  pyramid.  It  takes  so  much  time  for 
that,  it  will  take  so  much  time  for  endangered  species,  so  much 
time for whatever else. There are a whole series of things you have 
to  do.  They  told  me  you  have  to  have  71  permits  to  drill  a  well  in 
my State on Federal land. Now, if every one of those agencies takes 
that  year,  I  am  going  to  be  Carl  Hayden’s  age  before  we  even  ap-
prove the first application. 

Dr. KITSOS. Senator, the Department of Commerce and NOAA is 
of course committed to the President’s support for the energy legis-
lation  and  for  streamlining  the  process.  We  believe  that  we  have, 
in the regulatory discussions we have had with the Interior Depart-
ment,  done  a  job  of  addressing  that  and  reducing  the  amount  of 
time that consistency appeals can be issued. 

The CHAIRMAN. How about some immediate finding as to wheth-
er  the  complaint  has  merit?  This  has  no  relationship  at  all  to  the 
kind of hearing that has to be had in the future, which is, does this 
complaint  have  any  merit?  Is  it  something  that  is  within  the  law 
that  you  possibly  could  find  as  a  justification  for  delaying  an  off-
shore gas pipeline or LNG pipeline? 

Why not do that? I think we will have to some day legislate that 
you can not interfere with those, because the future of the country 
depends  upon  energy  and  I  do  not  know  how  we  are  going  to  get 
this  gas  distributed  throughout  the  United  States  if  we  have  to  go 
to Mexico and Canada or Maine to deliver it to Florida or to Wash-
ington State. 

This  hearing  is  a  very  sincere  hearing  to  try  and  find  a  way  to 
pave the way for an agreement with the Energy Committee on how 
to do this. 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Well,  the  consistency  provision  appeal  process  in-
volves  a  private  applicant  bringing  an  appeal  to  the  Secretary  of 
Commerce. The Secretary of Commerce will make a judgment when 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

that is received. It is not an appeal brought by the States, Senator. 
It is an appeal brought in this case by—— 

The CHAIRMAN. I understand that, but anybody can bring it, and 

it triggers at least a year delay under your process. 

Dr.  KITSOS.  It  triggers  a  year  of  a  review  of  the  appeal  of  the 
merits  of  the  case  and  whether  the  Secretary  should  override  the 
State  or  should  uphold  the  State.  That  has  been  the  process  since 
1972  when  the  original  CZMA  was  passed.  It  was  reinforced  by 
some strong amendments in 1990 by Congress and that is the way 
the process works. We believe we can cut down the amount of time 
and  that  is  what  we  have  in  the  potential  rule  that  is  currently 
being considered. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Senator Nelson. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madam Chairman. 
I  would  like  to  ask  Dr.  Cruickshank.  In  the  House  energy  bill  it 
includes  a  provision  that  would  give  the  Secretary  of  the  Interior 
new  authority  to  grant  easements  and  rights-of-way  to  allow  oil 
and gas activities to proceed in an expedited manner. My question 
is, since this is a provision that was not recommended by either the 
U.S.  Ocean  Commission  report  or  the  Pew  Commission  report,  is 
it a provision that the Administration and the Secretary of Interior 
support? 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  Yes,  Senator  Nelson,  the  Administration  does 
support that provision. I would note that the activities foreseen by 
that  provision  are  activities  that  are  not  currently  authorized 
under  any  act,  particularly  to  look  for  offshore  renewable  energy, 
to  allow  support  facilities  for  deepwater  activities  in  the  Gulf  of 
Mexico,  and  to  allow  existing  oil  and  gas  platforms,  which  are  pri-
marily in the Gulf, to be converted for other uses should the agency 
with the underlying authority wish to use that platform as a base. 
All  of  these  activities  will  be  fully  subject  to  the  Coastal  Zone 

Management Act and consistency review. 

Senator NELSON. Right, but it is a change of the existing act and 
the  Administration,  as  you  stated,  does  support  that  change.  Now, 
as I see it it would streamline the permitting process by decreasing 
the input that coastal States would have on the process; is that cor-
rect? 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  I  do  not  see  that,  Senator.  For  most  of  these 
activities  right  now  there  is  no  established  process.  These  are  for 
activities  that  are  not  currently  specifically  authorized  in  law,  and 
again  the  State  would  have  a  role,  both  through  the  CZMA  and 
through  NEPA,  and  our  goal  would  be  to  try  and  operate  the  pro-
gram, much as we do with the sand and gravel program, where we 
would  enter  into  cooperative  agreements  with  States  to  try  and 
work  through  the  issues  that  are  of  concern  to  them  off  their 
shores. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  this  provision  supported  by  the  Adminis-

tration would cut NOAA out of the process, would it not? 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  It  would  not—it  would  not  remove  any  au-

thority that any Federal agency currently has. 

Senator NELSON. And you maintain that this provision would not 
lessen  the  authorities  of  States  to  be  able  to  protect  their  coast-
lines? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Dr. CRUICKSHANK. That is correct. 
Senator NELSON. That is what you are maintaining? 
Dr. CRUICKSHANK. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  Then  why  are  you  proposing  the  change  in  the 

existing law? 

Dr. CRUICKSHANK. Because right now there is no law that specifi-
cally allows—that specifically addresses energy projects other than 
oil  and  gas  exploration  and  development.  And  as  has  been  noted 
both  in  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  report  and  in  the 
President’s  Ocean  Action  Plan,  there  does  need  to  be  some  sort  of 
governance structure over some of the activities that are being pro-
posed for the coastal waters and offshore waters. 

Senator NELSON. Right, so the provision is specifically for oil and 

gas. 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  No.  It  is  aimed  mostly  at  renewable  energy. 
The  only  oil  and  gas  items  that  would  be  covered  is  there  have 
been  requests  to  build  platforms  or  facilities  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico 
to  support  some  of  the  activities  that  are  150,  200  miles  offshore; 
facilities  that  might  house  emergency  medical  facilities,  helicopter 
refueling,  things  like  that;  and  support  activities  that  are  author-
ized under other provisions, other parts of the OCS Lands Act. 

That is the only—where there is a reference to oil and gas in this 
new provision, it is thinking about facilities like that. It would not 
in  any  way  change  the  Outer  Continental  Shelf  Lands  Act  provi-
sions for oil and gas leasing. 

Senator  NELSON.  So  your  testimony  is  that  the  provisions  have 

nothing to do with oil and gas leasing? 

Dr. CRUICKSHANK. That is correct. 
Senator NELSON. On the outer continental shelf. 
All  right.  There  is  another  provision  that  makes  FERC  the  sole 
agency  responsible  for  maintaining  the  record  on  appeal  for  pipe-
line  construction.  This  is  an  activity  that  would  come  under  the 
CZMA  consistency  requirements  and  includes  a  record  with  input 
from the State and the public. Does this provision lessen the State 
and  public  involvement  in  the  process  and  does  it  cut  the  CZMA 
and the Secretary of Commerce out of the process? 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  Senator,  I  am  not  in  a  position  to  speak  for 
FERC  and  I  am  not  well  enough  aware  of  their  programs.  I  would 
say  from  the  Department  of  the  Interior’s  perspective  we  feel  that 
the issues can be dealt with through the rulemaking process, as Dr. 
Kitsos has discussed. 

Senator  SNOWE.  To  follow  up  on  that  question  that  Senator  Nel-
son  posed  on  restricting  the  gas  projects  appeals  to  the  FERC 
record  of  information,  what  information  would  be—is  it  so  open- 
ended now that it becomes burdensome? 

Dr.  CRUICKSHANK.  Again,  I  cannot  speak  for  the  FERC  process. 
FERC  is  not  part  of  the  Department  of  the  Interior  and  I  simply 
do  not  have  the  background  to  be  able  to  talk  about  how  FERC 
conducts their business. 

Senator SNOWE. But that is central to this program and its reau-
thorization. It is one of the other impediments to reauthorizing the 
Coastal  Zone  Management  Act,  as  one  of  the  issues  that  is  prob-
ably going to be pending in the energy markup. 

Dr. Kitsos, can you speak to that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Carefully.  There  is  an  issue  in  the  energy  bill,  Sen-
ator, regarding the record that would be available to the Secretary 
of  Commerce  for  consistency  appeals,  the  discussion  that  Senator 
Stevens  and  I  just  had.  There  is  a  provision  that  would  limit  that 
record to just the FERC record. 

The  Department  of  Commerce  and  NOAA  is  concerned  about 
that because we believe the Secretary of Commerce needs to make 
a  consistency  decision  based  on  a  broader  record  based  on  coastal 
zone  management  issues  and  principles  and  the  enforceable  poli-
cies  of  the  States,  as  CSO  has  just  testified.  The  FERC  record  is 
important  for  FERC.  The  offshore  oil  and  gas  record  is  important 
to the Secretary of the Interior. But the Secretary of Commerce has 
other  grounds  based  on  statutory  language  on  which  he  or  she 
must  make  a  decision  about  an  appeal,  whether  to  override  or 
whether  to  sustain.  We  are  concerned  about  limiting  that  record. 

Senator SNOWE. Ms. Cooksey? 
Ms. COOKSEY. I would like to reiterate that point. You are asking 
an excellent question that I also would like the answer to. I do not 
know  what  is  going  to  be  required  to  be  in  that  record  and  that 
is a concern. We do not know what the decision will be made upon. 
Will it be about coastal effects, coastal economy, coastal resources? 

The CHAIRMAN. Could I interject here? 
Senator SNOWE. You may, Chairman Stevens. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Why  could  not  these  two  proceedings  be  joined? 
Why do we have to have these things seriatim? You have an appli-
cation  to  one  agency,  we  go  through  a  year,  then  it  has  to  go  to 
another  agency  for  a  year,  then  we  will  probably  have  a  NEPA 
hearing  after  that.  Why  can  we  not  have  one-stop  shopping  on 
something that is so essential to the future of the country? 

We are not talking about leasing. We are talking about facilities, 
facilities  to  bring  onshore  energy.  Now,  I  just  cannot  understand 
why each Department and each agency wants its full time one after 
the other. I think once an application is filed with FERC we should 
tell them: You notify Interior, you notify Commerce, you notify any-
one  who  has  got  a  law  that  might  be  applicable  to  this,  and  you 
join together and you have a hearing and you make a decision. And 
that  will  be  reviewable  by  a  court  on  an  emergency  basis  if  nec-
essary. 

This  has  to  be  done.  It  will  take  6  years  to  build  those  facilities 

and they have to be ready by 2015. I just do not understand it. 

Ms.  Cooksey,  with  due  respect,  there  has  to  be  some  way  to  join 

these things together. 

Ms.  COOKSEY.  Senator  Stevens,  I  agree  with  you.  I  think  that 
FERC  should  have  started  this  process  years  ago  and  I  think  that 
they should have looked at it minimally on a regional level. Where 
is  the  place  to  site  these?  Which  States  want  these?  Where  will  it 
have the least amount of impact? 

I have not seen that. It is a patchwork quilt. Then an application 
lands on my desk with an expedited review and it becomes burden-
some upon the States to get all that information together. I believe 
the  Federal  Government  has  dropped  the  ball  on  this,  not  the 
States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  what  should  be  the  requirement  on  the 
Federal Government? What could we do differently that would help 
that situation? 

Ms. COOKSEY. Again, in my view I believe it is the Federal Gov-
ernment’s  role  to  take  a  look  nationwide.  Where  should  these  be 
sited? 

Senator  SNOWE.  That  is  a  difficult  question,  given  the  fact  that 

you are talking about States’ rights. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes, the basic problem is—I agree with the chair-

man. 

Ms.  COOKSEY.  That  would  be  part  of—that  would  be  included  in 
the analysis. The State of Delaware has a prohibition of certain fa-
cilities  in  certain  areas,  and  FERC  should  have  looked  at  that 
ahead of time in my view. 

Senator SNOWE. But is there not a better way? You really would 
be  running  roughshod  over  States’  rights—I  do  not  think  that 
would  work  well  in  my  State.  But  is  there  not  another  way  of  ad-
dressing  the  problems  that  Chairman  Stevens  is  talking  about? 
You have a sort of a linear, consecutive approach, rather than hav-
ing  an  overarching  one-stop  shopping  regulatory  process  with  re-
spect to the consideration of these decisions and the appeal process. 
Is  there  a  way  of  doing  that,  Dr.  Kitsos—a  way  so  that  you  are 

considering everything? 

Dr. KITSOS. I think there is a way, Senator, for the Federal fam-
ily to work more concurrently, along the lines of what Senator Ste-
vens has indicated. 

The CHAIRMAN. I suggest that as chairman I ask Senator Domen-
ici for consultation between the two committees and let us just get 
together.  Our  two  committees  have  the  jurisdiction  over  what  is 
being asked and I think we should not fight. We should find a way 
to  expedite  this  and  satisfy  the  requirements  of  having  some  sort 
of right to appeal on consistency, but get it done. 

Dr.  KITSOS.  I  think  that  is  possible,  Senator.  Our  concern  is  to 
make  sure  that  the  States’  rights  are  protected  under  the  CZMA, 
but that there is a way to do this expeditiously. 

Senator SNOWE. I could not agree with you more. 
Yes, Senator Nelson, any final questions? 
Senator NELSON. Dr. Kitsos, in your prepared testimony you note 
that  CMZA—CZMA  has  been  successful  and  that  States  have  con-
curred  with  95  percent  of  the  Federal  actions  reviewed.  Do  you 
think the Secretary of Commerce has done a good job balancing the 
Nation’s  interests  with  the  coastal  States’  management  programs 
in the appeals process? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  I  think  the  Secretaries  of  Commerce  throughout  the 

years have done a wonderful job, Senator, in balancing. 

Senator  NELSON.  So  you  do  not  think  that  taking  this  responsi-
bility  away  from  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to  give  to  the  Sec-
retary of the Interior is a good idea, do you? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  We  believe  that  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  should 
retain  the  appeal  authority  under  the  original  legislation  that  has 
been supported for about 33 years by the Congress. The CZMA pro-
gram is a Department of Commerce NOAA program and, as I indi-
cated  in  my  earlier  response,  the  basis  of  decisions  about  appeals 
are  particular  to  the  question  of—the  principles  and  the  purposes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

and the policies of coastal zone management. Giving that authority 
to other secretaries would lose expertise in the history of the devel-
opment  of  the  CZM  program  in  the  Department  of  Commerce.  We 
believe  that  an  objective  third  party  like  the  Secretary  of  Com-
merce should be making that decision on appeals that come to him 
or her. 

I  would  note,  though,  that  many  appeals  do  not  come.  They  are 
worked  out  ahead  of  time,  and  those  that  are  eventually—most 
consistency issues are resolved without having to appeal. 

Senator  NELSON.  So  you  believe  that  a  consistency  provision,  a 
Federal  consistency  provision,  is  an  important  part  of  the  CZMA 
and  it  is  an  important  tool  for  States  to  manage  their  coastlines? 
Dr. KITSOS. It is an extremely important tool for the States. I be-
lieve  CSO  would  support  that  statement.  CZMA  is  basically  a  pro-
gram  that  gives  States—is  a  voluntary  program  that  encourages 
States to participate based on two things. One is a modest amount 
of  money  to  carry  out  their  program.  Second  is  the  authority  they 
get under Federal consistency. 

As a result, almost all States now are participants. 
Senator  NELSON.  You  would  testify  that  the  Federal  consistency 
provision is an important tool because it allows for broad definition 
on  what  effects  on  land,  water,  natural  resources  triggers  the 
CZMA consistency determination; is that correct? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  It  gives  States  the  opportunity  to  declare  to  Federal 
agencies who are about to take an action or issue a permit or a li-
cense that the actions are consistent or are not consistent with the 
enforceable policies of a State program. That has been a basic prin-
ciple  of  CZMA  from  the  very  beginning.  We  think  it  is  important. 
Senator NELSON. And effects are not just environmental, but also 

involve effects on coastal uses; is that correct? 

Dr. KITSOS. That is correct. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  indirect  effects  as  well  as  direct  effects 
that are reasonably foreseeable trigger consistency determinations; 
is that correct? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  That  is  also  correct,  and  that  is  based  on  amend-
ments  made  in  1990  to  the  CZMA  to  clarify  that  issue.  What  you 
have just said is correct. 

Senator  NELSON.  Then  is  it  true  that  limiting  the  geographic 
scope  of  a  State’s  Federal  consistency  jurisdiction  would  weaken  a 
State’s current ability under the consistency provision? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Well,  this  is  a  very  tricky  issue,  Senator.  There  are 
safeguards  in  NOAA’s  current  regulations  that  would  constrain  a 
State from going too far afield from making consistency claims. But 
Congress did make it clear in 1990 that the effects test is the basis 
on which consistency should be triggered, and an action, no matter 
where  it  may  occur,  if  it  affects  the  land  and  water  use  and  the 
natural  resources  of  the  coastal  zone,  is  subject  to  the  consistency 
review  of  that  State.  That  has  been  a  principle  that  has  been  in 
effect  for  a  long  time,  the  subject  of  the  rulemaking  by  NOAA  in 
2000,  and  also  the  basis  on  which  the  current  negotiations  for  a 
change to the rule is based. 

Senator  NELSON.  You  and  I  were  a  member  of  the  House  when 

we passed that 1990 act. 

Senator SNOWE. That is right. Yes, a few years ago. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

The CHAIRMAN. If I could enter into that just one comment, I was 
a member over here, too. But our understanding was just what Dr. 
Kitsos  just  said,  that  we  would  not  have  a  situation  where  Rhode 
Island or Massachusetts could have an input in what happened off 
Maine. 

Dr.  KITSOS.  Well,  there  is  an  interstate  consistency  regulation 
that  NOAA  had  promulgated  some  years  ago  for  dealing  with  ac-
tivities  in  the  coastal  zone  of  one  State  vis-a`-vis  the  coastal  zone 
of  another  State.  That  is  part  of  the  development  of  the  rules  and 
regulations. 

There  is  also  additionally  the  issue  of  the  effects  of  activities  in 
Federal  waters  and  that  is  the  consistency  issue,  Senator.  That  is 
the  1990  amendments  that  I  referred  to  before,  and  if  there  is  an 
effect—if  there  is  activity  off  of  State  A  that  has  an  effect  on  the 
land and water uses of State B in their coastal zone, State B would 
have some authority to exercise consistency. 

There  are  details  that  I  would  like  to  provide  you  for  the  record 
that  constrain  that  to  some  extent.  States  have  to  declare  geo-
graphic  locations  where  activities  are  subject  to  consistency,  but 
the basic principle of where is the effect still obtains. 

Senator NELSON. Madam Chairman, as a follow-up to that, there-
fore,  on  the  basis  of  what  you  just  said,  if  the  State  of  Louisiana 
or  the  State  of  Mississippi  or  Alabama  were  to  redraw  their  lines 
as  to  the  oil  and  gas  drilling  so  that  in  fact  it  was  off  the  coast  of 
Florida—— 

The CHAIRMAN. How far off? 
Senator  NELSON.—therefore  that  would  have  or  trigger  the  con-

sistency requirement of State A and B that you just outlined? 

Dr.  KITSOS.  I  do  not  think  the  States  of  Louisiana  and  Alabama 

could redraw their lines. 

ergy Committee. 

Senator NELSON. Well, they are going to try tomorrow in the En-

The CHAIRMAN. Again, how far are you talking about? 
Senator NELSON. We will see how they draw the lines. 
The CHAIRMAN. How far off the shore does Florida claim? 
Senator NELSON. I think what you are going to see is the prohibi-
tion  that  has  been  worked  out  between  the  Federal  Government 
and the Governor of Florida on Lease Sale 181, that was 6 million 
acres proposed for lease and the Governor of Florida got into it and 
constricted  it  back  to  1.5  million  acres  so  that  it  was  off  of  Ala-
bama,  not  off  of  Florida,  I  think  you  are  going  to  see  that  at-
tempted  to  be  redrawn  tomorrow  in  the  Senate  Energy  Committee 
by Senator Landrieu’s amendment. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Just  a  couple  points  and  then  Senator  Lauten-

berg is here. 

On  these  limits  on  this  Federal  appeals  process  and  the  consist-
ency and the comment period, I have heard in some cases—I do not 
know if it was in the House legislation—that these limits would be 
retroactive,  applying  to  appeals  made  before  and  after  enactment 
of the legislation. 

Dr. KITSOS. I am not familiar with all the details in H.R.—— 
Senator  SNOWE.  How  onerous  would  that  be,  above  and  beyond 
everything else, to limit the comment period? And to make it retro-
active to other appeals? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Dr.  KITSOS.  I  think  that  would  be  a  difficult  process  for  the  De-

45 

partment to adhere to. 

Senator  SNOWE.  One  other  question.  On  the  effects  test,  is  it 
clarifying what activities trigger consistency? Has that been a hin-
drance at all in this process? 

Dr. KITSOS. Well, I think you may hear some witnesses following 
us  that  will  argue  that  it  has  not  been  very  helpful.  On  behalf  of 
the  Department,  I  think  it  helped  to  clarify  what  activities  trigger 
consistency.  Prior  to  1990  there  was  a  phrase  in  the  law  that  said 
‘‘activities  that  directly  affect  the  coastal  zone’’  and  that  was  sub-
ject  to  some  dispute.  That  helped  clarify  that,  the  1990  amend-
ments helped clarify that particular issue. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks,  Madam  Chairman.  I  am  going  to 
use  my  time  to  just  make  my  statement  and  I  assume  that  the 
record will be kept open long enough for us to submit questions in 
writing. I thank you for holding this hearing. 

People  might  not  think  that  Maine  and  New  Jersey  have  much 
in  common.  Apparently  Louisiana  and  Florida  and  Alabama  have 
a  lot  in  common  when  it  comes  to  getting  out  there  and  poking 
holes in the seabase, looking for oil, et cetera. 

We  insist  that  proper  management  of  the  coastal  area  is  vitally 
important.  I  know  that  it  is  in  Maine  and  so  it  is  in  New  Jersey. 
Coastal  areas  for  us  provide  economic  activity,  jobs  from  tourism 
to fishing, and our shore accounts for 70 percent of my State’s $30 
billion tourist industry. The U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy esti-
mates  that  economic  activity  in  our  Nation’s  oceans  and  along  our 
coastline  accounts  for  $1  trillion  a  year  and  that  is  10  percent  of 
our Nation’s GDP. 

Coastal  economies  are  booming.  Try  and  get  your  car  through 
some  of  these  communities  and  you  will  find  out  how  booming  it 
is.  The  population  is  skyrocketing  in  our  coastal  areas.  Over  the 
next 7 years, population growth in my State, the most densely pop-
ulated  State  in  the  Union,  in  four  coastal  counties  is  projected  to 
be about 44 percent greater than the State as a whole. 

This coastal population explosion is not unique to New Jersey. 54 
percent  of  all  Americans  now  live  in  772  coastal  counties  adjacent 
to our Nation’s shorelines. In 20 years nearly 75 percent of Ameri-
cans are expected to live in coastal counties. As our population be-
comes  more  concentrated  along  the  coastlines,  we  exert  new  pres-
sures on our fragile coastal environment and our resources. Almost 
every  day  we  hear  now  of  strange  algae  blooms  in  our  bays,  our 
fish  kills,  our  houses  plunging  into  the  sea  from  an  eroding  beach. 
So I do not think Congress has any option but to strengthen the 
Coastal  Zone  Management  Act.  The  act  has  played  an  important 
role  in  protecting  our  coastlines.  In  my  State,  for  example,  it  has 
enabled  the  development  of  the  Jacques  Cousteau  National  Estua-
rine  Research  Reserve  System,  which  has  been  extremely  produc-
tive  in  terms  of  coastal  research  and  monitoring  the  coastal  envi-
ronment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

So Senator Snowe’s CZMA reauthorization bill increases funding 
for coastal management plans and I applaud that. I also hope that 
the  funding  formula  will  be  revised  to  reflect  coastal  population 
growth. We have got to protect the rights of States regarding what 
happens  in  their  offshore  areas,  especially  in  the  outer  continental 
shelf. 

So,  Madam  Chairman,  I  thank  you  for  holding  the  hearing  and 

I look forward to hearing the panel. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Madame Chairman, thank you for convening this hearing on this important issue. 
While  people  might  not  normally  think  that  Maine  and  New  Jersey  have  much 
in common, we realize that the proper management of coastal areas is vitally impor-
tant to both our home states. 

Coastal areas provide economic activity and jobs, from tourism to fishing to trade. 
The  New  Jersey  shore  accounts  for  70  percent  of  my  state’s  $30  billion  dollar  tour-
ism industry. 

The U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy estimates that economic activity in our na-
tion’s  oceans  and  along  our  coastlines  accounts  for  one  trillion  dollars  a  year—ten 
percent of our nation’s GDP. Coastal economies are booming—and the population in 
our  coastal  areas  is  skyrocketing.  Over  the  next  seven  years,  population  growth  in 
New  Jersey’s  four  coastal  counties  is  projected  to  be  about  44  percent  greater  than 
in the state as a whole. 

This  coastal  population  explosion  is  not  unique  to  New  Jersey.  Fifty-four  percent 
of all Americans now live in 772 coastal counties adjacent to our nation’s shorelines. 
In 20 years, nearly 75 percent of Americans are expected to live in coastal counties. 
As  our  population  becomes  more  concentrated  along  our  coastlines,  we  exert  new 
pressures  on  our  fragile  coastal  environment  and  resources.  Almost  every  day  we 
hear  of  strange  algae  blooms  in  our  bays,  or  fish  kills,  or  houses  plunging  into  the 
sea from an eroding beach. 

I believe Congress has no option but to strengthen the Coastal Zone Management 
Act  (CZMA).  The  CZMA  has  played  an  important  role  in  protecting  our  coastlines. 
In  my  state,  for  example,  it  has  enabled  the  development  of  the  Jacques  Cousteau 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  system,  which  has  been  extremely  productive 
in terms of coastal research and monitoring the coastal environment. 

Senator  Snowe’s  CZMA  reauthorization  bill  increases  funding  for  coastal  zone 
management  plans,  which  I  applaud.  I  also  hope  that  the  funding  formula  will  be 
revised to reflect coastal population growth. We also must protect the rights of states 
regarding  what  happens  in  their  offshore  areas.  especially  the  outer  continental 
shelf. 

Thank you Madame Chairman. I look forward to the testimony. 

Senator SNOWE. I thank you, Senator Lautenberg, and thank you 

as well for supporting the legislation. I appreciate it. 

I  also  thank  the  witnesses.  Our  debate  and  discussion  on  these 
issues will continue. We appreciate your input. We will be following 
up on many of these issues that ultimately could determine wheth-
er or not we can get this reauthorized as we continue. I thank you. 

Ms. COOKSEY. Thank you for inviting us. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Our second panel: Ms. Sarah Chasis, Director of the Natural Re-
sources  Defense  Council  Water  and  Coastal  Program;  Tom  Fry, 
President  of  the  National  Ocean  Industries  Association;  Mr.  Bill 
Jeffress,  Director  of  the  Office  of  Project  Management  and  Permit-
ting  in  the  Alaska  Department  of  Natural  Resources;  and  Dr.  Don 
Hudson,  Chair-elect  of  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Council  on  the  Marine 
Environment. Welcome. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

I welcome all of our panelists and I would ask you to summarize 
your  statements.  We  will  include  your  entire  statement  in  the 
record,  and  we  will  begin  with  you,  Ms.  Chasis.  Thank  you  for 
being here. 

STATEMENT OF SARAH CHASIS, DIRECTOR, 

WATER AND COASTAL PROGRAM, 

NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

Ms.  CHASIS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Snowe,  and  thank 
you also to Senator Stevens and Senator Lautenberg. We know how 
incredibly busy you all are and we very much appreciate your tak-
ing  the  time  to  hold  this  hearing  and  consider  reauthorization  of 
the Coastal Zone Management Act. 

I  am  testifying  on  behalf  of  NRDC,  the  Natural  Resources  De-
fense Council, today. NRDC is very supportive of your bill, Senator 
Snowe, S. 360. We think it is important for this committee to reau-
thorize  and  strengthen  the  CZMA,  as  that  bill  would  do.  We  are 
seeing  increasing  pressures  on  our  Nation’s  coastal  resources  and 
the CZMA provides a valuable framework for addressing both ongo-
ing  and  emerging  issues  facing  the  coastal  regions  of  the  country. 
The  Federal  Government  provides  funding,  oversight,  and  the 
promise of Federal consistency. In exchange, the States voluntarily 
develop  and  implement  Federally  approved  programs  that  address 
important issues facing the coastal zone, an area of recognized na-
tional importance both ecologically and economically. 

The  Pew  Ocean  Commission,  on  which  NRDC’s  President  John 
Adams  served  and  on  which  Pat  White  from  your  State,  Senator 
Snowe, also served, a lobster fisherman, recognized the importance 
of the CZMA and recommended that the act be expanded to encour-
age  coastal  habitat  protection  and  more  active  State  and  local 
growth  management  efforts.  We  are  pleased  to  see  that  S.  360  re-
sponds to both of these recommendations. 

The  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  recommended  that  Con-
gress reauthorize the CZMA to strengthen the planning and coordi-
nation  capabilities  of  the  States  and  enable  them  to  incorporate  a 
coastal  watershed  focus  and  more  effectively  manage  growth. 
Again, S. 360 would address many of these recommendations. 

The  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  also  states  its  support 

for reauthorization of the CZMA. 

The CHAIRMAN. Would you pull that mike up just a little? 
Ms.  CHASIS.  Sorry,  Senator  Stevens.  You  cannot  hear  me?  I  will 

try to speak more loudly. 

I  would  like  to  turn  my  brief  oral  remarks  to  concerns  we  have 
with  various  legislative  proposals  not  included  in  S.  360  that  are 
currently  under  consideration  by  Congress  and  that,  if  adopted, 
would  substantially  weaken  a  key  element  of  the  CZMA,  the  Fed-
eral  consistency  requirements.  It  is  noteworthy  that  neither  the 
Pew Oceans Commission nor the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy 
recommended  altering  the  Federal  consistency  provisions  of  the 
CZMA. Indeed, the U.S. Commission specifically said, ‘‘Existing in-
centives  for  State  participation,  Federal  funding  and  Federal  con-
sistency authority, should remain.’’ 

The National Governors Association recently took a strong stand 
in  support  of  retaining  the  current  Federal  consistency  provisions, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

and  in  their  revised  policy  statement  they  said  the  following:  ‘‘The 
Governors oppose any legislation or rulemaking that might weaken 
the  CZMA  requirements  for  coordination  and  consistency,  such  as 
limiting the geographic scope of the States’ Federal consistency ju-
risdiction, limiting the ability to receive and analyze adequate envi-
ronmental data and information, or limiting the development of the 
appeals record in a manner that would place States at a disadvan-
tage or discourage negotiated resolution of appeals.’’ 

Yet many of the legislative proposals would do exactly this. They 
would limit the geographic scope of the States’ Federal consistency 
jurisdiction, for example by taking away the rights of States to con-
sistency review for lease sales more than 20 miles from the State’s 
coastal  zone.  They  would  limit  the  ability  to  receive  and  analyze 
adequate  environmental  data  or  information,  for  example  by  put-
ting  FERC  in  charge  of  setting  a  mandatory  timetable  for  comple-
tion of all Federal and State reviews, including consistency reviews, 
and giving one agency, such as FERC, the exclusive charge of com-
piling a single administrative record for all Federal and State deci-
sions. 

They  would  limit  the  development  of  the  appeals  record  in  a 
manner  that  would  place  States  at  a  disadvantage  or  discourage 
negotiated  resolution  of  appeals,  for  example  by  setting  unreason-
able  timeframes  that  may  preclude  consideration  of  relevant  envi-
ronmental  information  in  environmental  impact  statements  or  in 
biological opinions under the Endangered Species Act. 

According to NOAA, in the history of the CZMA there have been 
only 14 instances where the oil and gas industry appealed a State’s 
Federal consistency objection to the Secretary of Commerce and the 
Secretary  issued  a  decision.  Of  these  14  cases,  there  were  7  deci-
sions  to  override  the  State’s  objections,  7  decisions  not  to  override. 
According  to  NOAA,  and  I  quote:  ‘‘The  record  shows  that  energy 
development  continues  to  occur  while  reasonable  State  review  en-
sures that the CZMA objectives have been met.’’ 

We  oppose  legislation  that  would  weaken  the  consistency  provi-
sions  of  the  CZMA  and  urge  members  of  this  committee  to  ensure 
that such legislation is not enacted. 

Thank  you  very  much  and  I  would  be  happy  to  entertain  ques-

tions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Chasis follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SARAH CHASIS, DIRECTOR, WATER AND COASTAL PROGRAM, 

NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

Thank  you  for  this  invitation  to  testify  regarding  S.  360,  the  ‘‘Coastal  Zone  En-
hancement  Reauthorization  Act  of  2005.’’  This  testimony  is  submitted  on  behalf  of 
the Natural Resources Defense Council (NRDC). NRDC is a national nonprofit orga-
nization  with  over  550,000  members,  dedicated  to  protecting  natural  resources  and 
improving  the  quality  of  the  human  environment.  I  am  a  senior  attorney  with 
NRDC and Director of NRDC’s Water and Coastal Program. 
Introduction: Support for S. 360 

NRDC  has  been  involved  with  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA)  since 
the mid-1970s. During this time, we have worked with NOAA, the states and other 
environmental groups on the development and implementation of state coastal zone 
management  programs.  We  have  supported  reauthorization  and  strengthening  of 
the  Act.  Following  the  1990  amendments  to  the  CZMA,  we  participated  in  the  im-
plementation  of  the  Coastal  Nonpoint  Pollution  Control  Program—because  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

need for enhanced control over polluted runoff into coastal waters—and in the revi-
sion of the Federal consistency regulations to conform to the 1990 amendments. 

NRDC  strongly  supports  passage  of  S.  360.  This  bill  would  reauthorize  and 
strengthen  the  CZMA  at  a  time  of  increasing  pressure  on  our  nation’s  coastal  re-
sources. The CZMA provides a valuable framework for addressing both ongoing and 
emerging issues facing the coastal regions of our country. The Act represents a valu-
able partnership between the Federal Government and the states: the Federal Gov-
ernment  provides  funding,  oversight  and  the  promise  of  Federal  consistency;  in  ex-
change, the states voluntarily develop and implement Federally approved programs 
that  address  important  issues  facing  the  coastal  zone—an  area  of  national  impor-
tance,  both  ecologically  and  economically.  We  believe  continuation  of  this  partner-
ship is important to the Nation and that the Act should be reauthorized. 
Two  Ocean  Commissions  and  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  all 

Support Reauthorization of the CZMA 

The Pew Oceans Commission (America’s Living Oceans: Charting a Course for Sea 
Change,  May  2003),  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  (An  Ocean  Blueprint  for 
the  21st  Century,  September  2004)  and  the  President  (U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan)  all 
have supported reauthorization of the CZMA. 

The Pew Ocean Commission, on which NRDC’s President John Adams served, rec-
ognized  the  importance  of  the  CZMA  and  recommended  that  the  Act  be  expanded 
to  include  a  mandate  for  coastal  habitat  protection.  POC  Report  at  118–119.  The 
Commission  also  recommended  encouraging  more  active  state  and  local  growth- 
management efforts, as well as coordination of efforts among local jurisdictions and 
adjacent  states  to  ensure  a  rational  regional  approach.  POC  Report  at  119.  S.  360 
responds to both of these recommendations. It encourages a focus on coastal habitat 
protection  and  restoration  in  Section  8  of  the  bill  (amending  Section  306A,  the 
Coastal  Resource  Improvement  Program).  In  Section  11,  S.  360  establishes  a  whole 
new  program  (Section  309A  of  the  CZMA)  to  provide  coastal  community  grants  to 
encourage  state  and  local  communities  to,  among  other  things,  assess  and  manage 
growth,  public  infrastructure  and  open  space  needs  in  order  to  provide  for  sustain-
able growth, resource protection and community revitalization. 

The  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  recommended  that  Congress  reauthorize 
the CZMA to strengthen the planning and coordination capabilities of the states and 
enable  them  to  incorporate  a  coastal  watershed  focus  and  more  effectively  manage 
growth. To this end, the U.S. Commission recommended including requirements for 
periodic resource assessments by each state, the development by each state of meas-
urable goals and performance standards, improved program evaluations to measure 
state  progress  against  these  goals  and  standards,  incentives  for  good  performance 
and  disincentives  for  inaction  and  expansion  of  state  boundaries  to  include  coastal 
watersheds.  U.S.  COP  Report  at  154–155.  The  Commission  also  recommended 
amending the Act to provide better financial, technical, and institutional support for 
watershed management activities. U.S. COP Report at 160. S. 360 responds to some, 
though  not  all,  of  these  recommendations.  It  would  be  worthwhile  for  this  Com-
mittee to consider incorporating more of these recommendations in S. 360. 

The President’s U.S. Ocean Action Plan also states its support for reauthorization 

of the CZMA. Plan at 27. 
Additional Comments on S. 360 

We are generally supportive of language that encourages states to devote a mean-
ingful  portion  of  their  CZM  money  to  curbing  polluted  runoff  into  coastal  waters. 
In the past, we have supported having a specific percentage of the Section 306/306A/ 
309  grant  money  spent  on  implementation  of  the  Coastal  Nonpoint  Pollution  Pro-
gram  in  order  to  achieve  needed  progress  in  addressing  water  quality.  We  regret 
that  there  is  nothing  requiring  this  in  S.  380.  However,  we  do  note  and  are  sup-
portive of language in Section 17 of S. 380 that would ensure that at least of portion 
of the new coastal community grants is spent on implementation of approved coastal 
nonpoint  pollution  control  strategies  and  measures.  (We  recommend  that  it  should 
be made clear that a state may spend more on these strategies should it so desire.) 
We strongly recommend that more money be provided to the states for implementa-
tion of the important Coastal Nonpoint Pollution Control Program. 
Concerns With Respect to Other Legislation 

We  are  very  concerned  about  various  legislative  proposals—not  included  in  S. 
360—that  are  currently  under  consideration  that,  if  adopted,  would  substantially 
weaken  a  key  element  of  the  CZMA,  the  Federal  consistency  requirements.  There 
are  various  proposals  now  before  Congress  to  modify  the  Federal  consistency  ap-
peals  process  and/or  to  limit  the  geographic  scope  of  the  consistency  requirement 
(see, for example, S. 726 and H.R. 6). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

It  is  noteworthy  that  neither  the  Pew  Ocean  Commission  nor  the  U.S.  Commis-
sion  on  Ocean  Policy  recommended  altering  the  Federal  consistency  provisions  of 
the  CZMA.  Indeed,  the  U.S.  Commission  specifically  said:  ‘‘Existing  incentives  for 
state  participation—Federal  funding  and  Federal  consistency  authority—should 
remain*.’’ U.S. COP Report at 155. 

The  National  Governors  Association  (NGA)  recently  took  a  strong  stand  in  sup-
port of retaining the current Federal consistency provisions. NGA’s recently revised 
ocean-related  policy  Ocean  and  Coastal  Zone  Management  (transmitted  to  the 
Chairman and Ranking Member of this Committee on March 18, 2005) states that: 
‘‘The  Governors  urge  Congress  to  retain  all  provisions  of  the  act  that  ensure  all 
Federal  activities  within  or  outside  the  coastal  zone  that  may  affect  the  coastal  zone 
are  subject  to  the  consistency  review  process.  The  Governors  firmly  believe  that  all 
Federal  actions  in  the  coastal  zone—or  affecting  any  natural  resources,  land  uses, 
or  water  uses  in  the  coastal  zone—should  be  fully  consistent  with  approved  coastal 
zone management plans. Consultation with states should begin early in the permit-
ting and environmental impact assessment process. The Governors oppose any legis-
lation  or  rulemaking  that  might  weaken  the  CZMA  requirements  for  coordination 
and consistency, such as: 

• limiting the geographic scope of the states’ Federal consistency jurisdiction; 
• limiting the ability to receive and analyze adequate environmental data and in-
• limiting  the  development  of  the  appeals  record  in  a  manner  that  would  place 

formation; or 

states at a disadvantage or discourage negotiated resolution of appeals.’’ 

NGA  Ocean  and  Coastal  Zone  Management  Policy  Position  10.4.3.  (Emphasis 

added). 

Yet many of the legislative proposals would do exactly what the Governors oppose: 
limit  the  geographic  scope  of  the  states’  Federal  consistency  jurisdiction  (for  exam-
ple,  by  taking  away  the  rights  of  states  to  consistency  review  for  lease  sales  more 
than 20 miles from the state’s coastal zone); limit the ability to receive and analyze 
adequate  environmental  data  or  information  (for  example,  by  putting  FERC  in 
charge  of  setting  the  mandatory  timetable  for  completion  of  all  Federal  and  state 
reviews,  including  consistency  reviews,  and  giving  one  agency,  such  as  FERC  or 
MMS,  the  exclusive  charge  of  compiling  a  single  administrative  record  for  all  Fed-
eral and state decisions); and limit the development of the appeals record in a man-
ner  that  would  place  states  at  a  disadvantage  or  discourage  negotiated  resolution 
of  appeals  (for  example,  by  setting  unreasonable  timeframes  for  appeal  decisions 
that  may  preclude  consideration  of  relevant  environmental  information  in  EIS’s  or 
Biological  Opinions  under  the  Endangered  Species  Act,  or  putting  FERC  in  charge 
of compiling the record). 

According  to  NOAA,  in  the  history  of  the  CZMA,  there  have  been  only  14  in-
stances where the oil and gas industry appealed a State’s Federal Consistency objec-
tion to the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary issued a decision. Of these 14 
cases,  there  were  7  decisions  to  override  the  State’s  objection,  7  decisions  not  to 
override  the  State.  ‘‘The  record  shows  that  energy  development  continues  to  occur, 
while  reasonable  State  review  ensures  that  the  CZMA  objectives  have  been  met.’’ 
See 67 Federal Register 44409 (July 2, 2002). 

We  strongly  oppose  legislation  that  would  weaken  the  consistency  provisions  of 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  ques-

the CZMA. 

tions that you may have. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Mr. Fry. 

STATEMENT OF TOM FRY, PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL OCEAN INDUSTRIES ASSOCIATION 

Mr. FRY. Thank you very much, Madam Chairman. It is a pleas-
ure  to  be  back  with  you  again.  Senator  Stevens,  nice  to  be  with 
you, and Senator Lautenberg. Thank you all for being here. 

My  name  is  Tom  Fry.  I  am  the  President  of  the  National  Ocean 
Industries  Association.  I  am  here  on  behalf  of  that  association.  In 
addition, I am here on behalf of the American Petroleum Institute, 
the Domestic Petroleum Council, the Independent Petroleum Asso-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

ciation  of  America,  the  International  Association  of  Drilling  Con-
tractors, the Natural Gas Supply Association, and the U.S. Oil and 
Gas Association. I think I am out of time now. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  FRY.  What  that  group  is  is  all  of  the  trade  associations  who 
represent  folks  in  the  oil  and  gas  industry.  Our  association  is 
uniquely  positioned  to  talk  about  offshore  in  that  our  membership 
is  made  up  of  people  who  work  only  in  the  offshore.  It  is  not  only 
producing  companies;  the  drilling  contractors,  the  service  compa-
nies,  construction  companies,  shippers,  the  geophysical  companies, 
supply  companies,  and  even  professionals,  lawyers  and  account-
ants.  So  I  am  here  today  on  behalf  of  all  of  those  different  groups. 
First,  Madam  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  say  that  we  do  support 
the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act.  The  tenets  of  the  act,  to  sup-
port  a  healthy  and  vibrant  coastal  zone,  are  very  important  to  us 
and  dovetail  very  nicely  with  our  desire  to  produce  energy  for  the 
Nation in a safe and environmental way. However, there have been 
a few—we think—unintended consequences of the Act. Outlined in 
my testimony are some technical changes that we think would help 
improve  the  ability  of  the  Act  to  respond  to  the  needs  of  the  coun-
try,  both  the  States  and  the  needs  of  the  country  from  an  energy 
standpoint. 

As  has  been  mentioned  before  in  this  hearing,  there  has  been  a 
lot  of  talk  about  the  number  of  appeals  that  have  taken  place  in 
the  past.  We  readily  acknowledge  that  in  most  cases  the  consist-
ency  provisions  work  very  well  in  those  States  where  oil  and  gas 
activity  already  occurs.  We  also  are  not  here  today  to  argue  about 
whether  or  not  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  or  Interior  or  whoever 
makes the final decision, what decision they should make on coast-
al  zone  management  appeals.  That  is  a  decision  that  has  to  be 
made by those individuals. 

What  we  are  asking  for  is  some  certainty  to  the  process.  We 
would  like  to  have  the  process  come  to  a  conclusion.  As  has  been 
pointed  out,  there  is  legislation  that  talks  about  a  certain  number 
of  days.  There  is  proposed  legislation  talking  about  the  certain 
number of days. The problem has been that the record never closes 
and  so  we  never  get  to  those  days  running.  Or  if  those  days  are 
running,  somebody  puts  a  stop  on  those  days  running,  saying  we 
need additional information. 

That  is  what  has  prevented  decisions  from  being  made.  It  has 
run  across  administrations.  The  last  appeal  sat  in  the  Clinton  Ad-
ministration  and  in  the  Bush  Administration  for  over  50  months 
with neither Secretary making a decision and the case finally need-
ing to be settled. The reason it was able to sit there is because they 
kept  saying—people  kept  saying,  we  need  more  information.  We 
need to bring these matters to a conclusion. 

Companies who invest millions of dollars in lease sales that have 
been  offered  by  the  Federal  Government,  spend  millions  more  to 
develop those leases that they have paid money for, deserve the op-
portunity  to  have  a  process  wherein  they  can  come  to  a  final  con-
clusion  about—come  to  a  final  conclusion  and  decisions  be  made 
about consistency. 

Now,  I  want  to  also  make  it  clear  that  it  has  never  been  our  in-
tention to cut the States out of this process. I think there has been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

a  lot  of  discussion  that  we  are  trying  to  have  the  States  not  be  a 
part of the consistency process. Let me go through all the times the 
States are involved. The States are involved in the planning of the 
5-year plan. The States are involved in the planning for lease sales. 
The States are involved on a consistency basis with the exploration 
plans, drilling plans, and development plans. 

We are not asking for any of that to go away. We are only asking 
that when the appeals come forward to the Secretary that there be 
some end game in mind about how to make that happen. 

We  would  also  request  that  the  five  or  more  Federal  agencies 
begin  to  work  more  closely  together  so  that  we  can  have  a  single 
consistency  certification  for  each  project.  Right  now  you  may  have 
as many as three, four, or five that have to go through consistency 
review.  It  means  that  all  the  parties  are  having  to  do  duplicative 
work  and  I  think  it  just  makes  good  sense  and  really  argues  for 
better government. 

We  would  also  suggest  that  those  who  are  best  able,  those  who 
are  most  knowledgeable  about  processes  and  how  processes  work, 
in  whatever  area  it  is,  be  those  people  who  set  the  standards  for 
appeals and be those people who make those determinations. 

So  if  I  could  reiterate  one  more  time,  Madam  Chairwoman,  we 
really  feel  strongly  that  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  can 
work,  it  can  work  very  well,  and  we  would  just  like  to  find  a  way 
to bring some certainty to the process. 

Thank you so much for your time. We look forward to your ques-

tions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Fry follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TOM FRY, PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL OCEAN INDUSTRIES ASSOCIATION 

Madam Chairwoman and members of the Committee, I appreciate the opportunity 
to testify here today on S. 360, the Coastal Zone Enhancement Reauthorization Act 
of  2005.  I  serve  as  President  of  the  National  Ocean  Industries  Association  (NOIA). 
NOIA  is  the  only  national  trade  association  representing  all  segments  of  the  off-
shore  energy  industry.  The  NOIA  membership  comprises  more  than  300  companies 
engaged in activities ranging from producing to drilling, engineering to marine and 
air transport, offshore construction to equipment installation, manufacture and sup-
ply, and geophysical surveying to diving. 

This testimony is submitted on behalf of NOIA, the American Petroleum Institute, 
the  Domestic  Petroleum  Council,  the  Independent  Petroleum  Association  of  Amer-
ica,  the  International  Association  of  Drilling  Contractors,  the  Natural  Gas  Supply 
Association, and the U.S. Oil and Gas Association. Our seven national trade associa-
tions  represent  thousands  of  companies,  both  majors  and  independents,  engaged  in 
all sectors of the U.S. oil and natural gas industry. 

While  our  industry  supports  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act’s  (CZMA)  stated 
purpose  of  balancing  the  often  competing  and  conflicting  demands  of  coastal  re-
source  use,  economic  development,  and  conservation  through  cooperative  partner-
ships  among  Federal,  state  and  local  governments,  we  do  not  believe  that  the  cur-
rent statute is meeting that goal. Instead, the current implementation of the CZMA 
has  produced  regulatory  uncertainty  and  unreasonably  impeded  outer  continental 
shelf exploration and production projects, as well as the siting of offshore energy in-
frastructure. Therefore, while we support a reauthorization of the Act, we could not 
support  S.  360  unless  it  was  amended  to  clarify  the  CZMA  and  correct  the  imple-
mentation deficiencies. 
CZMA Implementation Affects U.S. Energy Production 

It is important to consider the implementation of the CZMA in the context of the 
overall energy challenges facing our nation. Energy demand is on the rise. The U.S. 
economy currently requires 20 million barrels of oil and 63 billion cubic feet of nat-
ural  gas  every  day,  according  to  the  Energy  Information  Administration’s  Annual 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Energy Outlook 2005, and these numbers are expected to increase in coming years. 
Without  a  concurrent  increase  in  supply,  this  situation  is  unsustainable  and  could 
lead to serious economic repercussions for both consumers and industries dependent 
on  natural  gas  and  oil—industries  as  diverse  as  automobiles,  chemicals,  electricity 
generation,  airplane  fuel,  agricultural  fertilizers,  clothing  manufacturing,  and  ply-
wood production. 

Addressing regulatory inefficiencies that hinder or stall the development of a sig-
nificant  portion  of  our  domestic  energy  resources  is  one  achievable  step  toward  in-
creasing domestic supply and meeting our nation’s energy needs. 

The  issues  associated  with  the  coastal  zone  management  process  represent  a  sig-
nificant  threat  to  the  energy  industry’s  ability  to  explore  for  and  produce  offshore 
oil  and  natural  gas,  and  consequently  present  a  substantial  impediment  to  the  de-
velopment  of  domestic  energy  supplies.  Failure  to  make  the  necessary  changes  to 
the CZMA will continue to contribute to the supply-demand imbalance, increased re-
liance  on  foreign  sources  of  energy,  and  the  shifting  overseas  of  thousands  of  jobs 
and billions of dollars in U.S. revenue. 

It  is  for  these  reasons  that  we  strongly  urge  the  Committee  to  clarify  the  CZMA 
and  correct  the  implementation  deficiencies.  Overlapping  jurisdiction  of  multiple 
government  agencies,  coupled  with  conflicting  Federal  laws  (or  conflicting  interpre-
tations  of  these  statutes)  have  resulted  in  serious  problems  with  the  coastal  zone 
management  process.  Companies  trying  to  find  and  develop  offshore  energy  re-
sources  frequently  encounter  duplicative  requirements  that  result  in  costly  delays 
in  the  regulatory  process,  even  when  these  activities  would  not  adversely  impact 
states’  coastal  zones.  As  noted  in  the  President’s  National  Energy  Policy  Report, 
delays  and  uncertainties  of  the  CZMA  can  hinder  proper  energy  exploration  and 
production projects. 
Proposed Amendments to the Coastal Zone Management Act 

In order to allow the CZMA to achieve its intended purpose without hindering the 
Nation’s  energy  development,  we  strongly  urge  the  Committee  to  consider  the  fol-
lowing technical amendments to the CZMA in S. 360: 

(1)  Amend  the  definition  of  ‘‘enforceable  policy’’  in  16  U.S.C.  § 1453(6a)  to  limit 
a state’s CZMA consistency review to activities occurring within its own boundaries 
or offshore its own state. The CZMA was intended to grant a state the right to con-
duct  a  consistency  review  of  Federal  licenses  and  permits  within  the  territorial 
boundaries of that state. However, the statute has been implemented to allow states 
to  review  activities  and  block  permits  for  activities  taking  place  offshore  other 
states. This amendment would still allow states to conduct a consistency review for 
all licenses and permits within its boundaries and off its own shore, but would stop 
states  from  interfering  with  the  actions  of  other  states  within  the  other  states’ 
boundaries or off the other states’ shores. 

(2)  Amend  16  U.S.C.  § 1456(c)(3)(B)  to  allow  a  single  consistency  certification  for 
an  outer  continental  shelf  plan  to  cover  all  activities,  including  air  and  water  per-
mits.  The  energy  industry  has  experienced  inordinate  delays  due  to  the  lack  of  co-
ordination  between  Federal  agencies  in  processing  permits  for  outer  continental 
shelf  activities,  especially  involving  separate  state  consistency  reviews  for  the  mul-
tiple  permits  that  are  required.  This  consolidated  process  would  increase  the  effi-
ciency  of  state  consistency  reviews  for  outer  continental  shelf  plans  by  achieving  a 
single consistency certification for all related permitted activities, including air and 
water discharges, conducted pursuant to either an exploration plan, or a plan of de-
velopment and production. 

(3)  Amend  16  U.S.C.  § 1456(c)(3)(B)  to  grant  the  Secretary  of  the  Interior  the  au-
thority  to  determine  information  requirements  for  consistency  certifications.  Some 
states  have  used  findings  of  ‘‘lack  of  information’’  to  deny  consistency  certifications 
and  obstruct  outer  continental  shelf  activity.  The  Secretary  of  the  Interior  has 
adopted detailed information requirements for outer continental shelf plans and spe-
cific Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act requirements for the Department of the In-
terior’s consultation with state coastal zone authorities regarding areas of particular 
state concern. The Secretary is therefore in the best position to conduct an analysis 
of the information requirements. 

(4)  Amend  16  U.S.C.  § 1456(c)(3)(B)(iii)  to  provide  the  Secretary  of  the  Interior 
with the authority to override state appeals concerning OCS activities. The Depart-
ment of the Interior’s expertise regarding outer continental shelf plans and their im-
pacts make the Interior Secretary, as opposed to the Commerce Secretary, uniquely 
suited to implement the law in this area. 

(5) Amend 16 U.S.C. § 1465 to ensure timely decisions by the Secretary to override 
appeals.  CZMA  appeals  continue  to  be  drawn  out  by  overlong  agency  commenting, 
and  by  the  Commerce  Department’s  implementation  of  the  requirement  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

deadline  for  decision-making  does  not  begin  to  run  until  after  the  administrative 
record  is  closed.  This  amendment  is  needed  to  institute  a  definite  deadline  that  is 
only governed by when the appeal is filed. The need for predictability in these over-
ride decisions mandates a preordained time for review; otherwise, continuing abuse 
will be endemic to the decisional process. 
Conclusion 

We support the goals and intent of the Coastal Zone Management Act, and believe 
that  the  technical  amendments  discussed  here  would  improve  the  implementation 
of  the  statute  by  streamlining  the  review  process  while  preserving  states’  rights.  I 
appreciate your consideration of our concerns regarding S. 360, and I will be happy 
to answer any questions. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Fry. Thank you. 
Dr. Hudson from Maine. Thank you for being here. 

STATEMENT  OF  W.  DONALD  HUDSON,  JR.,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT, 
CHEWONKI  FOUNDATION;  MAINE  GOVERNOR  BALDACCI’S 
NON-GOVERNMENTAL  APPOINTEE  TO  THE  GULF  OF  MAINE 
COUNCIL  ON  THE  MARINE  ENVIRONMENT;  PRESIDENT,  U.S. 
GULF OF MAINE ASSOCIATION; AND TREASURER, NATIONAL 
MARINE EDUCATORS ASSOCIATION 
Dr.  HUDSON.  Thank  you.  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Snowe, 
Senator  Lautenberg:  Thanks  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  this 
morning.  My  name  is  Don  Hudson  and  I  am  President  of  the 
Chewonki  Foundation,  a  nonprofit  educational  institution  that  has 
for  90  years  introduced  thousands  of  people  to  the  wonders  of  the 
Maine coast and its watersheds. 

However,  today  I  am  testifying  in  my  capacity  as  Maine’s  public 
sector  representative  to  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Council  on  the  Marine 
Environment.  The  council  is  a  U.S.-Canadian  partnership  working 
to  maintain  and  enhance  environmental  quality  in  the  Gulf  of 
Maine,  one  of  the  world’s  most  biologically  productive  environ-
ments, to allow for sustainable resource use by existing and future 
generations. 

The  coastal  zone  is  the  dominant  natural  and  economic  feature 
of  Maine,  whether  it  is  the  need  for  water  access,  the  need  for  in-
frastructure and sustainable development plans, or the need to per-
manently  protect  critical  coastal  habitats.  Coastal  management 
needs  have  outstripped  our  capacity  to  keep  pace.  The  first  phase 
of  coastal  zone  management  successfully  established  core  policies 
and environmental laws and supported a network of National Estu-
arine Research Reserves, including one in Wells. The next wave of 
coastal  management  needs  to  support  the  use  of  new  tools  and 
technology,  innovative  development  practices,  more  effective  edu-
cation  programs,  and  more  focused  land  conservation  and  restora-
tion  programs  to  achieve  national  goals  for  a  healthy  coast  and  a 
robust  coastal  economy.  A  reauthorized  Coastal  Zone  Management 
Act  will  represent  this  second  wave  of  effective  management  in 
partnership with States and local communities. 

I  would  like  to  touch  briefly  on  five  aspects  of  S.  360  and  then 
address  the  topic  of  regional  ecosystem-based  management.  To 
begin,  S.  360  includes  an  important  new  focus  with  the  coastal 
communities  program.  Maine  has  136  municipalities  in  its  coastal 
zone,  plus  two  tribes,  several  unorganized  territories,  and  more 
than  5,000  islands.  Through  current  CZM-funded  programs  com-
bined with State resources, Maine helps towns with grants and tar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

geted  technical  assistance  and  training.  CZMA  funds  support 
Maine’s  working  waterfront  initiative,  which  helps  more  than  90 
partner  organizations  retain  critical  small  harbors  for  use  by  busi-
nesses.  CZMA  funds  also  support  a  local  grants  program,  a  new 
technical assistance website, and direct assistance for land acquisi-
tion.  An  enhanced  coastal  communities  program  would  continue 
this innovative work. 

Second, S. 360 strengthens the role of the Coastal Zone Manage-
ment  Act  in  coastal  habitat  restoration.  Through  the  use  of  CZMA 
funds,  other  Federal  resources,  State  contributions,  and  local 
match, Maine completed five significant habitat restoration projects 
last  year,  forged  a  landmark  agreement  to  restore  fisheries  on  the 
Penobscot  River,  and  assisted  30  municipalities  with  habitat  pro-
tection  strategies.  In  Sagadahoc  County,  near  where  I  work,  12 
towns are collaborating on an innovative regional habitat and open 
space  conservation  effort.  There  are  nine  other  regions  in  coastal 
Maine  where  such  a  landscape-scale  approach  could  also  be  de-
ployed. 

Third,  S.  360  clarifies  that  States  can  use  CZM  funds  to  imple-
ment coastal non-point pollution control programs. While this clari-
fication  is  useful,  authorization  levels  should  reflect  an  additional 
$10  million  for  States  to  use  to  be  effective.  Maine  is  typical  of 
other  coastal  States  in  that  non-point  source  pollution  represents 
more than 80 percent of the remaining sources of pollution entering 
coastal  waters.  As  a  participant  in  a  local  monitoring  program,  I 
know  that  this  is  ongoing  hard  work.  Maine  was  able  to  partner 
with the Maine Marine Trades Association to launch a clean mari-
nas  initiative,  the  only  one  in  the  Nation  housed  at  a  business 
trade  organization,  through  a  modest  investment  of  $50,000  lever-
aged  by  local  resources.  Five  new  marinas  gained  clean  certifi-
cation  last  year.  Without  new  coastal  non-point  funds,  this  fledg-
ling program will not operate beyond June 2006. 

Fourth, Maine has just submitted its draft coastal and estuarine 
land  conservation  plan,  anticipating  that  an  amended  S.  360  or  a 
separate bill might formalize the Coastal and Estuarine Land Con-
servation  Program.  Our  planning  effort  has  been  inclusive  and 
identifies  critical  types  of  coastal  lands  that  are  most  threatened. 
Over  the  last  18  years,  the  Land  for  Maine’s  Future  program  has 
invested  more  than  $21  million  for  75  projects  in  Maine’s  coastal 
zone, helping to protect almost 26,000 acres to address a variety of 
needs, and to secure public access to the shore. A source of Federal 
matching  funds  could  greatly  increase  the  pace  and  quality  of 
coastal conservation in Maine and the Nation. 

The  fifth  area  of  S.  360  of  interest  to  me  is  the  coastal  training 
program  at  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  and  other 
innovative  programs  that  bring  teachers,  students,  and  decision-
makers more directly into contact with the habitats and ecosystems 
of coastal watersheds. Sound management practices will never suc-
ceed  unless  the  public  understands  and  embraces  them,  and  the 
educational  efforts  of  the  reserve  system  and  their  many  partners 
are essential ingredients for success. 

The  Maine  Coastal  Program  has  a  vision  that  includes  a  state-
wide  network  of  coastal  training  programs  that  would  function  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

centers of learning and provide a home for a variety of citizen stew-
ardship programs. 

Finally,  over  the  last  15  years  CZM  and  other  Federal  funds, 
combined with State resources, have provided the seed money that 
has  established  collaborative  transboundary  management  of  the 
Gulf  of  Maine.  The  Governors  and  premiers  of  the  five  Gulf  juris-
dictions—Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Maine, New Brunswick, 
and  Nova  Scotia—created  the  council  in  1989  as  a  regional  forum 
to  exchange  information  and  engage  in  long-term  planning.  The 
council has no ongoing dedicated support. 

The U.S. Ocean Commission recognized the Gulf of Maine Coun-
cil’s model approach. In response to the U.S. Ocean Commission re-
port  and  President  Bush’s  Ocean  Action  Plan,  the  CZMA  could  be 
further strengthened to support regional ocean governance. Maine’s 
Governor  John  Baldacci  has  stated  in  his  comments  to  the  U.S. 
Ocean Commission he places a high priority on building a more ro-
bust  regional  governance  model  using  the  council,  the  Gulf  of 
Maine  Ocean  Observing  System,  and  other  framework  elements 
currently in place. 

The  timing  is  perfect  as  our  Canadian  partners  are  developing 
their  ocean  action  strategy  and  establishing  large  ocean  manage-
ment  areas.  While  we  are  well  poised  for  exciting  ecosystem-based 
management  work,  we  need  Congressional  support  and  the  CZMA 
is one place Congress might invest to support this work. 

Thanks for the opportunity and I look forward to answering any 

questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Hudson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF W.  DONALD HUDSON,  JR.,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT,  CHEWONKI 
FOUNDATION;  MAINE GOVERNOR BALDACCI’S NON-GOVERNMENTAL APPOINTEE TO 
THE GULF OF MAINE COUNCIL ON THE MARINE ENVIRONMENT;  PRESIDENT,  U.S. 
GULF OF MAINE ASSOCIATION;  AND TREASURER,  NATIONAL MARINE EDUCATORS 
ASSOCIATION 
Introduction 

Chairman  Stevens,  Ranking  Member  Inouye,  Senator  Snowe  and  other  distin-
guished Members of the Committee, I want to thank you for the opportunity to offer 
testimony  today  regarding  S.  360,  the  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Reauthorization 
Act of 2005. 

My  name  is  Donald  Hudson  and  I  am  President  of  the  Chewonki  Foundation,  a 
non profit environmental education institution that has, for ninety years, introduced 
thousands  of  Maine’s  youth  and  adults  to  the  wonders  of  the  Maine  coast  and  its 
watersheds. However today I am testifying in my capacity as Maine Governor John 
Baldacci’s  non-government  representative  to  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Council  on  the  Ma-
rine  Environment.  The  Council  is  a  U.S.-Canadian  partnership  of  government  and 
non-government  organizations  working  to  maintain  and  enhance  environmental 
quality  in  the  Gulf  of  Maine—one  of  the  world’s  most  biologically  productive  envi-
ronments—to allow for sustainable resource use by existing and future generations. 
Remarks 

With close to 5,300 miles of coastline, 78 percent of the state’s population, 80 per-
cent  of  all  tourist  expenditures  and  a  1.7  billion  dollar  contribution  to  the  gross 
state  product,  the  coastal  zone  is  a  dominant  natural  and  economic  feature  of  my 
state  of  Maine.  Whether  it  is  the  need  for  water  access  for  fishermen  in  Maine’s 
easternmost Washington County, the need for infrastructure and sustainable devel-
opment plans in our rapidly growing Midcoast area, or the need to permanently pro-
tect  critical  coastal  habitats  in  Southernmost  Maine,  coastal  management  needs 
have outstripped my state’s capacity to keep pace. What I would call the first phase 
of coastal zone management successfully established basic core policies and environ-
mental  laws  and  supported  a  network  of  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  in-
cluding  one  in  Wells,  Maine.  While  this  initial  work  established  essential  founda-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

tions for balanced conservation and development, the next wave of coastal manage-
ment needs to support the use of new tools and technology, innovative development 
practices,  more  effective  education  programs  and  more  focused  land  conservation 
and  restoration  programs  to  achieve  national  goals  for  a  healthy  coast  and  robust 
coastal  economy.  Unfortunately,  Maine’s  Federal  CZM  funds  have  been  capped  for 
more  than  five  years,  limiting  our  capacity  to  effectively  manage  coastal  resources. 
It is my hope that a reauthorized Coastal Zone Management Act will represent this 
second wave of more sophisticated, comprehensive and effective coastal management 
in partnership with states and local communities. 

I  will  take  this  opportunity  to  discuss  five  aspects  of  S  360,  offering  examples  of 
how  this  legislation  would  provide  direct  benefits  to  my  home  state  of  Maine.  Fi-
nally,  I’ll  speak  to  the  topics  of  regional  eco-system  based  management  where  I  be-
lieve there are additional opportunities to strengthen the CZMA. 
Strengthening Coastal Communities 

S.  360  includes  an  important  new  focus  on  Coastal  Communities  Program  in  an 
enhanced  Section  309.  Like  many  other  states,  Maine  has  many,  many  municipali-
ties  in  its  coastal  zone–136—plus  two  tribes,  several  unorganized  territories  and 
more  than  5,000  islands.  Small  towns  with  little  technical  paid  staff  are  the  norm. 
Through current CZM-funded programs combined with state resources, Maine helps 
towns  via  grant  programs  and  targeted  technical  assistance  and  training.  One  ex-
ample of this work is Maine’s Working Waterfront Initiative where more than nine-
ty partner organizations are working to retain critical small harbors for use by busi-
nesses  that  need  a  waterside  location.  Beginning  with  development  of  case  studies 
of  twenty-five  working  waterfront  towns,  CZM  funds  in  Maine  helped  form  a 
coastwide  working  waterfront  coalition,  a  local  grants  program,  a  new  technical  as-
sistance  website,  and  direct  assistance  for  land  acquisition  efforts.  Maine’s  legisla-
ture is currently contemplating the passage of a bond issue to establish a new work-
ing waterfronts acquisition program. Is there a better success story for coastal zone 
management than one that helps shed light on the problem, mobilizes constituents, 
creates solutions, helps local people to solve local problems and spurs new state in-
vestment in a critical problem? 

An enhanced coastal communities program would allow Maine to develop innova-
tive  programming  targeted  to  the  needs  of  our  coastal  towns.  One  such  need  is  the 
capacity  to  work  with  groups  of  towns  on  targeted  ‘‘bay  management’’  programs, 
whereby groups of stakeholders would work side by side with state and Federal offi-
cials to understand local systems through additional research, to create area specific 
resource management plans, and manage nearshore resources more effectively. 
Restoring Coastal Habitats 

S.  360  strengthens  the  role  of  the  CZMA  in  coastal  habitat  restoration.  Through 
the  use  of  CZMA  funds,  other  Federal  resources,  state  contributions  and  local 
match, Maine completed five significant habitat restoration projects last year, forged 
a landmark agreement to restore diadromous fisheries on the Penobscot River while 
preserving hydropower production on the lower river and assisted thirty municipali-
ties  with  habitat  protection  strategies.  In  Sagadahoc  County,  where  I  work,  twelve 
towns  are  collaborating  on  a  regional  habitat  and  open  space  conservation  effort. 
Getting  Maine  towns  to  work  together  is  challenge  enough,  to  have  more  than  100 
people participate in a regional visioning session and giving the session rave reviews 
is  a  miracle!  Research  documents  that  protecting  large,  unfragmented  tracts  of  im-
portant habitat, and linking protected habitats via buffered stream corridors is nec-
essary to retain ecosystem functions. There are nine other regions in coastal Maine 
where  such  an  innovative  landscape-scale  approach  could  be  deployed  if  resources 
were provided. 
Reducing Coastal Non Point Pollution 

S. 360 clarifies that states can use CZM funds to implement coastal nonpoint pol-
lution  control  programs.  While  this  clarification  is  useful,  authorization  levels 
should  reflect  an  additional  $10  million  for  states  to  use  in  a  flexible  way  to  take 
the  actions  they  deem  to  be  effective  in  controlling  nonpoint  pollution  instead  of  a 
zero sum game. Maine is typical of other coastal states in that nonpoint source pol-
lution represents more than 80 percent of the remaining sources of pollution enter-
ing our estuaries and coastal waters. As a participant in a local program to monitor 
water quality, conduct shoreline surveys and open clamflats, I know that controlling 
coastal  nonpoint  pollution  is  ongoing,  time  consuming,  hard  work.  Consistent  Fed-
eral  investment  to  help  meet  water  quality  goals  is  vital.  Given  inconsistent  levels 
of funding over the years, Maine has not been able to fully implement its Federally 
approved coastal nonpoint program. For example, for three years when provided suf-
ficient  implementation  funds,  Maine  was  able  to  partner  with  the  Maine  Marine 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

Trades  Association  to  launch  a  Clean  Marinas  initiative,  a  voluntary  certification 
program  for  marinas  and  boatyards  that  go  the  extra  mile  to  reduce  pollution  be-
yond what is required by law. Maine’s program is the only one in the Nation housed 
at  a  business  trade  organization.  Through  a  modest  investment  of  $50,000  in  Fed-
eral funds, leveraged by local resources five new marinas gained ‘‘clean’’ certification 
last  year  and  the  program’s  technical  assistance  efforts  are  available  statewide.  Al-
though MMTA has developed a business plan that will allow them to accept increas-
ing responsibility for the Clean Marina program over subsequent years, without new 
coastal nonpoint funds, the fledgling program would not operate beyond June 2006. 
With  all  evidence  pointing  to  the  ongoing  pervasive  effects  of  polluted  runoff  on 
coastal  systems,  to  not  offer  increased  consistent  funding  to  this  program  would  be 
missing the mark. 
Conserving Coastal and Estuarine Lands 

Maine  has  just  submitted  its  draft  Coastal  and  Estuarine  Land  Conservation 
Plan,  anticipating  that  an  amended  S.  360,  or  a  separate  bill,  might  formalize  the 
Coastal and Estuarine Land Conservation Program as an ongoing competitive grant 
program  to  benefit  all  coastal  states.  Our  planning  effort  identifies  critical  types  of 
coastal  lands  that  are  most  threatened  by  future  development.  All  of  the  state’s 
major  players  in  land  conservation,  including  coastal  land  trusts  were  involved  in 
its creation. Given such a blueprint, our conservation needs are many. Over the last 
eighteen  years,  the  Land  for  Maine’s  Future  Program  has  invested  more  than  $21 
million  for  75  projects  in  Maine’s  coastal  zone,  helping  to  protect  almost  26,000 
acres  of  prime  wildlife  habitats,  secure  public  access  to  the  shore  for  boating  and 
recreation,  add  to  state  and  municipal  park  lands,  maintain  scenic  areas,  preserve 
coastal  islands,  and  provide  open  space  and  recreational  lands.  A  source  of  Federal 
matching  funds  to  help  leverage  state  conservation  dollars  could  significantly  in-
crease the pace and quality of coastal conservation in Maine. 
Advancing Coastal Education and Awareness 

The fifth area of S. 360 that I will touch on is the benefit of The Coastal Training 
Program  at  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  and  other  hands-on,  innova-
tive  programs  that  bring  teachers  and  students  and  decisionmakers  more  directly 
into  contact  with  the  habitats  and  ecosystems  of  coastal  watersheds  and  the  major 
issues  of  management  and  governance  essential  to  secure  a  bright  future  for  all. 
Whether  it  is  a  classroom  of  high  school  students  conducting  water  quality  surveys 
as  part  of  chemistry  class  or  a  real  estate  business  group  gathering  to  learn  about 
the value of wetlands on the landscape, sound management practices will never suc-
ceed  unless  the  public  understands  and  embraces  them.  The  role  of  education  can-
not be understated. The Maine Coastal Program has a vision that includes a state-
wide  network  of  Coastal  Training  Programs  up  and  down  the  Maine  coast  that 
would  function  as  centers  of  learning  about  local  watersheds  and  provide  a  home 
for a variety of citizen stewardship and monitoring programs. 
Fostering Regional Governance 

Over  the  last  fifteen  years,  CZM  and  other  Federal  funds,  combined  with  state 
resources  from  Maine,  New  Hampshire  and  Massachusetts,  have  provided  the  seed 
money,  as  well  as  much  of  the  brain  power,  that  has  established  collaborative, 
transboundary management of the Gulf of Maine. Maine appreciates the support of 
Senator Snowe for these efforts, however, there is no ongoing dedicated support. The 
governors  and  premiers  of  the  five  Gulf  jurisdictions—Massachusetts,  New  Hamp-
shire,  Maine,  New  Brunswick,  and  Nova  Scotia—created  the  Council  in  1989  as  a 
regional  forum  to  exchange  information  and  engage  in  long-term  planning.  The 
Council  conducts  environmental  monitoring;  provides  science  translation  for  coastal 
managers;  organizes  conferences  and  workshops;  offers  grants  and  recognition 
awards; raises public awareness about the Gulf; and connects people, organizations, 
and information. 

The  Gulf  of  Maine  Council’s  model  approach  was  recognized  by  the  U.S.  Ocean 
Commission and our experience has contributed to the body of ideas being developed 
around regional governance and ocean councils. In response to the U.S. Ocean Com-
mission report and President Bush’s Ocean Action Plan, the CZMA could be further 
strengthened  to  support  regional  ocean  governance.  Maine’s  Governor  John 
Baldacci,  as  stated  in  his  comments  to  the  U.S.  Ocean  Commission,  places  a  high 
priority on building a more robust regional governance model using the Council, the 
Gulf of Maine Ocean Observing System and other framework elements currently in 
place. Our Governor knows that the timing is perfect for strengthening regional gov-
ernance  in  the  Gulf  of  Maine  as  our  Canadian  partners  are  developing  their  Ocean 
Action  Strategy  and  establishing  Large  Ocean  Management  Areas.  While  we  are 
well  poised  for  exciting  ecosystem-based  management  work,  we  need  Congressional 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

support  and  a  strengthened  Federal-state  partnership  to  make  this  happen.  The 
CZMA is one place Congress might invest in Federal/state ocean planning and man-
agement  and  a  regional  grant  programs  to  support  this  work  on  an  ongoing  basis. 
Thank you again for the opportunity to present this testimony. I would be happy 

to answer questions. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Dr. Hudson. 
Mr.  Jeffress,  thank  you  for  being  here  from  Alaska  and  making 

that trip. Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF BILL JEFFRESS, DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF PROJECT MANAGEMENT AND PERMITTING, 

ALASKA DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 

Mr. JEFFRESS. Honorable Chairwoman, Senator Lautenberg, and 
Senator  Stevens:  Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  My 
name  is  Bill  Jeffress.  I  am  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  Project 
Management and Permitting for the Alaska Department of Natural 
Resources.  Our  office  is  responsible  for  the  implementation  of  the 
Alaska Coastal Management Program, the ACMP. 

Since  1997  the  State  of  Alaska  has  relied  on  continued  program 
approval  and  funding  provided  by  the  CZMA  through  NOAA’s  Of-
fice of Ocean and Coastal Resource Management. Overall, the Alas-
ka  program  has  been  successful  in  providing  the  State  and  our 
local  districts  with  funding  and  guidance  to  implement  a  program 
that  achieves  a  balance  between  economic  development  and  the 
protection of coastal uses and resources. However, after more than 
25  years  of  implementing  a  coastal  program,  we  felt  many  aspects 
of the ACMP needed updating to better achieve this balance. 

Since  2003,  Alaska  has  been  restructuring  and  amending  the 
ACMP  to  refocus  our  program  to  meet  the  unique  and  specific 
needs of Alaska. We are currently working with OCRM to gain ap-
proval of our amended program. 

Through  our  membership  with  the  Coastal  States  Organization, 
Alaska  is  very  aware  of  the  problems  and  the  situations  that  are 
prevalent  in  other  coastal  States,  territories,  and  trust  properties, 
and  their  requirement  for  a  higher  level  of  protection,  restoration, 
enhancement, or creation of coastal wetlands, coral reefs, marshes, 
and barrier islands. 

However, the majority of the other coastal States are at the oppo-
site end of the spectrum from Alaska. Where other States are striv-
ing to protect, preserve, restore, or enhance remaining areas of un-
developed shoreline or restore previously disturbed shoreline areas, 
Alaska has yet to develop 1 percent of our more than 44,500 miles 
of shoreline. The vast majority of this shoreline is extremely remote 
and accessible only by boat or aircraft. 

In addition to having over twice the length of shoreline of all the 
other  coastal  States  combined,  Alaska  is  the  Nation’s  only  Arctic 
State,  with  environmental  issues  more  akin  to  Russia  and  Canada 
than  other  coastal  States.  Alaska  is  the  largest  ocean  State  in  the 
country. Alaska occupies 20 percent of the Nation’s land base, con-
tains half the Nation’s wetlands and 40 percent of the Nation’s sur-
face  water.  Alaska’s  proven  and  unexplored  natural  resources  are 
greater  than  any  other  State.  Alaska’s  oceans  and  coastal  water-
sheds produce 25 percent of the Nation’s oil, over 50 percent of the 
Nation’s seafood, and over 50 percent of the Nation’s minerals. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

Because of the vast differences between Alaska and other States, 
Federal  programs  often  do  not  adapt  to  Alaska  even  though  those 
programs  may  very  well  meet  the  needs  of  other  States.  Federal 
flexibility  in  State  collaboration  to  balance  national  policies  with 
local conditions is needed for successful resource management. 

Alaska supports the reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Manage-
ment  Act  and  supports  the  overall  goals  of  CZMA,  but  reiterates 
that  provisions  be  made  to  accommodate  Alaska’s  unique  geo-
graphic  setting,  cultural  diversity,  expansive  coastal  shorelines, 
and  her  great  potential  for  natural  resource  development  to  ulti-
mately support State and national interests. 

One  of  the  best  examples  of  the  need  to  make  accommodations 
for  Alaska  is  the  requirement  for  the  Federal  effects  test.  Under 
CZMA effects are not just environmental effects, but include effects 
on  coastal  uses.  Federal  consistency  determinations  would  be  re-
quired for a Federal activity hundreds of miles inland of our coastal 
zone  boundaries  that  cumulatively  and  indirectly  affect  coastal 
uses. 

Alaska  does  not  advocate  removal  of  the  Federal  effects  test,  as 
the State has an interest in ensuring that inland Federal activities 
that  have  a  foreseeable  significant  effect  on  coastal  uses  and  re-
sources are reviewed for consistency with Alaska’s coastal manage-
ment  program.  But  Alaska  does  advocate  subjecting  itself  to  a 
modified effects test whereby the definition of ‘‘effects’’ was revised 
to include only the impacts that directly and significantly affect the 
uses and resources of a coastal zone. 

In  conclusion,  we  believe  that  Alaska’s  coastal  management  pro-
gram  through  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  is  a  worthwhile 
and  valuable  program.  However,  there  is  an  increased  need  for 
Federal  flexibility  in  order  to  improve  the  performance,  especially 
considering Alaska’s unique setting. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to testify and we are eager 
to  work  with  you  and  your  staffs  to  make  CZMA  work  for  Alaska 
and the Nation. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Jeffress follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BILL JEFFRESS, DIRECTOR, OFFICE OF PROJECT 

MANAGEMENT AND PERMITTING, ALASKA DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 
Honorable  Chair  and  Committee  Members  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  tes-
tify  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act.  My  name  is  Bill 
Jeffress; I am the Director of the Office of Project Management and Permitting with 
the Alaska Department of Natural Resources. Our office is responsible for the imple-
mentation of the Alaska Coastal Management Program, ‘‘ACMP.’’ 

Since  1977,  the  State  of  Alaska  has  relied  on  continued  program  approval  and 
funding  provided  by  the  CZMA  through  NOAA’s  Office  of  Coastal  and  Resource 
Management, or ‘‘OCRM,’’ to assist with the cooperative implementation of Alaska’s 
coastal management program. We are proud of Alaska’s program, which we feel suc-
cessfully achieves the delicate balance between economic development in coastal re-
gions  and  the  protection  of  coastal  uses  and  resources,  and  we  are  grateful  for  the 
Federal  funding  provided  through  the  CZMA  for  Alaska  and  its  local  coastal  dis-
tricts to operate our program effectively. However, after more than twenty-five years 
of  implementing  the  ACMP,  we  recently  determined  that  many  aspects  of  the  pro-
gram had to be updated to improve the program’s efficiency, allowing project appli-
cants  to  timely  obtain  permits  for  responsible  economic  development  while  main-
taining  protection  of  our  coastal  uses  and  resources.  Therefore,  since  2003,  Alaska 
has  dedicated  incalculable  hours  amending  the  ACMP  to  improve  and  streamline 
the program in order to meet the unique and specific needs of Alaska today and into 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

the future. We are currently working with OCRM to obtain Federal approval of our 
amended program. 

Through  our  membership  and  participation  in  the  Coastal  States  Organization, 
Alaska  is  very  aware  of  the  positions  of  other  coastal  states,  territories,  and  trust 
properties,  who  require  the  highest  level  of  ‘‘protection,  restoration,  enhancement, 
or creation of coastal wetlands, coral reefs, marshes, and barrier islands.’’ However, 
Alaska  is  at  the  opposite  end  of  the  spectrum  from  the  majority  of  other  coastal 
states.  Where  other  states  are  striving  to  protect,  preserve,  restore,  or  enhance  re-
maining  areas  of  undeveloped  shoreline  or  restore  previously  disturbed  shoreline 
areas  after  centuries  of  development,  Alaska  has  yet  to  develop  even  1  percent  of 
our  more  than  44,900  miles  of  shoreline.  Development  is  rendered  all  the  more  dif-
ficult since the vast majority of this shoreline is extremely remote and is accessible 
only by boat or aircraft. 

In  addition  to  having  over  twice  the  length  of  shoreline  of  all  the  other  coastal 
states  combined,  Alaska  is  the  Nation’s  only  arctic  state,  making  its  environmental 
issues more akin to Russia, Sweden, Norway, Greenland and Canada than to other 
U.S.  states.  Alaska  is  also  the  largest  ocean  state  in  the  country,  bordered  by  the 
North Pacific Ocean, the Bering Sea, the Chukchi Sea, and the Beaufort Sea. Alaska 
occupies 20 percent of the Nation’s land base, contains half of the Nation’s wetlands, 
and 40 percent of the Nation’s surface water. 

Alaska’s  proven  yet  unexplored  natural  resources  are  greater  than  any  other 
state. Alaska’s oceans and coastal watershed produce 25 percent of the Nation’s oil, 
over 50 percent of the Nation’s seafood, and a large percentage of the Nation’s min-
erals  from  several  world  class  mines.  In  short,  Alaska  is  a  fundamentally  unique 
territory,  with  dramatically  different,  often  divergent,  goals  and  impediments  than 
any other coastal state. 

Because of the vast difference between Alaska and other states, Federal programs 
that very well meet the needs of other states often do not adapt to Alaska. National 
goals  sometimes  are  at  odds  with  what  makes  sense  for  Alaska.  Federal  flexibility 
to  balance  national  policies  with  local  conditions  is  required  to  properly  and  effec-
tively  manage  our  coastal  and  other  resources.  Indeed,  Alaska  has  a  long  history 
of working successfully in collaboration with Federal and local jurisdictions on ocean 
and coastal issues. From joint State and Federal oil and gas lease sales in the Beau-
fort  Sea,  to  the  continuing  work  with  OCRM  for  the  approval  of  the  requested 
amendment  of  the  Alaska  Coastal  Management  Program,  Alaska  has  a  great  deal 
of experience in the benefits of intergovernmental coordination for managing ocean, 
coastal, and watershed resources. 

Alaska  supports  the  reauthorization  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  with 
the same clear direction that motivated the Congress to originally pass this legisla-
tion,  which  was  ‘‘to  encourage  and  assist  the  [coastal]  states  to  achieve  wise  use  of 
the land and water resources of the coastal zone, giving full consideration to ecologi-
cal,  cultural,  historic,  and  esthetic  values  as  well  as  the  need  for  compatible  eco-
nomic  development.’’  Alaska  supports  the  overall  goals  of  the  CZMA.  However,  we 
request that provisions be made to accommodate Alaska’s unique geographic setting, 
cultural diversity, expansive yet underdeveloped coastal shoreline, and our great po-
tential  for  natural  resource  development  to  ultimately  support  both  State  and  Na-
tional interests. 

An  excellent  example  of  the  need  for  legislative  accommodation  for  Alaska  is  the 
application  of  the  CZMA’s  Federal  ‘‘effects  test.’’  Under  this  test,  every  Federal 
agency activity within or outside the coastal zone that affects any land or water use 
or  natural  resource  of  the  coastal  zone  is  subject  to  a  state  consistency  review.  But 
because under the CZMA regulations, ‘‘effects’’ are so broadly defined to include not 
just environmental effects, but secondary, cumulative, indirect and remote effects on 
coastal  uses,  a  Federal  consistency  determination  would  be  required  for  a  Federal 
activity  hundreds  of  miles  inland  that  cumulatively  and  indirectly  affect  the  coast. 
This potentially onerous requirement could stymie or impede development in a man-
ner presumably never anticipated by the drafters of the regulatory language. 

Alaska  does  not  advocate  removal  of  the  Federal  effects  test,  as  the  State  has  a 
keen interest in ensuring that inland Federal activities that have a foreseeable, sig-
nificant effect on coastal uses and resources are reviewed for consistency with Alas-
ka’s  coastal  management  program.  But  Alaska  does  advocate  subjecting  itself,  and 
any  other  similarly  unique  geographical  state,  to  a  ‘‘modified  effects  test,’’  whereby 
the definition of ‘‘effects’’ was revised to include only impacts that ‘‘directly and sig-
nificantly affect the uses or resources of the coastal zone.’’ 

In conclusion we believe that the Alaska Coastal Management Program, operated 
under  the  approval  and  oversight  of  the  Federal  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act,  is 
a  worthwhile  and  valuable  program.  However,  in  order  to  improve  its  performance 
and  efficacy,  there  is  a  vital  need  for  flexibility  in  the  application  of  the  CZMA  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Alaska’s  coastal  management  program,  which  manages  our  nation’s  most  uniquely 
immense and diverse coastline. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to testify before this Committee. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much. We appreciate all of your 
testimony  and  we  will  move  along  because  I  know  we  have  a  vote 
at noon. 

The  first  question  I  would  like  to  pose  to  the  panel  gets  to  the 
essence  of  the  problems  we  have  had  in  reauthorizing  the  Coastal 
Zone Management Act—and these issues are pending this week as 
well  in  the  Energy  Committee.  The  consistency  requirement  has 
been one of the powerful tools in the Coastal Zone Management Act 
for  respecting  States’  rights  and  governing  Federal  actions  as  well 
off State shores. 

Now, Mr. Fry, you said that the process has worked well for the 
most  part;  is  that  correct?  So  what  are  we  limiting  it  to?  We  have 
heard  about  the  14  appeals,  for  example.  What  are  we  discussing 
here? Is there not a way of addressing this problem without under-
cutting  the  consistency  requirements  altogether  and  also  respect-
ing—going  beyond  just  the  issue  of  States’  rights—that  there  is  a 
regional part to all of this? The regional element is also important, 
certainly in my State of Maine and the Gulf of Maine, as Dr. Hud-
son  will  tell  you  and  Senator  Nelson  referred  to.  In  the  Gulf  of 
Mexico,  for  example,  the  implications  for  decisions  made  by  one 
state can impact his state, and the same is true for my home State 
of Maine. 

So is there not a way of addressing these questions without keep-

ing this open-ended and discarding it for the most part? 

Mr.  FRY.  Yes,  I  think  there  are  ways  to  do  that.  Our  suggestion 
really relates to this appeal process. As has been talked about, you 
have  got  those  thousands  of  cases  where  the  CZMA  consistency 
works, but in those 14 to 17 cases that come up, what has increas-
ingly occurred is that the time frame for those appeals has contin-
ued to increase and increase. It started off being about a year, and 
now  the  average  time  seems  to  be  much  greater  than  a  year.  The 
last  one  of  these  went  about  50  months  without  a  decision  ever 
having been reached. 

What we are saying is, do not leave the openers in there; do not 
allow the decisionmakers at the end of the game to not make a de-
cision. We are not trying to cut the States out of the process in any 
way.  The  States  get  to  participate  all  the  way  through  the  appeal, 
to the appeal process. They are involved. There is no indication on 
our  behalf  that  they  should  be  taken  out  of  it.  We  are  only  sug-
gesting that we come to a conclusion of the process. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, would you think that 270 days was an un-
warranted period of time to make that decision in the appeal proc-
ess? 

Mr.  FRY.  We  would  certainly  like  to  see  it  be  shorter.  But  if  you 

have anything that ends, that would be good. 

Senator SNOWE. Ms. Chasis, could you respond to Mr. Fry’s com-
ments?  What  can  we  do  to  make  it  more  predictable?  What  would 
you support? 

Ms.  CHASIS.  Right.  I  think  that  the  way  it  is  structured  in  the 
proposed NOAA rule makes some sense, where it has 270 days for 
submission of briefs and information. Remember that the issues on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

appeal  are  new;  they  are  de  novo.  In  other  words,  the  question  is, 
does  the—the  Secretary  is  deciding  whether  the  activity  that  the 
State  has  objected  to  is  consistent  with  the  purposes  of  the  CZMA 
or  is  needed  in  the  interest  of  national  security.  That  is  the  first 
time those questions are addressed. 

So  there  is  a  need  to  allow  time  to  submit  information  on  that. 
What the proposed rule does, which the Senate energy bill as I un-
derstand  it  that  will  be  marked  up  tomorrow  does  not  do,  is  the 
proposed  rule  does  allow  an  extension  of  that  270  days  to  permit 
the  Secretary  to  receive  the  final  environmental  impact  statement 
on the project or the biological opinion under the Endangered Spe-
cies Act, or by the mutual agreement of the parties. 

We think those are important caveats. The project cannot go for-
ward  in  any  event  until  there  is  a  final  EIS  or  biological  opinion, 
so  having  that  reopener  or  allowing  for  that  to  occur  would  not— 
should  not  delay  the  project.  So  we  think  that  that  approach  is 
preferable to what we understand is in the Senate energy bill. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  see.  Would  that  be  offered  as  an  amendment? 
Ms.  CHASIS.  I  think  it  is  in  the  energy  mark,  in  the  bill  that  is 

in the mark. 

Senator SNOWE. The Chairman’s mark. 
Dr. Hudson, would you like to respond? 
Dr. HUDSON. Well, the council does not—as you know, it is a de-
liberative  body,  but  it  is  not  a  decisionmaking  body,  and  we  have 
survived  for  more  than  15  years  because  we  have—well,  there  are 
certain things we cannot talk about. We cannot talk about fish, for 
example. However, we end up talking about fish by stimulating re-
search  into  where  young  lobsters  breed  on  the  coast  of  Maine,  or 
trying  to  understand  ecosystems  on  the  bottom  of  the  ocean  in  the 
Gulf, and therefore we try to assist the ultimate Federal and State 
decisionmakers  by  gathering  information  and  providing  a  forum 
where  people  can  talk  about  difficult  issues,  knowing  that  there  is 
not  a  decision  that  is  pending  in  an  hour  or  2  hours  or  270  days. 
My  experience  with  the  council  is  that  these  kinds  of  formal  fo-
rums  that  bring  together  resource  people,  primarily  from  State 
agencies and Federal agencies—there are only a handful of us who 
do not belong to those kinds of organizations who participate—and 
my  experience  is  that  it  is  a  good  place  to  try  to  gain  consensus 
on  issues  without  worrying  about  how  many  tons  of  cod  can  be 
caught this year. 

Senator SNOWE. Mr. Jeffress. 
Mr.  JEFFRESS.  I  think  any  time  we  can  bring  certainty  to  the 
process by picking a date specific is good. But I think what we need 
to  do  is  look  earlier  into  the  process.  As  Senator  Stevens  men-
tioned,  a  lot  of  these  processes  should  be  rolled  into  one  review, 
and  by  the  time  you  get  to  the  point  for  an  appeal  most  of  the  ef-
forts have been exhausted in coming to a compromise. 

In  Alaska,  one  of  the  reasons  for  the  establishment  of  the  Office 
of Project Management and Permitting was to do just that, is to get 
the  qualified  people  to  sit  at  the  table  with  the  Federal  agencies 
and with industry and develop a process where it was all-inclusive, 
where  we  were  not  waiting  at  the  last  minute  for  NMFS  to  come 
up with their EFH evaluation or Endangered Species, and the con-
sistency  determination  was  part  of  the  NEPA  analysis.  This  way 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

all of these issues were out on the table first and you did not have 
to go to court to restart the NEPA process or to initiate it to begin 
with after a consistency determination. 

We  are  finding  it  is  very  effective  with  MOUs  with  MMS  and 
some  of  the  other  Federal  agencies  to  become  part  of  the  NEPA 
analysis  and  roll  the  consistency  analysis  into  this.  We  have  had 
a  couple  occasions  where  we  have  actually  done  consistency  anal-
ysis  on  the  preferred  alternative  after  NEPA  was  complete  and  it 
was inconsistent with the local enforceable policy. 

That  really  puts  industry  and  government  behind  the  eight  ball. 
So by being established or part of the team early on, we have been 
able to circumvent some of these problems that are facing industry 
and government planning. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Chairman Stevens. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, I am sort of stymied by this because under 
the  CZMA  the  State  makes  a  plan  and  submits  it  to  the  Federal 
agency  for  approval.  I  have  got  to  assume  that  that  is  worked  out 
with  the  Federal  agency,  there  is  approval  of  a  plan.  Then  along 
comes  an  application  to  do  something  either  by  a  non–State  entity 
or by a State entity or a Federal entity and someone raises a ques-
tion  of  consistency  with  the  plan.  At  the  same  time  that  happens, 
as  Mr.  Jeffress  mentions,  we  have  a  wetlands  determination,  we 
have  an  Endangered  Species  Act  determination,  we  have  a  NEPA 
determination, all of which start about the same time, but they go 
on independently of CZMA. 

As  a  consequence,  we  end  up,  as  we  did  in  the  Alaska  oil  pipe-
line, with Congress taking 4 years to finally reach a conclusion that 
the  applicant  to  build  the  pipeline  had  complied  with  all  of  those 
acts  and  a  court  could  not—no  court  could  review  that  decision. 
That  was  the  final  pipeline  act  decision  and  it  was  a  50–50  vote, 
broken by the Vice President. 

Now,  that  was  a  cause  celebre.  But  we  are  talking  about  now 
routine  things  within  each  State.  Normally  the  State  is  taking  the 
position  that  it  wants  to  do  something  and  the  Federal  agency  is 
saying, you cannot do it, or some non–Federal agency is saying that 
is  inconsistent  with  the  plan  that  the  Secretary  has  already  ap-
proved. 

I  think  that  we  have  to  find  some  way  to  bring  these  together 
and find a way to get a panel, so that if there is an objection under 
wetlands,  or  if  you  bring  in  Endangered  Species  and  NEPA  and 
CZMA, any one of them triggers a panel that says: Look, let us lis-
ten  to  the  objection,  let  us  take  into  account  everything,  but  it  is 
going to be decided in a framework of time that everybody has got 
to work within. 

I  do  not  know  yet  whether  the  Congress  is  ready  to  do  that,  but 
very  clearly  a  lot,  Ms.  Chasis,  is  going  to  depend  on  organizations 
such  as  yours.  The  environmental  organizations  are  the  ones  that 
are  primarily  demanding  these  consistency  actions,  that  are  hold-
ing up a final decision on development of oil and gas or energy con-
siderations about 4 years on the average. 

Ms. CHASIS. May I respond? 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

Ms. CHASIS. With the consistency provisions, it is the States that 
make  the  determination.  We  cannot—the  environmental  groups 
may  advocate  for  a  particular  position,  but  it  is  really  a  question 
of is the State objecting to the applicant’s project. The State cannot 
do that arbitrarily. It has to be looking at the—— 

The CHAIRMAN. That is only under CZMA. 
Ms. CHASIS. Right. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  You  go  right  at  the  other  objections  that  are 
equally  time-consuming.  What  I  am  saying  is  we  ought  to  find  a 
way to take and review consistency with applicable Federal laws to 
oil and gas development, particularly to gas development, within a 
period  of  time  that  is  reasonable  and  yet  explores  the  whole,  so  it 
gives everybody a chance to be heard, but gets a decision made. 

I  think—I  do  not  know  about  Maine.  The  Maine  gas  facility  is 
going  to  be  on  Indian  land  as  I  understand  it,  but  the  State  may 
well  be  in  a  position  to  object  to  that,  or  someone  else  will  object 
to it under one of these acts, and how long is it going to take? 

We  are  in—I  am  being  redundant,  but  I  have  spent  too  much 
time  studying  the  problem  of  the  natural  gas  shortage  in  the 
United  States  and  I  have  come  to  the  plain  conclusion  that  if  we 
do  not  have  the  facilities  for  taking  the  LNG  ashore  it  is  going  to 
go  ashore  somewhere  else,  because  there  is  just  so  much  of  that 
available  in  the  world  and  we  are  going  to  be  competing  not  only 
in price, but for quantity. We have to have these facilities. We have 
to have them in place by 2015. 

So  I  think  this  Congress  has  the  duty  to  find  some  way  to  cut 
through  this  and  say,  OK—I  am  not  asking  to  repeal  the  Endan-
gered  Species  Act,  to  repeal  the  Wetlands  Act,  or  to  change  CZMA 
or  to  change  NEPA  in  any  way.  All  I  am  saying  is  let  us  make  all 
reviews simultaneous and get a decision. If the decision is you can-
not build in Maine, we will have to go somewhere else. 

Now,  I  like  the  suggestion  that  was  made  previously  by  Ms. 
Cooksey,  and  that  is  maybe  we  should  find  some  way  to  decide,  to 
take  a  look  at  a  whole  region  at  a  time  and  get  everyone  to  agree 
where  is  the  best  place  to  locate  these  gas  facilities  on  the  North-
east  coast,  the  Southeast  coast,  the  Gulf  coast,  California  or  the 
West Coast, or Alaska. I do not think Alaska is going to need one. 
We  are  going  to  be  in  a  position  of  moving  gas  out  of  Alaska,  not 
bringing it to Alaska. 

But I do think, Senator Snowe, it is going to be this committee’s 
role to try and find some way to put these things together. I intend 
to write that letter to Senator Domenici and see if the Energy Com-
mittee  will  cooperate  with  us  to  try  and  find  a  way  for  both  com-
mittees  to  come  to  the  conclusion  of  how  to  do  this—how  to  expe-
dite  the  review  of  any  application  to  bring  liquefied  natural  gas 
ashore. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Madam Chairman. 
Mr.  Fry,  the  industry  wants  the  final  authority  on  State  objec-
tions  to  move  from  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  to  the  Secretary  of 
the  Interior.  There  have  been  only  14  State  appeals  related  to  the 
outer  continental  shelf  oil  and  gas  activity.  The  Secretary  of  Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

merce  has  sided  with  the  States  in  only  seven,  seven  of  these.  It 
seems  to  me  the  system  is  working  pretty  good,  so  why  should— 
why should we make the change and not continue it as is with the 
Secretary of Commerce? 

Mr.  FRY.  Senator,  we  do  understand  that  that  is  a  controversial 
suggestion. The reason we raise it is that we feel like that because 
these  appeals  now  have  gotten  so  long  and  so  drug  out  over  a  pe-
riod  of  time—and  it  is  because  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  con-
tinues to say, I do not have enough information. Well, the informa-
tion  is  available  at  the  Department  of  the  Interior.  They  have 
worked  this  issue.  They  have  worked  it  from  day  one  with  the 
States,  working  on  consistency.  The  States  have  made  their  ideas 
known.  They  have  worked  with  the  EPA,  they  have  worked  with 
NMFS  on  different  permits,  all  of  which  relate  to  the  consistency 
determination. 

We think the expertise is at the Department of Interior to decide 
what  the  record  needs  to  be  and  also  it  has  a  better  ability  to  go 
ahead  and  make  a  decision  based  on  the  fact  that  the  expertise 
rests there. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It does not seem like the system is broken. 
There  are  so  many  other  problems  associated  with  decisions  about 
drilling.  Do  you  get  a  hint  that  maybe  some  of  the  limitations  on 
drilling in the outer continental shelf might be lifted in the energy 
bill? 

Mr. FRY. Well, we have for years—our association was formed to 
deal with the question of access, both economic access and physical 
access,  to  our  oceans  for  the  development  of  energy  projects.  We 
have  continued  to  advocate  for  some  sort  of  lifting  of  the  morato-
rium.  That  is  not  to  suggest  that  we  think  you  should  be  drilling 
everywhere  all  the  time.  We  also  think  that  the  industry  has 
shown  an  incredible  ability  to  produce  vast  amounts  of  energy  for 
this  country  in  a  safe  and  environmentally  productive  way.  The 
technology  has  advanced  so  far  over  the  last  10  to  20  years  that 
now  this  is  the  NASA  of  the  next  century.  The  work  that  is  going 
on, the kinds of development that are taking place, where satellites 
are  involved,  where  computers  are  involved,  where  you  can  drill 
into  10,000  feet  of  water  and  into  incredible  depths  within  the 
crust of the Earth, and even look and see what you are doing while 
you are doing it. 

That  kind  of  technology  allows  us  to  produce  this  energy  in  a 
safe way that it does not affect the environment. We think that the 
paradigm  that  we  have  lived  in  of  moratoria  is  not  the  best  way 
to  make  decisions.  We  ought  to  be  making  them  on  good  science 
and on good information. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Do you think all of this can be done with-
out affecting the ecology of the oceans? We see man’s effect on coral 
reefs  and  things  like  that,  a  diminution  of  fish  stocks.  All  kinds  of 
things  are  happening  out  there  and  we  cannot  afford  to  ignore 
what the effects of man’s intervention into nature’s structure. 

I  particularly  am  one  of  those  who  is  concerned—listen,  I  know 
that  we  have  got  tremendous  problems  with  energy,  but  there  are 
some  other  ways  to  solve  these  problems.  I  have  never  heard—I 
have rarely heard the word ‘‘conservation’’ used in this country. We 
do  not  see  the  oil  companies,  the  car  companies,  people  rushing  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

do  the  things  that  seem  to  come  naturally  in  some  other  countries 
in terms of better CAFE standards and all those. 

I am preaching to Dr. Hudson and Ms. Chasis here, and perhaps 

Mr. Jeffress. 

Dr. Hudson, I am very interested in ocean and coastal education 
and  I  am  currently  developing  some  coastal  education  legislation 
that  would  engage  traditionally  underrepresented  groups.  Now,  in 
your programs in Maine do you have an initiative that targets the 
Native  American  groups  as  well  in  terms  of  educating  them  about 
what appropriate use might be? 

Dr.  HUDSON.  Senator  Lautenberg,  we  are  starting  one.  We  have 
had a couple meetings in the last month with education folks in the 
Penobscot Indian Nation and they are coming down to our place on 
June  1st.  We  are  going  to  see  how  we  can  help  them  achieve  the 
stated goals of some legislation that passed in Maine last year that 
said  that  every  child  shall  have  some  experience—it  did  not  say 
specifically  where—K–12—in  understanding  the  history  and  cul-
ture of Native peoples in the State. 

We  were  very  pleased  when  they  reached  out  to  us  and  we  are 
happy  to  see  where  it  goes.  At  this  point,  it  is  such  an  early  stage 
that I cannot give you any more information than that. But I would 
be  happy  to  make  sure  that  you  or  people  in  your  office  get  some 
reports as they come out. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Madam  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much. 
Mr.  Jeffress,  when  you  talk  about  the  uninhabited  coastline  up 
in  Alaska,  I  am  an  Alaskophile.  I  love  the  State  and  the  beautiful 
country  and  the  birds  and  the  fish  and  all  that.  I  have  been  up 
there  too  few  times,  but  whenever  I  have  gone  up  I  have  gone  up 
with my son. In our family we think nature is really important and 
we like to play with it and work with it and try to protect it. 

But  the  prospect  that  1  percent  of  the  coastline  being  used,  but 
you cannot get there from here, as you said—but it is one beautiful 
place  and  we  hope  that  it  will  continue  to  be  protected  and  that 
some  day  we  will  make  certain,  Mr.  Fry,  that  the  possibilities  of 
an Exxon Valdez cannot happen. But so far we know it can happen 
and we have to be wary of it. 

Thanks. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
I thank our panelists. I wish we had more time to further explore 
these  issues,  but  you  have  been  very  helpful  today  in  your  testi-
mony  and  your  input  as  we  start  to  focus  on  some  of  the  issues 
that have made it difficult to secure a reauthorization of the Coast-
al Zone Management Act. Perhaps it is possible this year. 

But  I  thank  you  and  we  will  be  following  up  with  each  of  you. 
The  record  will  remain  open  for  2  weeks  for  any  additional  com-
ments and testimony. Thank you. This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:06 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
Thank  you  Madam  Chairman.  I  would  also  like  to  recognize  you  and  Senator 
Kerry  for  your  past  work  in  protecting  our  coast  and  for  your  work  this  Congress 
on S. 360, the Coastal Zone Enhancement Reauthorization Act of 2005. 

As  a  Senator  from  California,  a  state  that  values  and  cherishes  its  coast,  the 
Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  is  of  upmost  importance  to  the  people  of  California. 
Indeed, few other places on earth depend on the coast as does California. 

More  than  21  million  Californians  live  in  coastal  counties—roughly  64  percent  of 
the  State’s  population.  The  California  coast  encompasses  three  National  Parks  and 
four  National  Marine  Sanctuaries.  It  is  home  to  dozens  of  threatened  and  endan-
gered  species,  including  the  Short  Tailed  Albatross,  California  Gnatcatcher,  sea  ot-
ters, Chinook & Coho salmon, Steelhead trout, Guadalupe fur seal, and several spe-
cies  of  whales.  The  natural  treasure  that  is  the  California  coast  draws  tourists  by 
the  millions  and  accounts  for  $51  billion  dollars  annually  for  the  State’s  economy. 
In  2000,  people  spent  over  $2.2  billion  on  recreational  fishing  off  our  coasts.  In 
short,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  protection  of  California’s  coast  is  not  just  an  environ-
mental necessity, it’s an economic necessity. 

The  CZMA  is  one  of  the  most  important  tools  states  have  to  protect  their  coasts. 
It represents a unique and carefully crafted partnership between coastal states and 
the Federal Government. Through this partnership, the CZMA has given states and 
local  coastal  governments  a  meaningful  voice  in  Federal  actions  and  decisions  that 
directly affect the environmental quality of their local communities. 

The heart of the Act is the ‘‘Federal Consistency’’ provision—the requirement that 
Federal agency activities that impact the coastal zone be consistent with the state’s 
Federally  approved  Coastal  Management  Program.  The  Consistency  provision  gives 
communities  assurance—assurance  that  Federal  actions  that  do  not  comply  with  a 
state’s coastal program will not go forward. 

Madam  Chairman,  this  Act  is  a  model  of  Federal-state  cooperation—in  an  era 
where  we  are  being  constantly  told  by  some  political  leaders  that  we  must  respect 
states’ rights, it would be wrong to undermine such a law. 

Yet despite this, there are proposals floating around to change the CZMA’s essen-
tial protections. Some are proposing giving veto power over a state’s Consistency ap-
peals  on  Outer  Continental  Shelf  issues  to  the  Secretary  of  the  Interior.  As  few 
things  constitute  more  of  a  threat  to  the  well-being  and  health  of  the  California 
coast  than  offshore  oil  and  gas  drilling,  such  a  change  would  be  disastrous  to  my 
state. 

The  House  Energy  Bill  also  contains  provisions  that  would  put  states  at  a  major 
disadvantage during the appeals process by closing the appeal record just 120 days 
after an appeal is filed—a time frame far too short for our states. 

In  February  of  this  year,  I  was  proud  to  work  in  a  bipartisan  fashion  with  my 
colleague, Senator Dole, by sending a letter to key Senate Energy Committee mem-
bers, asking them to avoid attempts to weaken the state moratoria on offshore drill-
ing. 

Madam Chairman, we should be celebrating the partnership that this Act creates, 
not undermining it. This Committee needs to be vigilant of attempts to weaken the 
protections  of  the  CZMA.  I  am  grateful  that  the  Snowe-Kerry  reauthorization  bill 
does not weaken the CZMA. 

As  Members  of  the  United  States  Senate,  let’s  reassure  the  states  that  the  Fed-
eral  Government  will  keep  its  promise  to  coastal  states—let’s  move  forward  with  a 
reauthorized  CZMA  that  will  keep  the  model  partnership  alive  and  our  coasts  pro-
tected. 

(69) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE NATIONAL ESTUARINE RESEARCH RESERVE 

ASSOCIATION (NERRA) 

Introduction 

Since  1987,  NERRA  has  been  dedicated  to  science-based  management  of  our  na-
tion’s estuaries and coastal systems, and serves as the primary advocate for the Na-
tional  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  (NERRS),  a  network  of  26  (soon  to  be 
27)  regionally-based  programs  representing  diverse  estuarine  and  coastal  eco-
systems  throughout  the  United  States  and  its  territories.  Through  a  state-Federal 
partnership  codified  in  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA),  reserves  play  a 
critical role in national efforts to sustain healthy estuaries and coastal communities. 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  support  science-based  coastal  management 
through long-term research, monitoring, education, and stewardship. 
National Estuarine Research Reserve System (NERRS) 

The  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  (NERRS),  established  under 
section 315 of the CZMA, is designed to promote informed coastal decisions through 
site-based  estuarine  research,  education,  and  stewardship.  NERRS  sites  have  been 
selected  on  the  basis  of  biogeographic  regions  that  share  geophysical  and  biological 
characteristics.  Coastal  states  are  responsible  for  management  of  reserve  sites,  in 
cooperation with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). 

Since  the  enactment  of  the  CZMA  in  1972,  26  estuaries  have  been  designated  as 
part of the reserve system including Alaska and Puerto Rico, with an additional site 
in  Texas  expected  to  be  designated  later  this  year.  Reserves  serve  as  regional  cen-
ters  of  excellence  where  coastal  communities  can  access  a  broad  array  of  coastal 
products and services, including: (1) training to promote informed environmental de-
cision-making;  (2)  a  national  monitoring  program  for  estuaries  is  maintained;  and 
(3) education opportunities are provided to students and the public. With these key 
elements, the reserve system is in the unique position of serving the national inter-
est while responding to local needs. 

In  addition,  the  reserve  system  is  poised  to  help  carry  out  the  recommendations 
of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy.  The  Commission  recommended  that  effec-
tive  policies  be  based  on  unbiased,  credible,  and  up-to-date  scientific  information. 
The Commission stated that this will require a significant investment in coastal and 
ocean  research  and  monitoring  and  the  ability  to  translate  scientific  findings  into 
useful information products for coastal decision makers. The reserve system not only 
conducts  scientific  research  and  estuarine  monitoring,  but  provides  training  oppor-
tunities to help inform coastal decision making. The Commission also recommended 
that  there  is  an  urgent  need  to  strengthen  the  Nation’s  coastal  and  ocean  literacy, 
including  improving  decision  makers’  understanding  of  the  coasts  and  oceans,  pre-
paring  a  new  generation  of  leaders  on  ocean  issues,  and  cultivating  a  broad  public 
stewardship  ethic.  Through  the  NERRS  education  and  training  programs,  the  sys-
tem is well-suited to meet these goals. 

Estuaries—dynamic  regions  where  rivers  meet  the  sea—constitute  an  important 
interface between land use and coastal resources. Considered to be among the most 
biologically  productive  ecosystems  on  Earth,  healthy  estuaries  are  essential  to  the 
preservation  of  robust  coastal  communities.  Estuaries  support  vital  nurseries  for 
economically important fish and shellfish, provide essential habitat for wildlife, cre-
ate  opportunities  for  ecotourism,  and  serve  as  ports  for  maritime  commerce.  The 
NERRS and Coastal Zone Management Programs contribute to the informed use of 
these  estuarine-dependent  resources  through  an  integrated  program  of  research, 
education,  and  stewardship,  as  well  as  implementation  of  state  coastal  zone  man-
agement plans. 

Local  and  regional  land  use  decisions  continue  to  contribute  to  degradation  of 
water  quality  and  loss  of  wetland  habitat.  Land  use  in  watersheds,  ranging  from 
agriculture  and  development  to  water  resource  allocation  and  flood  control,  are  be-
coming increasingly important factors for coastal and estuarine management. Local 
elected  officials,  land  use  planners,  government  agencies,  and  agricultural  interests 
are often asked to make land use decisions without sufficient information regarding 
the potential consequences to downstream effects. 

To  meet  these  challenges,  the  NERRS  has  developed  several  system-wide  pro-
grams to place reserves in a strong position to detect environmental change, respond 
to  pressing  research  needs  at  the  local  and  regional  scale,  and  to  provide  technical 
training for the coastal stakeholder community: 

• The NERRS System-Wide Monitoring Program is designed to provide standard-
ized  monitoring  and  assessment  capabilities  at  each  reserve  to  detect  changes 
in  water  quality,  biological  indicators,  and  land  use  change  at  the  watershed 
scale. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

• The NERRS Graduate Research Fellowship Program supports two graduate re-
search  projects  at  each  reserve  annually  on  coastal  management  topics  of  con-
cern to local and regional stakeholders. Research topics range from stormwater 
management and restoration ecology to invasive exotic plants and fishery habi-
tat requirements. 

• The NERRS Coastal Training Program target individuals involved in local plan-
ning and management. Training activities provide science-based information on 
topics responsive to local needs such as polluted runoff, watershed management, 
water supply, and restoration science. 

Education and Training 
Coastal Training Program 

One  of  the  most  significant  challenges  in  managing  the  Nation’s  coasts  today  is 
the  need  to  link  science-based  information  to  local  coastal  communities.  Decisions 
made by coastal communities can have profound, long-term consequences for estua-
rine  and  coastal  environments.  Elected  officials,  land  use  planners,  regulatory  per-
sonnel,  coastal  managers,  and  agricultural  and  fisheries  interests  are  key  decision 
makers  who  often  do  not  have  adequate  access  to  relevant  science-based  informa-
tion,  training,  or  available  technology  to  make  informed  decisions  affecting  the 
coast.  Building  on  past  success  with  services  for  coastal  decision-makers,  the 
NERRS has developed the Coastal Training Program to fill this need. 

The  Coastal  Training  Program  provides  the  best  available  science-based  informa-
tion, tools, and techniques to individuals and groups that are making important de-
cisions about resources in coastal watersheds, estuaries, and nearshore waters. Pro-
grams  have  taken  the  form  of  workshops,  seminars,  distance  learning,  technology 
applications  and  demonstrations.  Opportunities  for  information  exchange  and  skill 
training  are  expanding  coastal  management  networks  and  collaboration  across  sec-
tors,  and  improving  local  understanding  of  the  environmental,  social,  and  economic 
consequences  of  human  activity  in  the  coastal  zone.  These  programs  also  make  use 
of field experiences, relevant research and monitoring, and facilities provided by the 
reserves. 

The  Coastal  Training  Program  was  designed  to  increase  the  current  capacity  of 
reserves  to  deliver  technical  training  services  to  under-served  constituent  groups. 
Reserve  staff  continue  to  work  closely  with  state  coastal  programs  and  others  to 
identify critical issues in the region and key coastal decision-makers that could ben-
efit most from relevant science and training. Coastal Training Program participants 
have included state and local elected and appointed officials, agency staff, volunteer 
boards,  members  of  NGOs,  business  organizations,  and  state  and  regional  profes-
sional associations whose daily decisions impact coastal resources. 

Reserve staff are implementing the Coastal Training Program in partnership with 
national  and  local  organizations.  At  the  national  level,  NOAA’s  Estuarine  Reserves 
Division  provides  strategic  and  budget  planning  and  support  in  partnership  with 
NOAA’s  Coastal  Management  Programs,  Sea  Grant,  and  the  Coastal  Services  Cen-
ter.  At  the  local  and  regional  levels,  individual  reserves  are  developing  Coastal 
Training  Program  partnerships  with  state  coastal  programs,  Sea  Grant  programs, 
local  universities  and  researchers,  professional  organizations,  local  government 
agencies,  non-profit  organizations,  and  a  variety  of  others  with  expertise,  skills, 
training sites, and logistical support. 
K–12 Estuarine Education Program 

During 2004, reserves engaged over 80,000 students in K–12 education programs, 
and  3,000  teachers  in  professional  development  programs.  EstuaryLive  alone—an 
annual  interactive  virtual  field  trip  designed  to  increase  students  understanding 
about  estuaries—engaged  13,600  students  and  teachers  during  the  broadcast.  As 
recommended  by  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy,  there  is  an  urgent  need  to 
strengthen  the  Nation’s  coastal  and  ocean  literacy.  With  a  coordinated  network  of 
educators,  the  NERRS  is  positioned  to  increase  public  awareness  about  estuaries 
and  coastal  systems.  Building  on  site-based  education  efforts,  the  NERRS  is  devel-
oping a system-wide K–12 education program. This program would allow the reserve 
system  to  network  more  efficiently  across  the  country,  generate  and  disseminate 
educational products that use data generated by ocean observing systems to the K– 
12  community,  share  and  exchange  resources,  and  enhance  efforts  to  incorporate 
ocean and coastal science into local curricula. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Research and Monitoring 
Graduate Research Fellowship Program 

72 

Estuaries  are  highly  variable,  complex  systems  where  the  variability  in  water 
movement,  water  quality,  habitat,  and  human  use  vary  over  a  wide  variety  of  spa-
tial  and  temporal  scales.  Because  of  this  variability,  it  is  often  difficult  to  separate 
natural change from those changes influenced by human use of our coasts and estu-
aries.  Two  approaches  are  necessary  to  address  this  issue.  First,  targeted  research 
is needed to determine the cause and effect relationships of human influence on es-
tuarine variability, and second, a long-term monitoring program is needed to charac-
terize  the  natural  variability  that  governs  the  structure  and  function  of  estuarine 
systems.  The  reserve  system  has  begun  building  the  capability  to  meet  these  man-
agement needs. 

The  NERRS  is  addressing  the  first  need  through  the  Graduate  Research  Fellow-
ship  program  where  students  across  the  Nation  compete  to  work  on  priority  needs 
of the coastal management community. 

Up to fifty-two graduate students per year receive support from this program and 
present results of their research at national, regional, and local meetings where in-
formation  is  transferred  to  other  researchers,  coastal  managers,  and  those  individ-
uals responsible for making daily decisions with respect to our coastal and estuarine 
resources. 

In addition to the graduate research program, reserve sites are being actively pro-
moted  as  sites  for  long-term  research  by  many  granting  agencies  such  as  the  Na-
tional Science Foundation, Environmental Protection Agency and, of course, NOAA. 
This  promotion  directs  researchers  from  throughout  the  country  to  conduct  long- 
term studies in estuarine research reserves. 
System-wide Monitoring Program 

With  respect  to  the  second  need,  that  of  a  long-term,  estuarine  monitoring  capa-
bility,  the  NERRS  operates  the  only  national  monitoring  program  for  estuaries  in 
the  United  States.  In  1995,  the  NERRS  established  the  System-wide  Monitoring 
Program.  This  program  is  designed  to  identify  short-term  variability  and  long-term 
trends  and  changes  in  coastal  ecosystems,  including  locations  that  span  the  range 
of  coastal  environments  from  estuaries  and  coastal  waters  to  watersheds.  The  pro-
gram  focuses  efforts  on  three  critical  areas:  estuarine  water  quality;  estuarine  bio-
diversity; and estuarine land use and habitat change. 

The  System-wide  Monitoring  Program  provides  valuable  long-term  data  on  water 
quality  and  weather  at  frequent  time  intervals.  Coastal  managers  use  this  moni-
toring  data  to  make  informed  decisions  on  local  and  regional  issues,  such  as  ‘‘no- 
discharge’’  zones  for  boats  and  measuring  the  success  of  restoration  projects.  Peri-
odic  syntheses  of  data  are  expected  to  serve  as  one  of  the  mechanisms  by  which 
coastal  managers  can  inform  their  decision-making  responsibilities.  In  addition  to 
serving  regional  research  and  coastal  management  needs,  the  System-wide  Moni-
toring  Program  is  designed  to  enhance  the  value  and  vision  of  the  26  reserves  as 
a system of national references sites. 

Future  efforts  will  focus  on  the  expansion  of  biological  monitoring  at  all  reserves 
and tracking habitat and land use changes through remote sensing techniques. Ex-
pansion  of  the  SWMP  effort  is  aimed  at  adding  to  the  current  system  of  environ-
mental  observations  made  at  reserves.  This  will  be  addressed  through  spatial  ex-
pansion  of  the  monitoring  system,  and  the  addition  of  new  monitoring  parameters 
such  as  nutrients.  When  fully  implemented,  the  System-wide  Monitoring  Program 
will  provide  valuable  long-term,  integrated  data  on  water  quality,  weather,  biota, 
land use, and habitat change within the National Estuarine Research Reserves. 

All  numerical  data  sets  collected  by  the  System-wide  Monitoring  Program  are 
compiled,  subjected  to  a  rigorous  quality  assurance  protocol,  and  the  database  and 
associated  metadata  are  submitted  to  the  NERRS  Centralized  Data  Management 
Office at the University of South Carolina Belle W. Baruch Institute of Marine and 
Coastal  Sciences.  Following  final  quality  assurance,  the  Centralized  Data  Manage-
ment  Office  disseminates  all  system-wide  data  and  summary  statistics  over  the 
World Wide Web (http://inlet.geol.sc.edu/nerrscdmo.html) where researchers, coast-
al managers, and educators readily access the information. 

The  water  quality  and  meteorological  monitoring  components  of  the  System-wide 
Monitoring  Program  have  been  recognized  as  a  fundamental  backbone  element  in 
the  national  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS)  framework,  and  the  re-
serve  system  is  currently  developing  and  testing  near  real  time  data  delivery  sys-
tems that include real time data quality control. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

Resource Stewardship 

In  addition  to  research,  monitoring,  education,  and  training,  reserves  are  devel-
oping resource stewardship and coastal restoration programs that address both site- 
specific  and  watershed-scale  information  needs.  Resource  stewardship  is  an  essen-
tial component of the NERRS mission and ensures that site conditions remain suit-
able  for  long-term  research  and  education  programs.  Stewardship  activities  include 
the eradication of exotic species, restoration of natural hydrologic processes, and the 
conduct  of  prescribed  burns  in  fire-dependent  plant  communities.  NERRS  staff  also 
has  built  strong  partnerships  with  local  agencies,  organizations,  and  landowners  to 
develop  watershed  management  strategies,  and  Best  Management  Practices  that 
mitigate disturbance to water quality and habitat structure. 
Partnerships 

The  NERRS  enjoy  a  strong  relationship  with  its  Federal  partner,  the  National 
Ocean  Service  at  NOAA.  The  state-Federal  partnership,  a  hallmark  of  the  NERRS, 
is  strong.  NOAA  has  been  increasing  its  service  to  the  NERRS,  especially  training, 
materials,  and  assistance  with  site  profiles  from  the  Coastal  Service  Center,  and 
providing  opportunities  for  the  reserves  to  play  a  larger  role  in  coastal  science  pro-
grams at the agency. 

Reserves  also  leverage  significant  resources  on  behalf  of  coastal  research,  edu-
cation,  and  management  through  partnerships  with  government  agencies  at  local, 
regional, and Federal levels, private industry, and academia. For example, the Hud-
son  River  Reserve  received  approximately  $2  million  in  funding  from  the  state  of 
New  York,  Columbia  University,  and  the  Hudson  River  Foundation  to  characterize 
the  benthic  habitat  of  the  Hudson  River.  The  Jacques  Cousteau  Reserve  received 
more than $1 million from Federal, state, and private sources to investigate coastal 
processes at a Long-term Ecosystem Observatory, and to develop science enrichment 
programs  for  the  precollegiate  community  based  on  this  field  program.  At  the  Elk-
horn  Slough  Reserve,  a  partnership  with  the  Elkhorn  Slough  Foundation,  National 
Audubon Society, and the Monterey County Planning Department is gathering crit-
ical  resource  information  for  a  regional  watershed  plan.  The  plan  will  be  used  to 
guide future land use in the watershed surrounding the reserve. 
Reauthorization of the CZMA 

Reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  provides  an  opportunity  to  strengthen  the  capabili-
ties of coastal communities to address issues of coastal development, protection, and 
habitat  restoration.  Of  particular  importance  to  the  NERRS,  is  the  framework  pro-
vided  by  the  CZMA  to  meet  the  need  for  informed  decision-making  at  the  Federal, 
state, and local levels. 

coastal communities at local and regional scales; 

Amendments to the Act should: 
• Provide effective mechanisms to assess the technology and information needs of 
• Strengthen  the  capacity  of  the  state-Federal  partnership  to  support  research 
• Improve the access and delivery of science-based information to coastal commu-
nities, and evaluate the performance of the state-Federal partnership in support 
of informed coastal decisions. 

and monitoring relevant to local and regional needs; and 

Specifically, NERRA offers the following recommendations in support of reauthor-

ization of the Coastal Zone Management Act. 

NERRA  fully  supports  that  S.  360,  the  Coastal  Zone  Enhancement  Reauthoriza-
tion  Act  of  2005,  better  reflects  the  mission  of  the  reserve  system  as  a  network  of 
protected  areas  established  for  long-term  research,  education,  and  stewardship.  We 
want to ensure that the final language provides adequate authority for NERRS’ re-
search and monitoring, education and training, and stewardship programs. 

We  would  respectfully  request  that  the  Committee  include  language  in  the  Con-
gressional  Findings  section  of  the  bill  that  specifically  addresses  the  purpose  and 
need for a national system of estuarine research reserves. Such language should ex-
press  that  the  reserve  system  will  provide  for  protection  of  essential  estuarine  re-
sources, as well as for a network of state-based reserves that will serve as platforms 
for coastal stewardship best-practices, monitoring, research, education, and training 
to improve coastal management and to help translate science and inform coastal de-
cision makers and the public. 

We  also  suggest  that  NERRA’s  vision  of  having  a  reserve  in  every  coastal  and 
Great Lakes state be incorporated into the bill, rather than only the current require-
ment that a reserve contribute to the biogeographical and typological balance of the 
reserve  system.  While  it  is  important  that  new  reserves  contribute  to  the  bio-
geographic  representation  of  the  system,  having  a  reserve  in  every  coastal  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

Great Lakes state would provide the coastal training, education, research, and mon-
itoring opportunities the reserve system offers to each state and each state’s coastal 
program. 

With  respect  to  the  authorization  of  appropriations  section,  NERRA  recommends 
that  for  grants  under  section  315,  the  bill  include  a  reauthorization  beginning  at 
$22 million and increasing by $1 million per year to accommodate new sites, expan-
sion  of  products  and  services,  and  cost  of  living  increases.  An  authorization  at  this 
level  would  allow  the  NERRS  to  add  new  reserves  into  the  system,  enabling  us  to 
work toward our vision of having a reserve in every coastal and Great Lakes state, 
and  would  allow  the  NERRS  to  expand  core  programs  or  more  fully  develop  them, 
such as the K–12 Estuarine Education Program. 

NERRA  endorses  incorporation  of  funding  for  construction  projects  into  the  reau-
thorization  measure,  as  stated  in  S.  360,  but  would  ask  the  Committee  to  include 
acquisition  projects  as  well.  This  would  better  reflect  our  current  appropriations, 
which have been to support both construction and acquisition projects. The NERRS 
have  established  procedures  for  setting  priorities  for  construction  and  land  acquisi-
tion, and recently assembled long-term plans to meet construction and land acquisi-
tion  needs.  Incorporation  of  funds  for  these  purposes  into  the  CZMA  will  provide  a 
stable,  long-term  source  of  funding  for  the  NERRS  to  maintain  facilities  in  support 
of research, education, and stewardship programs, as well as to acquire priority land 
and water areas for watershed management. 
Conclusion 

NERRA  is  very  supportive  of  S.  360  and  appreciates  the  Committee’s  interest  in 
reauthorizing the Coastal Zone Management Act. NERRA is ready to work with you 
in  any  way  to  support  passage  of  S.  360.  We  would  be  pleased  to  provide  further 
information  or  answer  any  questions  you  may  have.  Please  do  not  hesitate  to  con-
tact  the  NERRA  Executive  Director,  Angela  Corridore  (acorridore@sso.org  or  202– 
508–3836), with any questions. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

THOMAS KITSOS, PH.D. 

OCS Environmental Reviews 

Question.  The  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  recommendation  24–2  states 
that  the  MMS  should  conduct  routine  environmental  monitoring  as  part  of  an  ex-
pansion  of  its  environmental  studies  program.  Specifically,  the  Commission  rec-
ommends  conducting  long  term  environmental  research  and  monitoring  at  selected 
OCS  sites.  This  type  of  monitoring  could  provide  valuable  information  on  the  long 
term  and  cumulative  impacts  of  oil  and  gas  development.  How  could  NOAA  work 
with  MMS  on  these  activities,  considering  NOAA’s  responsibility  for  conservation 
and management of habitats and living marine resources? 

Answer.  NOAA  provides  environmental  reviews  through  the  Minerals  Manage-
ment Service’s decision-making process for oil and gas activities on the Outer Conti-
nental  Shelf  (OCS),  pursuant  to  NOAA’s  responsibilities  under  the  National  Envi-
ronmental Policy Act (NEPA), the Endangered Species Act (ESA), the National Ma-
rine Sanctuaries Act (NMSA) and the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and 
Management  Act  (MSFCMA).  For  the  most  part,  environmental  reviews  conducted 
by  NOAA,  and  those  conducted  by  the  coastal  States  under  the  Coastal  Zone  Man-
agement Act (CZMA) occur simultaneously. 

When  the  Minerals  Management  Service  (MMS)  proposes  a  lease  sale  or  deems 
submitted  an  exploration  plan  (EP)  or  development  and  production  plan  (DPP)  for 
Alaska or the Pacific, or a Development Operations Coordination Document (DOCD) 
for  the  Gulf  of  Mexico,  for  OCS  oil  and  gas  activities  under  the  Outer  Continental 
Shelf Lands Act (OCSLA), MMS: 

• initiates review under the OCSLA; 
• begins NEPA compliance; 
• sends  the  EP,  DPP,  or  DOCD  to  the  applicable  coastal  State(s)  for  the  State’s 
review under the OCSLA and the six-month CZMA Federal consistency review; 
and 
• may  also  initiate  formal  or  informal  consultations  under  the  ESA,  NMSA,  and 

MSFCMA (for Essential Fish Habitat or EFH), if required. 

Additionally, MMS works with NOAA to ensure animals protected under the Ma-
rine Mammal Protection Act (MMPA) are appropriately considered. NOAA provides 
substantive review and assistance under these statutes, when appropriate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

In order to improve the environmental review process and make it more efficient, 
NOAA  could  become  involved  earlier  in  the  process,  providing  comments  as  NEPA 
documents  are  being  drafted.  Early  engagement  could  ensure  smooth  coordination 
among the various NOAA offices that are responsible for reviewing proposals. These 
or  similar  procedures  would  allow  agencies  to  address  areas  of  potential  conflict 
early  in  the  process.  Our  experience  with  deepwater  ports  demonstrates  that  early 
involvement  and  internal  coordination  can  work,  but  does  require  additional  effort 
and resources. 

Below  are  brief  descriptions  of  two  of  NOAA’s  programs  and  how  they  relate  to 

MMS responsibilities: 
CZMA Review 

For  EPs,  the  OCSLA  requires  MMS  to  make  its  decision  whether  to  approve  an 
EP  within  30  days  of  receiving  it.  MMS  deems  a  plan  submitted  when  all  informa-
tion  is  received  from  the  applicant  and  MMS  does  not  identify  any  deficiencies 
(under MMS regulations, MMS has 10 working days after receipt of an EP to deter-
mine  whether  additional  information  is  needed).  Within  that  30-day  period,  MMS 
completes its Environmental Assessment (EA) pursuant to NEPA and makes a deci-
sion on the EP. During the 30-day period MMS initiates compliance with other Fed-
eral  mandates  under  CZMA,  ESA,  MMPA,  etc.,  and  NOAA  and  the  States  provide 
input  within  the  time  frames  established  under  those  statutes.  The  OCSLA  30-day 
period does not provide time to complete the State CZMA review process. Therefore, 
the  States’  CZMA  review  is  based  on  the  ‘‘application  to  drill,’’  which  is  a  permit 
described in the EP. The Minerals Management Service does not authorize any drill-
ing until the CZMA process is complete. 

The  process  for  EPs  under  all  statutes  (except  CZMA  appeal  to  the  Secretary  of 
Commerce)  is  generally  completed  within  6  months  from  when  MMS  deems  an  EP 
submitted.  For  example,  once  MMS  deems  an  EP  submitted,  MMS  sends  the  EP 
and  accompanying  information  to  the  State  within  2  working  days  to  meet  OCSLA 
requirements  and  to  avoid  delay  in  the  CZMA  process.  MMS  sends  the  EA  to  the 
State  when  the  EA  is  completed  or,  in  the  Gulf,  forwards  it  upon  request.  Because 
the  State  receives  the  EA  within  a  very  short  period  (10–30  days)  after  the  start 
of  the  six-month  CZMA  review  period,  the  CZMA  process  is  not  delayed  unneces-
sarily. 

For DPPs and DOCDs, MMS has more time to respond to the applicant and com-
ply with the OCSLA, NEPA, CZMA, ESA, MMPA, and other relevant statutes. MMS 
and  State  agencies  have  developed  procedures  to  coordinate  and  streamline  State 
review  of  EPs,  DPPs,  and  DOCDs.  NOAA,  working  closely  with  the  Department  of 
Interior,  has  proposed  amending  the  CZMA  Federal  consistency  regulations  to  pro-
vide a reasonable and definitive deadline for determining CZMA appeals. 
MSFCMA Essential Fish Habitat Reviews 

Under  the  general  goal  of  government  streamlining  and  more  specifically  in  re-
sponse to Administration efforts to streamline the review of energy projects, the Na-
tional  Marine  Fisheries  Service  combines  environmental  reviews,  merges  docu-
ments,  overlaps  review  periods,  and  conducts  programmatic  analyses  so  that 
NOAA’s reviews are combined and occur in a timely manner. NOAA’s Essential Fish 
Habitat  (EFH)  reviews  are  one  of  our  more  visible  mandates.  The  National  Marine 
Fisheries  Service  estimates  that  approximately  99  percent  of  the  roughly  50,000 
EFH consultations completed under NOAA’s EFH guidelines were conducted within 
the time frames established by other Federal statutes and met private sector expec-
tations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

DR. WALTER D. CRUICKSHANK 

OCS Monitoring and Review 

Question  1.  The  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy’s  recommendation  24–2  states 
that  the  MMS  should  conduct  routine  environmental  monitoring  as  part  of  an  ex-
pansion  of  its  environmental  studies  program.  Specifically,  the  Commission  rec-
ommends  conducting  long  term  environmental  research  and  monitoring  at  selected 
Outer Continental Shelf sites. This type of monitoring could provide valuable infor-
mation  on  the  long  term  and  cumulative  impacts  of  oil  and  gas  development.  Does 
the Administration have any plans to implement this recommendation? 

Answer.  The  Minerals  Management  Service  (MMS)  believes  that  the  Commis-
sion’s  recommendation  regarding  long-term  environmental  research  and  monitoring 
at  selected  Outer  Continental  Shelf  (OCS)  sites  is  reasonable.  It  should  be  noted 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

that MMS has conducted and participated in numerous research and monitoring ef-
forts  at  OCS  sites,  and  in  some  cases  obtains  regular  reports  from  industry  of  cer-
tain  environmental  conditions  at  OCS  production  sites.  To  meet  the  increased  de-
mand  for  environmental  information,  the  MMS  environmental  studies  program  has 
aggressively  sought  opportunities  to  leverage  its  available  resources  through 
partnering.  The  U.S.  Geological  Survey  continues  to  focus  about  $2.5  million  annu-
ally  to  meet  some  of  the  biological  research  needs  of  the  MMS.  The  MMS  also  has 
created research partnerships with universities in Louisiana and Alaska, leveraging 
Federal funds on a one-to-one basis amounting to over $3.0 million per year. In ad-
dition,  MMS  partners  with  other  Federal  agencies  including  National  Aeronautics 
and  Space  Administration  (NASA),  Office  of  Naval  Research  (ONR),  National  Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  Environmental  Protection  Agency 
(EPA), and the Department of Energy (DOE) on research projects when common in-
terests  exist,  and  recently  has  accomplished  a  number  of  its  research  objectives 
through leveraging opportunities under the auspices of the National Ocean Partner-
ship  Program  (NOPP).  During  the  past  couple  of  years  MMS  has  used  its  annual 
$17  million  environmental  studies  program  budget  to  leverage  research  amounting 
to $22 to $24 million annually. 

Some of MMS’s ongoing, long-term monitoring activities include: 
• Long-term Monitoring at the East and West Flower Garden Banks. This 20-year 
effort is continuing in an area of the Gulf of Mexico with significant oil and gas 
activities.  It  is  now  being  conducted  cooperatively  with  NOAA  and  is  designed 
to  detect  any  subtle,  chronic  effects  from  natural  and  anthropogenic  activities 
that  could  potentially  endanger  community  integrity.  To  date,  no  significant 
long-term changes have been detected in Flower Garden Banks coral reef popu-
lations, total coral cover, or coral diversity. The live coral cover of greater than 
50 percent at the Flower Garden Banks is one of the highest among U.S. reefs. 
• Monitoring the Distribution of Arctic Whales. This project has conducted aerial 
surveys of the fall migration of bowhead whales each year since 1987 to provide 
an  objective  area-wide  context  for  management  interpretation  of  bowhead  mi-
grations and site-specific study results. 
• Arctic  Nearshore  Impact  Monitoring  in  the  Development  Area  (ANIMIDA  and 
its  continuation,  cANIMIDA).  This  study,  initiated  in  1999,  gathers  long-term 
site-specific monitoring data that will provide a basis of continuity and consist-
ency in evaluation of effects from recent OCS oil and gas development and pro-
duction  in  the  Beaufort  Sea.  Priority  monitoring  issues  have  been  determined 
through  public  and  interagency  comment,  and  coordinated  with  lessees  and 
other organizations. 
• MARINe  (Multi-Agency  Rocky-Intertidal  Network  Monitoring  Study).  This 
study  provides  for  the  monitoring  of  rocky  intertidal  sites  along  the  mainland 
of Southern California adjacent to oil and gas activity and is a joint monitoring 
program with 23 Federal, state, local agencies, and private organizations. It has 
been ongoing since 1991. 
• The  Alaskan  Frozen-Tissue  Collection  and  Associated  Electronic  Database:  A 
Resource  for  Marine  Biotechnology.  Tissues  from  marine  mammals  and  other 
specimens  of  the  Beaufort  Sea,  Cook  Inlet,  Shelikof  Strait,  and  other  planning 
areas have been collected since 1993. This effort ensures a long-term systematic 
record of frozen tissues from Alaska’s marine ecosystems. 
• Archiving  and  Curating  OCS  Biological  Specimens  by  the  Smithsonian  Institu-
tion.  Through  this  ongoing  project,  which  started  in  1979,  the  Smithsonian  In-
stitution,  National  Museum  of  Natural  History,  provides  for  the  long-term  reli-
able  maintenance  of  invertebrate  collections  from  MMS  offshore  studies.  This 
provides  MMS  with  a  biological  quality  assurance  for  information  collected  in 
support  of  decisions  made  in  the  OCS  natural  gas  and  oil  program.  The  OCS 
specimens  represent  one  of  the  most  extensive  collections  of  marine  inverte-
brates from U.S. continental shelves and slopes in terms of geographic coverage, 
number  of  taxonomic  groups,  sampling  density,  and  associated  data  collected 
concomitantly  with  the  specimens.  Hundreds  of  new  species  have  been  discov-
ered  as  a  result  of  MMS  research  projects  and  this  collection  contains  those 
‘‘type’’  specimens.  In  addition  to  the  establishment  of  a  long-term  record  of  in-
vertebrates and reliable maintenance, the Smithsonian provides ready access to 
these  specimens  by  qualified  investigators  and  distributes  excess  materials  to 
other qualified museums and teaching collections. 

Question 2. Does the MMS do economic analysis of not only the benefits of oil and 
gas  revenue,  but  also  the  economic  benefits  of  alternative  uses  of  the  OCS  when  it 
considers a lease proposal? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

Answer.  As  part  of  the  development  process  of  the  5-Year  Oil  and  Gas  Leasing 
Program,  MMS  is  required  to  consider  a  ‘‘No  Action’’  alternative.  As  part  of  this 
analysis,  MMS  does  estimate  the  amount  and  percentage  of  alternative  sources  of 
energy the economy would have to adopt if the 5-year oil and gas program were not 
implemented  and  its  proposed  lease  sales  were  not  held.  In  other  words,  energy  al-
ternatives are considered at the 5-year programmatic national level rather than for 
a specific lease or set of leases. 

Section 18 of the OCS Lands Act requires the Secretary of the Interior to prepare 
and  maintain  a  schedule  of  proposed  OCS  oil  and  gas  lease  sales  determined  to 
‘‘best  meet  the  national  energy  needs  for  the  5-year  period  following  its  approval 
and  re-approval.’’  Preparation  and  approval  of  a  5-year  oil  and  gas  program  must 
be based on a consideration of principles and factors specified in section 18. In com-
pliance  with  section  18,  the  MMS  performs  a  cost-benefit  or  ‘‘net  benefits’’  analysis 
of  the  value  of  all  available  resources  in  the  proposed  final  program.  Section  18  re-
quires the Secretary consider ‘‘other uses of the sea and seabed, including fisheries, 
navigation or proposed sealanes, potential sites of deepwater ports, and other antici-
pated uses of the resources and space of the outer Continental Shelf.’’ The analysis 
examines the benefits to society associated with OCS oil and natural gas production 
commensurate with the accompanying costs. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

SARAH W. COOKSEY 

Federal Financial Support 

Question  1.  Ms.  Cooksey,  what  is  the  appropriate  level  of  Federal  funding  that 
coastal  states  need  to  properly  and  effectively  implement  their  Coastal  Zone  Man-
agement  programs?  Do  the  funding  authorization  numbers  in  S.  360  meet  those 
needs? 

Answer. The appropriate funding levels for the CZMA should be increased to more 
closely  reflect  the  substantial  national  interest  and  goals  set  out  in  the  CZMA  to 
protect and enhance the Nation’s coastal and ocean resources, as well as to provide 
incentives  through  matching-grants  for  the  administration  and  implementation  of 
CZMA  programs.  The  final  report  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  noted 
that funding for CZMA is a ‘‘significant concern’’. Overall funding and the $2 million 
cap  on  state  administrative  and  enhancement  grants  in  effect  since  1992  ‘hampers 
program  implementation,  limiting  the  states’  ability  to  effectively  carry  out  impor-
tant program functions . . . .’’ 

As I noted in my oral remarks and written testimony, the Ocean Commission re-
port documents the significant national benefits of well-planned and managed coast-
al  resources  and  communities,  as  well  as  the  increasing  challenges  that  are  facing 
coastal management programs. These include increasing population density and de-
velopment pressure; habitat fragmentation; user conflicts; coastal storms and coast-
al  hazards;  travel,  tourism,  and  the  growth  of  secondary  homes;  mandates  to  de-
velop coastal nonpoint pollution programs; and emerging demand for use of offshore 
waters  including  aquaculture,  alternative  energy,  sand  mining,  and  marine  pro-
tected areas. 

State-based  coastal  programs  provide  an  essential,  integrated  programmatic  and 
planning approach to assure that these diverse factors and issues are considered in 
managing  coastal  and  ocean  resources.  Current  CZMA  funding  has  not  kept  pace 
with the demand on administration and implementation of these programs. In addi-
tion  demand  is  growing  for  support  of  coastal  communities  to  enhance  capacity  to 
make  the  complex  growth  management  decisions  necessary  to  assure  that  natural 
and  economic  resources  are  preserved  and  increased  for  the  benefit  of  this  and  fu-
ture generations. 

The  Ocean  Commission  report  specifically  recommended  the  following  increases 
from current levels for CZM-related programs: $35 million in the first year, and $95 
million  annually  thereafter  for  CZM  program  grants;  $20  million  in  the  first  year 
and  $60  million  annually  thereafter  for  integrated  coastal  and  watershed  manage-
ment;  $35  million  in  the  first  year  and  $70  million  thereafter  for  coastal  land  con-
servation  grants.  In  addition,  the  Commission  noted  the  need  to  provide  incentives 
for  improved  regional,  ecosystem-based  ocean  management  that  builds  on  current 
state  ocean  management  efforts  under  the  CZMA,  as  well  as  regional  initiatives. 
The CZMA includes authority to provide grants for development of more comprehen-
sive  state  ocean  management  plans  and  pilots  projects  to  enhance  regional  eco-
system-based ocean management. 

The Commission also recognized the need for increased funding for state-based re-
gional  resource  assessments  and  information  programs  to  inform  coastal  and  ocean 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

management  decisions  recommending  $9.75  million  in  year  one  and  $36.75  million 
thereafter  for  regional  assessments  and  information  programs.  It  should  be  noted 
that  these  funds  are  the  minimum  that  is  necessary  to  assure  that  the  programs, 
policies,  and  plans  are  in  place  to  guide  well-planned,  prosperous  communities  and 
productive  coastal  ecosystems,  and  to  provide  that  key  coastal  and  ocean  manage-
ment projects and best practices are implemented. The Ocean Commission also rec-
ommends that an Ocean Policy Trust Fund be established beginning at $500 million 
annually  and  increasing  to  $1  billion  annually  in  the  third  year  for  more  com-
prehensive implementation of state, territorial, and tribal ocean and coastal respon-
sibilities. 

The funding recommendations in S. 360 substantially track the recommendations 
of  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy.  The  increases  provided—if  actually  fund-
ed—will provide for distribution of grants to all states on an equitable basis thereby 
relieving  the  artificial  constraints  of  the  ‘‘cap’’  on  program  administrative  and  en-
hancement  grants  under  sections  306  and  309.  Clarification  of  authorities  under 
306A will encourage the use of more funding for restoration and waterfront revital-
ization  projects.  The  new  funding  provided  for  Coastal  Community  grants  will  pro-
vide much needed support for projects and activities ‘‘on-the-ground’’ in coastal com-
munities, including funding for improved management of nonpoint pollution. 

As  recommended  in  my  written  testimony,  we  suggest  that  the  final  version  of 
S. 360 be amended to increase funding authorized for grants to the National Estua-
rine  Research  Reserve  System  to  $22  million  in  the  first  year  increasing  thereafter 
to provide necessary support for system-wide monitoring, coastal training, and other 
program  initiatives.  Finally,  we  recommend  that  funding  be  provided  under  section 
308  of  the  Act  for  regional  pilot  projects  and  under  section  310  to  support  regional 
resource assessment and information programs. It is our understanding that author-
ization  for  coastal  land  conservation  will  be  provided  separately  under  a  proposed 
Coastal and Estuarine Land Protection Act. 
OCS Regulatory Process 

Question 2. Are coastal states finding problems with any lack of predictability and 
clarity  in  Outer  Continental  Shelf  (OCS)  energy  development?  If  so,  what  may  be 
some  reasonable  ways  to  enhance  this  regulatory  clarity  from  the  perspective  of 
coastal states? 

Answer.  The  current  CZMA  consistency  process  provides  an  excellent  framework 
for  coordinating  offshore  Federal  activities  and  permitted  activities  to  assure  that 
they  are  consistent  with  applicable  state  policies.  Coordination  between  and  under 
the  CZMA  and  the  Outer  Continental  Shelf  Lands  Act  has  worked  well  for  many 
years. Several states, including Louisiana and Alaska, have also entered into MOUs 
with the Minerals Management Service to further clarify and coordinate project re-
view. It is my understanding that these have worked well and should be encouraged 
in other states and with other agencies as needed. 

Amendments to the CZMA consistency regulations, which would further clarify co-
ordination  and  provide  predictability,  have  inexplicably  been  held  up  in  internal 
OMB  review  for  several  years.  Many  of  the  problems  that  do  arise  result  from  the 
lack of familiarity of the Federal agencies and permit applicants with the applicable 
state  requirements  and  consistency  process.  In  addition,  the  Federal  agencies  and 
applicants often fail to consult with the states and to incorporate these policies early 
enough  into  the  Federal  planning  process.  There  seems  to  be  a  misperception  in 
some Federal agencies that the CZMA requirements are extraneous, additional state 
requirements when, in fact, they are part of a Federally approved CZM program and 
should be included as an integral part of any Federal proposal. Because all applica-
ble,  enforceable  policies  must  be  identified  in  a  state’s  Federally  approved  CZMA 
plan,  it  is  not  clear  what  the  real  concern  is  with  ‘‘clarity  and  predictability.’’  (In 
some cases, those objecting may simply disagree with the outcome.) NOAA provides 
periodic  consistency  training  workshops  for  other  Federal  agencies  and  interested 
parties.  Support  for  these  educational  and  agency  training  efforts  should  be  in-
creased. 

Concerns  about  the  lack  of  predictability  have  been  raised  primarily  with  regard 
to the CZMA consistency appeal time frames. These are beyond control of the states 
and  are  managed  by  the  Secretary  of  Commerce.  The  vast  majority  of  consistency 
decisions  and  the  appeal  are  processed  without  any  significant  concerns.  The  pro-
posed  consistency  regulations  provide  a  more  certain  deadline  for  development  of 
the appeals record and decision by the Secretary. This timeline is designed to assure 
the availability of full record on appeal for the Secretary and to avoid project delay. 
Unlike offshore oil and gas development for which there is a comprehensive man-
agement regime under the OCSLA, there is considerable uncertainty regarding pro-
posal  for  offshore  siting  renewable  energy  facilities  such  as  wind  farms,  as  well  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

citing  of  LNG  facilities.  Currently,  there  is  no  Federal-state  coordinated  manage-
ment  framework  to  review  these  and  other  emerging  offshore  energy  related  activi-
ties. Many states are concerned that the current permit-by-permit, project-by-project 
approach  to  these  proposals  under  section  10  of  the  Rivers  and  Harbors  Act  and/ 
or  the  Natural  Gas  Act  do  not  adequately  protect  state  interests  and  prerogatives, 
fail to adequately consider regional ecosystem needs or comprehensive consideration 
of  alternatives,  and  fail  to  include  adequate  environmental  safeguards.  The  states 
would like to work with the Federal agencies and Congress to develop a comprehen-
sive  management  regime  for  these  and  other  energy  related  activities  that  address 
these  state  concerns,  set  out  a  more  predictable  process  and  that  do  not  preempt 
current state authority. 
OCS Resource Development 

Question  3.  Ms.  Cooksey,  how  do  coastal  states  view  the  challenges  inherent  in 
developing offshore energy? What can we do to better address the concerns of coast-
al states? 

Answer.  I  think  it  is  fair  to  say  that  states,  like  the  Nation  at  large,  are  not  of 
one  mind  regarding  the  challenges  of  developing  offshore  energy.  Those  challenges 
are  complex  and  include  numerous  policy,  technical,  legal,  economic,  cultural,  and 
social questions which can vary state to state. While Louisiana and Texas have long 
supported offshore energy development, New Jersey, Maine, and Florida do not have 
the  same  approach.  All  those  states  agree,  however,  on  the  importance  of  state  re-
view. There are significant national interests relating to offshore energy production 
as well as to its transportation and distribution which have disproportionate impact 
on  coastal  states.  There  are  also  substantial  national  and  state  interests  and  bene-
fits  generated  by  managing  productive  fisheries,  assuring  conservation  of  critical 
marine resources and supporting travel and tourism and economic development that 
depends on healthy marine ecosystems that may or may not be compatible with off-
shore energy development. 

As  I  noted  in  the  answer  to  the  previous  question,  there  is  agreement  among 
coastal states that they have significant sovereign and economic interests in the de-
velopment of offshore energy both within and potentially affecting state waters, and 
on the Outer Continental Shelf off their shorelines. These principles are well estab-
lished in the CZMA, OCSLA, and Deepwater Port Act, and should form the baseline 
for the Federal Government in working with the states to address the current chal-
lenges  of  offshore  energy  development.  In  addressing  the  challenges  of  offshore  en-
ergy  development,  states  share  the  view  that  there  is  a  need  to  protect  state  inter-
ests  and  prerogatives,  provide  for  comprehensive  consideration  of  alternatives,  and 
consideration  of  environmental  safeguards  including  a  management  regime.  For 
many  years  and  through  several  Administrations  and  Congresses  there  has  been 
agreement  that  areas  such  as  those  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  would  be  available  for 
offshore  energy  development,  while  other  areas  would  be  set  aside  for  moratoria. 
While  not  everyone  may  agree  with  this  framework,  it  does  currently  reflect  the 
closest  thing  we  have  to  a  national  consensus.  As  noted  above,  demand  for  renew-
able energy and other energy related purposes are giving rise to new challenges and 
it is important that Congress and the Administration work closely to develop a com-
mon framework for addressing these challenges. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

SARAH CHASIS 

Nonpoint Pollution Control 

Question 1. Ms. Chasis, do you have other ideas for incentive-based programs that 

would help control nonpoint source pollution? 

Answer.  Yes.  We  support  the  following  recommendations  made  by  the  U.S.  Com-

mission on Ocean Policy (USCOP) and the Pew Ocean Commission (POC): 

• USDA should align its conservation programs and funding with other programs 
aimed  at  reducing  nonpoint  source  pollution,  such  as  those  of  EPA  and  NOAA. 
(USCOP) 
• Congress  should  provide  authority  under  the  Clean  Water  Act  and  other  appli-
cable  laws  for  Federal  agencies  to  establish  enforceable  management  measures 
for  nonpoint  sources  of  pollution  and  impose  financial  disincentives  related  to 
programs  that  result  in  water  quality  degradation  if  a  state  persistently  fails 
to  make  meaningful  progress  in  meeting  water  quality  standards  on  its  own. 
(USCOP) 
• Congress should link receipt of agricultural and other Federal subsidies to com-

pliance with the Clean Water Act. (POC) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Cooperation in Governance 

80 

Question 2. Ms. Chasis, do you have other ideas for incentive-based programs that 

would help improve interstate and interjurisdictional coordination? 

Answer.  Yes.  It  would  be  very  helpful  to  have  incentive-based  programs  that  en-

courage regional ocean governance frameworks that would: 

• Undertake regional ecosystem assessments to guide management decisions; 
• Identify  priority  problems  within  regions  and  assess  the  capacity  of  existing 

governance mechanisms to address those problems; 

• Develop  a  strategic  plan  that  takes  an  adaptive,  ecosystem-based  management 

approach to solving the priority problems; 

• Identify short and long-term goals, responsibilities for taking actions to achieve 

those goals, and the necessary resources. 

• Representatives of Federal, state, and tribal governments should be encouraged 
to  participate  in  such  regional  governance  frameworks  and  to  develop  and  im-
plement the strategic plan using existing legal authorities. 

• Federal agencies should be encouraged to identify opportunities to better coordi-
nate  and  integrate  their  existing  programs  or  activities  to  more  efficiently  and 
effectively support implementation of such plans. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

DR. W. DONALD HUDSON, JR., PH.D. 

Nonpoint Pollution Control 

Question 1. What are the effects of inconsistent and declining Federal funding on 

Maine’s coastal program? How serious of a problem is it? 

Answer. Maine has experienced a decline in both CZMA Section 306 base program 
funds  and  Section  310  Coastal  NonPoint  Implementation  Funds.  For  Section  306, 
a  funding  reduction  of  60K  for  the  fiscal  year  beginning  July  1,  2005  resulted  in: 
(a) the elimination of a contract position that coordinated citizen water quality mon-
itoring programs, (b) cuts in education and outreach project funds, and (c) belt-tight-
ening  with  respect  to  ‘‘all  other’’  program  expenses  including  professional  develop-
ment and presentation of Maine’s work at national conferences. Further cuts in Sec-
tion 306 funds would necessitate cuts in CZM positions and/or elimination of entire 
program focus areas. 

With  respect  to  Section  310  Coastal  Non  Point  Funds,  Maine’s  program  for  the 
fiscal  year  beginning  July  1,  2005  was  cut  by  more  than  $400,000.  Our  coastal 
nonpoint  program  is  now  a  skeleton  program,  staffed  by  a  0.5  FTE  (Full-Time 
Equivalent)  coastal  watershed  planner,  with  sufficient  funding  for  only  two  imple-
mentation  projects,  the  Clean  Marina  program  (a)  partnership  with  the  Maine  Ma-
rine  Trades  Association)  and  the  Nonpoint  Education  for  Municipal  Officials  Pro-
gram.  These  cuts  resulted  in:  (a)  elimination  of  our  local  coastal  nonpoint  pollution 
grants and (b) reducing, by 2.2 FTE (at the Maine DEP), municipal technical assist-
ance efforts for stormwater management. 

Our budget situation is dire. With Maine’s state budget crisis, it is not likely that 
coastal nonpoint pollution programs will receive additional state funding in the near 
term.  Additional  cuts  in  Federal  funding  for  coastal  nonpoint  will  all  but  eliminate 
our  considerably  decreased  efforts.  Nonpoint  source  pollution  was  cited  by  both  the 
Pew  Commission  and  the  U.S.  Ocean  Commission  as  a  pervasive  source  of  the  ma-
jority  of  pollutants  to  our  coastal  zone.  Consistent,  long-term  funding  for  coastal 
nonpoint  is  necessary  to:  (a)  form  and  build  capacity  with  watershed  groups;  (b) 
monitor and survey to find sources of pollution; (c) fix pollution sources; (d) prevent 
additional  NPS  by  working  with  towns  on  land  use  planning,  regulation,  enforce-
ment  and  stormwater  management;  and  (e)  educating  the  public  about  NPS  reduc-
tion efforts that they can employ on private lands. 

Question 2. My bill, S. 360, would authorize additional funding for nonpoint pollu-

tion control programs—would this alleviate the financial problems facing Maine? 

Answer.  Yes,  provided  that  additional  funds  for  nonpoint  were  not  a  ‘‘zero  sum 

game’’ that reduced funding for other CZM programs. 

Question  3.  What  else  can  we  do  to  support  state  nonpoint  pollution  control  ef-

Answer. Additional suggested strategies are as follows: 
• Remove  the  Penalty  Provision  in  the  current  Section  6217  Program.  Removing 
the penalty provision levels the playing field and permits those States and Ter-

forts? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ritories  with  unapproved  programs  to  begin  implementing  their  management 
strategies addressing coastal nonpoint source pollution. 

81 

• Add  more  specific  language  into  S.  360  that  recognizes  the  importance  of  deal-
ing  with  water  quality,  specifically  nonpoint  source  pollution  as  it  relates  to 
land  use  changes  and  their  impacts,  with  greater  emphasis  on  the  impacts  of 
uncontrolled growth. 

• Consider implementation contained in the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy Re-

port specifically: 
—Recommendation  14-7.  The  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture  (USDA)  should 
align  its  conservation  programs  and  funding  with  other  programs  aimed  at 
reducing  nonpoint  source  pollution,  such  as  those  of  the  U.S.  Environmental 
Protection Agency and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration. 
—Recommendation  14-8.  The  National  Ocean  Council  (NOC),  working  with 
states,  should  establish  reduction  of  nonpoint  source  pollution  in  coastal  wa-
tersheds  as  a  national  goal,  with  a  particular  focus  on  impaired  watersheds. 
The  NOC  should  then  set  specific,  measurable  objectives  to  meet  human 
health-  and  ecosystem-based  water  quality  standards.  The  NOC  should  en-
sure  that  all  Federal  nonpoint  source  pollution  programs  are  coordinated  to 
attain those objectives. 

—Recommendation 14-9. The National Ocean Council should strengthen efforts 
to address nonpoint source pollution by evaluating the nonpoint source pollu-
tion control programs established under Section 6217 of the Coastal Zone Act 
Reauthorization  Amendments  and  under  Section  319  of  the  Clean  Water  Act 
and  making  recommendations  to  Congress  for  improvements  to  these  pro-
grams, including their possible consolidation. 

• Consider  implementing  the  recommendations  in  the  Pew  Ocean  Commission’s 
Report  on  Sprawl  and  Coastal  Pollution  regarding  the  management  of  growth 
as it relates to water quality specifically: 
—Acknowledge the role that Federal infrastructure and Federally funded infra-
structure  (roads,  sewers,  housing,  government  offices)  has  on  local  and  re-
gional growth patterns. Require that Federal efforts minimize land conversion 
and provide alternatives to automobile travel. 

—The  Transportation  Equity  Act  for  the  21st  Century  (TEA–21)  could  shift 
more  funding  from  highway  construction  to  land-use  planning  that  promotes 
better travel patterns. 

—Incorporate  a  regional  watershed  approach  into  the  Total  Maximum  Daily 

Load (TMDL) process to minimize the impacts from new development. 

—Coordinate  wastewater  treatment  facility  funding  with  regional  watershed 

planning efforts. 

—In  National  Environmental  Policy  Act  (NEPA)  permitting,  an  alternatives 
analysis  is  required  to  determine  development  scenarios  that  minimize  the 
amount  and  nature  of  impacts  on  natural  resources.  The  NEPA  alternatives 
analysis  provision  should  be  rewritten  to  explicitly  require  that  alternative 
land-use  scenarios  be  analyzed  when  evaluating  damage  to  aquatic  and  ter-
restrial ecosystems. 

Coastal Community Grants Program 

Question  4.  Could  you  please  tell  me  what  an  enhanced  Section  309  Community 
Grant Program would allow Maine to do to plan for a vibrant future for our coastal 
communities? 

Answer. Maine provides only about 2 percent of its CZM resources to communities 
in  the  form  of  local  grants.  This  funding  scenario  has  existed  for  more  than  10 
years,  due  to  competing  demands  for  program  priorities,  reduced  state  budgets  and 
capped  Federal  funding.  The  CZMA  was  established  as  a  Federal-state-local  part-
nership  and  an  enhanced  Section  309  grant  program  would  allow  Maine  to  renew 
its  commitment  to  coastal  towns.  Coastal  municipal  officials  and  residents  are  cur-
rently  overwhelmed  at  the  quantity  and  timing  of  new  development  in  their  towns 
and the resultant impacts on traditional uses and culture. Most of the coastal towns 
in York County have building caps in place, housing prices are at an all time high, 
coastal access is insufficient and coastal habitats are being compromised. Local offi-
cials and citizens need to see local results to feel that the CZM program is relevant 
to them and that it warrants their support. With a bit of assistance, however, coast-
al  towns  like  Brunswick,  Maine  become  national  leaders  (recognized  by  NOAA)  for 
their exemplary efforts at coastal watershed protection. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

Specific  areas  of  demonstrated  need  at  the  community  level  in  Maine  are  water-
front  revitalization  and  development  of  working  waterfront  strategies,  watershed 
and  coastal  pollution  plans,  harbor  management  plans,  regional  open  space  and 
habitat  protection  plans,  drinking  water  supply  planning,  and  hazard  mitigation 
planning. 

Question 5. Would the Coastal Community Grants language in my bill allow these 

community plans and goals to be achieved? 

Answer.  The  language  in  S.  360  is  excellent  as  drafted.  One  concern  however,  is 
whether  a  new  Coastal  Community  Grant  program  in  Section  309  would  require 
coastal  community  grant-funded  projects  to  result  in  ‘‘program  changes’’,  e.g., 
changes  to  the  states’  approved  coastal  management  programs.  Currently,  Section 
309 funds are required to be focused on those projects that result in actual changes 
to  coastal  core  laws  and  other  formal  aspects  of  approved  coastal  management  pro-
grams. In Maine, we previously offered CZM grants to coastal municipalities to fund 
the  development  of  comprehensive  plans  and  land  use  ordinances,  but  learned  that 
this  was  an  ineligible  activity  unless  Maine  revised  its  entire  approved  program 
structure  to  incorporate  local  plans  into  our  approved  state  plan.  This  might  have 
caused  an  additional  layer  of  Federal  review  of  local  plans  and  was  not  considered 
desirable for Maine. 

Another question would be whether another type of Section 309 assessment would 
be required to qualify for community grant funds. Currently, Section 309 funds are 
available  to  states  that  periodically  complete  a  ‘‘309  assessment  and  strategy’’  and 
receive NOAA approval of same. The benefit of having a Coastal Community Grants 
program  would  be  to  be  responsive  to  pressing  local  and  regional  needs.  It  might 
not always be possible to pre-identify those needs in an upfront strategy. Since 309 
assessment and strategies are required to be prepared every five years, it would be 
difficult to anticipate community needs in the out years. Therefore, flexibility should 
be  a  key  ingredient  as  the  guidance  is  developed  for  a  new  Section  309A  program. 
Cooperation in Governance 

Question 6. What do you see as the role of the CZMA in fostering or contributing 

to regional governance of an area such as the Gulf of Maine? 

Answer. The CZMA and supporting state statutes in the NOAA approved Coastal 
Programs  provide  the  statutory  basis  for  regional  governance.  In  the  late  1980’s, 
when  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Program  was  conceived,  the  CZMA  had  Section  310  that 
provided funding to the states on a competitive basis for regional initiatives. NOAA 
provided $30,000 in seed funds to start-up the Gulf of Maine Program. The absence 
of ‘‘regional initiative’’ funding has impeded other regions from advancing a regional 
agenda.  It  is  timely  and  important  for  Congress  to  reinstate  a  specific  regional  ini-
tiatives  section  in  the  CZMA  (with  a  specific  appropriation)  that  both  incubates  re-
gional  efforts  consistent  with  the  goals  espoused  by  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean 
Policy  and  supports  national  interests  in  ongoing  interstate  and  international 
waterbodies.  Within  this  section  there  should  be  a  requirement  of  NOAA  to  foster 
interaction (e.g., a learning network as suggested in the recent Heinz Center ‘‘Inno-
vations  by  Design’’)  among  regional  efforts  to  accelerate  the  attainment  of  the  re-
sults  we  seek.  NOAA,  as  the  Nation’s  lead  coastal  and  ocean  agency,  needs  the  ca-
pacity  to  assist  and  enable  regional  efforts.  Most  important  would  be  staff  skilled 
and familiar with regional efforts. 

Question  7.  What  other  incentives  could  we  consider  to  help  sustain  coastal  state 

participation in this voluntary program? 

Answer. It is essential for Congress to create the flexibility with existing key Fed-
eral  statutes  that  accommodates  regional  needs  within  a  Federal  framework.  The 
present  approach  of  national  standards  that  apply  equally  everywhere  is  adminis-
tratively simple but fails to appreciate the distinct regional differences. An approach 
that  focuses  on  outcomes  and  allows  the  methods  used  to  accomplish  the  outcomes 
to  vary  will  enable  this  important  shift.  Federal  agencies  need  to  integrate  their 
overlapping and conflicting coastal and ocean mandates within a specific ecosystem 
context. 

Question  8.  How  else  can  we  encourage  coastal  states  to  work  with  their  neigh-

boring states in planning for coastal management? 

Answer. Key aspects of this approach include: 
• Overcoming historic differences that keep states from working with each other. 
• A  clear  (unvarnished)  articulation  of  the  issues  that  benefit  from  a  regional 
(interstate)  approach  AND  the  costs  of  pursuing  a  fragmented/dysfunctional 
state-by-state approach. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

proaches. 

• Technical  assistance  and  training  for  state  coastal  managers  on  regional  ap-
• Seed-funds for projects that address national interests in a regional context. 
• Working models of ecosystem-based management that can be adapted to specific 

areas. 

Preserving Working Waterfronts 

Question  9.  What  is  the  State  of  Maine  doing  under  the  CZMA  program  to  coun-

teract the disappearance of the working waterfront? 

Answer.  Protecting  working  access  to  the  coast  and  enhancing  Maine’s  ports  and 
harbors is a key objective of the Maine Coastal Program. The State Planning Office 
has joined with others to form the Working Waterfront Coalition (WWC), a coalition 
of more than 90 organizations, agencies, and individuals dedicated to preserving the 
working  waterfront.  The  Maine  Coastal  Program  has  been  heavily  involved  in  sup-
porting  the  work  of  the  coalition,  providing  funds  for  surveys  and  research  on  the 
status and trends in working access, supporting waterfront and harbor planning ef-
forts  of  coastal  towns,  and  participating  in  the  development  of  new  tax  policy  and 
public investment programs. 

Through  the  efforts  of  the  WWC,  tremendous  strides  have  been  made  in  raising 
public  awareness  of  the  issue  of  loss  of  access  and  in  developing  political  support 
for new policy measures. With support from the Governor’s Office, the Maine Legis-
lature  is  considering  the  creation  of  a  fishing  access  program  supported  by  public 
bonding  funds  to  purchase  ownership  rights  or  easements  on  lands  and  facilities 
crucial to assuring working access to the sea. 

Question 10. What possible amendments to the CZMA would help the State com-

bat this problem? 

Answer.  Recently  the  question  of  a  potential  Federal  role  in  protecting  working 
waterfronts  has  been  raised  and  discussed  by  the  Working  Waterfront  Coalition. 
The WWC has already met with Senator Collin’s staff and received an inquiry from 
Representative  Michaud’s  office  on  this  topic.  From  these  discussions  a  number  of 
opportunities have been identified: 

ments in securing fishing access rights and facilities; 

re-authorization of the CZMA or the Magnuson-Stevens Act; and 

• Federal  funding  would  be  very  helpful  to  combine  with  state  funds  for  invest-
• opportunities  exist  to  incorporate  new  or  amended  program  elements  into  the 
• a  Fishing  Legacy  Program,  modeled  on  the  Forest  Legacy  Program,  would  be 
an appropriate vehicle to link state level efforts with Federal level support. Ad-
ditional  program  or  agency  support  is  needed  to  carry  out  a  state  legacy  pro-
gram. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

THOMAS KITSOS, PH.D. 

Ocean Observations 

Question  1.  I  am  pleased  to  have  been  a  cosponsor  of  the  Ocean  and  Coastal  Ob-
servation  System  Act,  recently  reported  by  this  Committee.  New  Jersey  hosts  sev-
eral  key  research  facilities  that  will  become  part  of  the  backbone  of  this  ocean  ob-
serving  system,  such  as  LEO–15,  an  underwater  research  lab.  How  will  NOAA  en-
sure  that  these  pre-existing  facilities  remain  operational,  as  they  are  now  funded 
by individual grants to researchers? 

Answer.  NOAA  envisions  working  through  an  approved  IOOS  Regional  Associa-
tion certification process for including sub-regional observing networks and their ca-
pabilities into an integrated system. Pre-existing facilities such as LEO–15 and the 
underwater research lab would be important components of a certified Regional As-
sociation.  In  addition,  the  Jacques  Cousteau  Reserve  in  New  Jersey  participates  in 
the  System-Wide  Monitoring  Program  (SWMP)  of  the  National  Estuarine  Research 
Reserve  System,  which  is  also  a  national  backbone  component  of  IOOS.  Annual 
funding through the reserve system sustains this monitoring program. Provided an-
nual  appropriations  for  the  reserve  system  continue  at  the  level  of  the  President’s 
Request, the operational infrastructure of SWMP will be maintained at the Jacques 
Cousteau Reserve. 
Funding Equity 

Question 2. New Jersey has been receiving $2 million in Section 306 grants, which 
is  the  cap,  for  many  years.  As  most  states  are  also  at  the  cap,  the  ultimate  effect 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

is  that  population  and  coastline  is  essentially  no  longer  taken  into  consideration. 
However,  coastal  populations  are  growing  faster  than  inland  populations.  How  do 
you  propose  that  states  take  into  account  increasing  coastal  populations,  increased 
coastal  development,  and  increased  use  of  coastal  resources  without  adjusting  the 
funding allocations or providing more funds? 

Answer.  We  agree  the  cap  on  Section  306  funding  is  an  issue.  We  are  also  com-
mitted  to  the  equitable  distribution  of  funds.  The  underlying  allocation  formula,  as 
described  in  the  CZMA  and  regulations,  provides  a  workable  system  for  allocating 
funds, and does not require revision. NOAA’s ability to provide for the equitable dis-
tribution  of  funds  to  coastal  states  has  been  greatly  constrained  by  the  $2,000,000 
maximum per state cap on appropriated Section 306 funds, which has been imposed 
through  annual  appropriations  acts.  From  1992  to  2002,  the  total  appropriation  for 
Section  306/309  grants  has  doubled.  During  the  same  time  period,  the  cap  placed 
on  Section  306  funding  in  the  annual  appropriations  acts  remained  fixed  at 
$2,000,000.  Beginning  in  FY  2003,  the  appropriations  language  was  modified  to 
allow  Section  306  grants  to  exceed  $2,000,000  if  ‘‘funds  provided  for  ‘‘Coastal  Zone 
Management  Grants’’  exceed  funds  provided  in  the  previous  fiscal  year.  Provided 
further,  that  if  funds  provided  for  Coastal  Zone  Management  Grants  exceed  funds 
provided in the previous fiscal year, then no State shall receive more than 5 percent 
or  less  than  1  percent  of  the  additional  funds.’’  This  new  language  has  yet  to  be 
applied  in  practice,  as  appropriations  for  Coastal  Zone  Management  Grants  have 
not  increased  from  one  year  to  the  next  since  FY  2003.  The  best  way  to  address 
the  imbalances  that  developed  over  the  past  decade  is  to  eliminate  the  cap  as  pro-
posed by the President’s Budget in FY 2006 and prior years. 

NOAA is also committed to providing non-monetary assistance to help states man-
age  the  increasing  pressures  on  their  coastal  areas.  NOAA  supports,  and  will  con-
tinue  to  support,  state  management  efforts  through  research  on  coastal  issues,  the 
provision  of  training  and  technical  assistance,  technical  products,  and  management 
assistance. 
National Estuarine Research Reserves 

Question  3.  One  of  the  brightest  parts  of  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act 
(CZMA)  is  the  Estuarine  Research  Reserves,  which  conduct  education,  scientific  re-
search, and policy training. My State of New Jersey is fortunate to have the Jacques 
Cousteau  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve.  Will  NOAA  create  new  reserves 
even if no additional funding is provided? 

Answer.  NOAA  will  work  with  states  to  designate  new  reserves  only  when  addi-
tional  funding  is  provided.  About  10  years  ago,  NOAA  instituted  a  policy  of  not  ac-
cepting  nominations  for  new  reserves  until  the  budget  for  the  reserve  system  was 
at the level needed to operate the program effectively. Prior to that time, NOAA des-
ignated new reserves despite a lack of new resources, which had the negative effect 
of  reducing  funding  for  existing  reserves.  In  2001,  with  an  increase  in  funding  for 
the  reserve  system,  NOAA  decided  to  accept  nominations  for  new  reserves,  con-
sistent with the following policy: 

• NOAA  is  committed  to  completion  of  a  system  of  reserves  representing  the  di-
verse  biogeographic  and  typological  character  of  the  estuaries  of  the  United 
States and estuarine-like systems of the Great Lakes, consistent with available 
resources. 
• The  first  priority  for  use  of  NOAA  funding  is  to  support  the  operation  of  des-
ignated  reserves,  system-wide  projects  benefitting  designated  reserves  and  de-
velopment  of  reserves  in  states  that  currently  have  a  formal  commitment  from 
NOAA to proceed with the designation process. 
• Additional  reserves  (beyond  the  existing  26  designated  and  two  proposed  re-
serves) will be considered by NOAA only when: (a) sufficient funds are available 
to provide reserves continuing operations support after designation, and (b) suf-
ficient Federal staff and resources are available to adequately support new des-
ignation and operation activities. 

• Priorities for accepting new nominations are: 

—First  priority  will  be  given  to  nominations  that  incorporate  both  a  bio-
geographic region or sub-region and an estuary type not represented by exist-
ing or developing reserves (see NOAA regulations at 15 CFR 921). 

—Second  priority  will  be  given  to  nominations  that  incorporate  either  a  bio-
geographic subregion or an estuary type not represented by existing or devel-
oping reserves. 

NOAA has been working with Texas on the designation of a new reserve. We an-
ticipate  designation  of  the  proposed  Mission  Aransas  Estuary  Reserve  in  Texas  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

the  end  of  2005.  The  President’s  request  for  FY  2006  includes  an  increase  of 
$575,000  for  the  new  Texas  Reserve  and  funding  and  an  FTE  for  staff  in  NOAA’s 
Estuarine Reserves Division to work with Texas. NOAA has received requests from 
the  Governors  of  Wisconsin  and  Connecticut  to  begin  the  reserve  designation  proc-
ess. At this time, funding is not currently available to consider reserve site selection 
in these states. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DR. WALTER D. CRUICKSHANK 

Consistency Review: Alternative Energy 

Question. During the hearing, you mentioned that the Secretary of Interior should 
be given additional authority in Federal consistency appeals at least in part because 
the Nation lacks an overarching governance structure for outer continental shelf en-
ergy projects. You indicated that the suite of energy projects includes renewable en-
ergy  projects  in  addition  to  oil  and  gas  energy  projects.  In  your  opinion,  if  the  Sec-
retary  of  Interior  did  receive  this  new  authority,  would  renewable  energy  appeals 
be  a  significant  proportion  of  the  total  energy  appeals  the  Department  of  Interior 
would review? 

Answer.  The  Department  of  the  Interior  and  the  Department  of  Commerce  have 
worked  diligently  on  communicating  and  comprehending  each  other’s  concerns  over 
Federal  consistency  and  how  the  existing  Federal  regulatory  regime  manages  off-
shore  and  coastal  activities.  Dr.  Cruickshank  did  not  comment  on  the  issue  of  in-
creased  authority  for  the  Secretary  of  the  Interior  and  the  Department  of  the  Inte-
rior is not seeking additional authority in Federal consistency appeals. 

The Administration is seeking authority for the Secretary of the Interior to permit 
alternative  energy  and  energy-related  activities  on  the  Outer  Continental  Shelf 
(OCS).  With  this  new  authority,  all  OCS  alternative  energy  projects  would  be  sub-
ject  to  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  (CZMA)  review,  as  are  all  oil  and  gas  activi-
ties presently. Affected States would review these projects for consistency with State 
CZM plans and any appeal of a State consistency decision would still go to the Sec-
retary of Commerce. 

We believe it is speculative as to what percentage of future energy-related appeals 
will  be  for  renewable  energy  projects.  Given  the  small  percentage  overall  of  energy 
projects  that  are  objected  to  by  the  States  and  reviewed  by  the  Secretary  of  Com-
merce,  the  Department  of  the  Interior  would  expect  the  percentage  of  appeals  for 
renewable  energy  projects  to  also  be  low.  The  States  presently  review  many  types 
of energy projects under the CZMA such as OCS oil and gas projects, gas pipelines, 
onshore  and  offshore  liquefied  natural  gas  terminals,  nuclear  power  plants  and  hy-
droelectric  plants.  The  NOAA  records  indicate  that  of  the  thousands  of  energy 
projects  reviewed  by  States  under  the  CZMA  since  1978,  there  have  been  only  20 
appeals to the Secretary of Commerce. The Department of the Interior will of course 
be available to provide Commerce with any assistance required to develop the Com-
merce  Secretary’s  decision  record  for  CZMA  appeals  relating  to  energy  and  energy 
related activities on the Outer Continental Shelf. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

SARAH W. COOKSEY 

Streamlining Appeals 

Question  1.  The  potential  for  combining  Departmental  review  of  appeals,  rather 
than each permitting process occurring separately, was discussed at the hearing. In 
your opinion, are there potential drawbacks to this proposal for the States? 

Answer.  Fundamentally  states  want  to  assure  that  the  appeals  process  is  fair  to 
both sides, consistent with the principles of the Administrative Procedures Act, and 
preserves  the  discretion  of  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  include  such  information  for 
the record on appeal as needed to address the national interest standard set out in 
the CZMA. Combining review of appeals and relying on the record developed by an-
other agency such as FERC or MMS for their review purposes under other statutes 
could  result  in  unnecessarily  limiting  the  authority  of  the  Secretary.  The  ultimate 
result could be more costly and time consuming litigation over the Secretary’s deci-
sions rather than expediting final resolution of disputes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Integrating Coastal and Watershed Management 

86 

Question 2. What tools will states use to work towards integrating coastal and wa-
tershed  management  for  a  more  regional  approach  to  coastal  problems?  Are  there 
any additional tools that states need for this effort? 

Answer.  Under  S.  360,  states  would  have  clearer  authority  and  additional  re-
sources  to  address  watershed  issues  affecting  the  coastal  zone.  States  would  have 
the  flexibility  and  increased  resources  needed  to  make  use  of  current  tools  under 
the  CZMA  such  as  special  area  management  plans  to  integrate  watershed,  develop 
plans  to  protect  critical  coastal  resources  and  areas  of  particular  concern.  The  new 
coastal  communities  grants  (309A)  also  provide  much  needed  assistance  for  states 
that will be targeted to work at the community level to integrate watershed, coastal, 
and  growth  management  planning  to  more  effectively  address  land  use  and 
nonpoint  pollution  among  other  issues.  The  majority  of  states  also  have  approved 
or  conditionally  approved  coastal  nonpoint  pollution  programs,  many  of  which  ex-
tend up the watershed. The funding that is available to the states under S. 360 will 
be  available  to  states  to  reduce  the  cumulative  and  secondary  effects  of  polluted 
runoff on the coastal zone. 

The  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  proposes  that  there  be  an  interagency  effort  led  by 
EPA and NOAA to support community-based workshops that improve integration of 
coastal  and  watershed  management  efforts.  In  additional  to  these  targeted  work-
shops,  Congress  should  consider  providing  funding  through  CZMA  section  308  to 
provide  for  regional  pilot  projects  and  ongoing  support  for  innovate  state-based  ef-
forts  that  integrate  coastal  and  watershed  management.  As  noted  above  the  U.S. 
Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  specifically  supported  a  minimum  of  $20  million  to 
support  improved  coastal  watershed  management.  A  more  comprehensive  look 
should be taken on how to use Department of Agriculture conservation funding and 
Department  of  Transportation  Highway  mitigation  funds  as  an  effective  incentive 
for coastal watershed management initiatives. 
Education and the Estuarine Research Reserve System 

Question  3.  I  am  very  interested  in  improving  ocean  and  coastal  literacy  in  our 
country,  and  think  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  system  can  make  a 
great  contribution.  Does  the  Reserve  System  plan  to  focus  on  bringing  underrep-
resented groups into marine science or policy? 

Answer.  NOAA’s  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  (NERRS)  is  com-
mitted to bringing underrepresented groups into ocean and coastal science and pol-
icy. The NERRS has played a role in engaging underrepresented groups through the 
Environmental Cooperative Science Center, the NERRS Graduate Research Fellow-
ship program, and K–12 and community education programs. 

The  Environmental  Cooperative  Science  Center  (ECSC)  was  established  in  2000 
through  a  cooperative  agreement  between  NOAA  and  Florida  A&M  University,  in 
collaboration  with  Delaware  State  University,  Jackson  State  University,  Morgan 
State  University,  South  Carolina  State  University,  and  the  University  of  Miami 
Rosenstiel  School.  The  ECSC  member  institutions  are  all  Minority  Serving  Institu-
tions. The ECSC addresses ecological and management issues at five National Estu-
arine Research Reserves and the Florida Keys National Marine Sanctuary. Partner 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  include  Grand  Bay  Reserve  (Mississippi), 
Apalachicola  Reserve  (Florida),  ACE  Basin  Reserve  (South  Carolina),  Delaware  Re-
serve,  and  the  Chesapeake  Bay  Reserve  (Maryland).  The  participating  reserves  are 
actively  engaged  with  supporting  undergraduate  and  graduate  students  from  these 
Minority  Serving  Institutions  in  their  field  and  laboratory  research  and  often  serve 
as  research  mentors  for  student  research  program  development.  On  average,  each 
reserve  hosts  between  15–20  research  students  annually,  either  through  research 
projects  associated  with  academic  coursework  or  on  an  individual  researcher  basis 
through graduate programs. 

The NERRS Graduate Research Fellowship program provides master’s degree stu-
dents and Ph.D. candidates with an opportunity to conduct research of local and na-
tional  significance,  within  a  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve,  that  focuses  on 
enhancing  coastal  zone  management.  Students  from  Minority  Serving  Institutions 
have  been  encouraged  to  apply  to  this  program.  The  NERRS  are  committed  to  pro-
moting diversity within the Graduate Research Fellowship program and are sending 
information  about  the  program  to  professors  and  directors  of  marine  programs  at 
Minority Serving Institutions. 

Some  of  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserves  have  played  a  particularly 
strong  role  in  helping  to  bring  underrepresented  groups  into  ocean  and  coastal 
science  and  policy  through  their  K–12  and  community  education  programs.  The 
Jacques  Cousteau  Reserve,  in  New  Jersey,  has  partnered  with  the  Mid-Atlantic 
Center  for  Ocean  Sciences  Education  Excellence  to  develop  science  education  pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

grams  that  promote  participation  from  underrepresented  groups.  These  programs 
employ criteria to recruit minority educators into science enrichment programs, and 
capitalize on minority scientists as mentors and role models for our youth. Minority 
mentors  have  been  particularly  effective  in  advancing  ocean  and  coastal  literacy 
through classroom-based applications and activities. 

The Tijuana Reserve in California has developed partnerships, programs, and ma-
terials  specifically  targeting  underrepresented  groups.  Through  a  partnership  with 
San Diego State University and a local elementary school, the Tijuana Reserve has 
provided  opportunities  for  Hispanic  students  to  visit  the  Tijuana  Estuary.  In  addi-
tion,  the  reserve  launched  a  high  school  summer  internship  that  targets  Hispanic 
students. 

The  Elkhorn  Slough  Reserve  has  provided  outreach  into  the  Hispanic  commu-
nities along the central California coast through the Multicultural Education on Re-
source  Issues  Threatening  Oceans  program  (MERITO),  a  collaborative  effort  with 
State Parks and the Monterey Bay National Marine Sanctuary. As part of this pro-
gram,  students  learn  about  research  and  monitoring  projects  at  the  reserve.  They 
also  visit  other  wetland  systems,  local  beach  and  dune  restoration  sites,  municipal 
wastewater treatment plants, local water supply facilities, and a municipal recycling 
center. Through MERITO, the Elkhorn Slough Reserve developed a bilingual water-
shed  curriculum  that  is  being  used  in  after-school  programs.  The  reserve  has  also 
developed  a  number  of  partnerships  to  encourage  underrepresented  groups,  as  well 
as inner city youth, to seek ocean- and coastal-related careers. 

The  NERRS  hopes  to  play  a  stronger  role  in  the  future  in  fully  engaging  under-
represented groups, particularly if funding levels for NERRS education activities in-
creased.  With  additional  funding,  the  NERRS  could  increase  Graduate  Research 
Fellowship  opportunities  and  provide  additional  programs  and  products  aimed  at 
bringing underrepresented groups into ocean and coastal science and policy. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

SARAH CHASIS 

Streamlining the Consistency Appeals Process 

Question.  The  potential  for  combining  Departmental  review  of  appeals,  rather 
than each permitting process occurring separately, was discussed at the hearing. In 
your opinion, are there potential drawbacks to this proposal for the States? 

Answer. Yes. If the appeals process is streamlined as the industry has requested, 
there is a danger that the states and the Secretary will be missing key information 
with which to evaluate (in the case of a state) or decide (in the case of the Secretary) 
the  extent  of  environmental  harm  caused  by  a  proposed  project  and,  therefore, 
whether  it  is  consistent  with  the  CZMA.  This  is  because  the  ‘‘streamlining’’  provi-
sion advocated by the oil and gas industry (and included in the Senate Energy bill) 
would  not  allow  the  timeline  for  Secretarial  appeals  to  be  extended,  where  nec-
essary,  to  include  the  final  Environmental  Impact  Statement  or  final  Biological 
Opinion  under  the  Endangered  Species  Act  on  the  project.  Since  a  project  may  not 
proceed  without  these  final  documents,  there  is  no  reason  not  to  extend  the  appeal 
timeline  to  allow  consideration  of  these  important  and  highly  relevant  documents. 
Having the Final EIS and Biological Opinion is crucial to the Secretary’s evaluation 
of  an  appeal  from  a  state’s  objection  to  a  project  since  the  Secretary  is  supposed  to 
be weighing the environmental impacts of the project against the national interests 
served by the project. Clearly these environmental documents are crucial to that de-
cision.  The  streamlining  process  could  thus  work  to  the  disadvantage  of  the  states, 
the Secretary and the coastal environment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

THE NATURE CONSERVANCY 

Arlington, VA, June 10, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

On behalf of The Nature Conservancy, I am writing to urge the Committee to re-
port legislation to reauthorize the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). Both the 
President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the  final  report  of  the  U.S.  Commission  on 
Ocean  Policy  recommended  the  reauthorization  of  the  CZMA  and  highlight  its  im-
portance  in  ensuring  economically  vibrant  and  ecologically  sustainable  coastal  and 
ocean resources. 

The  final  report  of  the  Ocean  Commission  recommended  that  CZMA  reauthoriza-
tion  strengthen  the  planning  and  coordination  capabilities  of  coastal  states  to  ad-
dress watershed and ocean planning; increase Federal financial, technical and insti-
tutional support for conservation and restoration of coastal habitats; and support re-
gional  and  state  research  and  information  programs  that  support  coastal  resource 
assessments. This is a good start. 

The  Conservancy  supports  movement  toward  an  ecosystem  approach  to  manage-
ment  of  coastal  and  marine  resources  as  the  best  way  to  conserve  biological  diver-
sity. We see the partnership established between the states and the Federal Govern-
ment  under  the  Coastal  Zone  Management  Act  as  important  to  implementing  this 
approach to management, but stronger measures are needed: 

• Resources available to states under the CZMA are limited, particularly for many 
activities  related  to  on-the-ground  conservation.  Authorization  for  the  Coastal 
and  Estuarine  Land  Conservation  Program  and  increased  resources  to  support 
the stewardship portion of the NERRS program should be included. 
• Improved  coordination  across  jurisdictions  is  essential  to  manage  on  an  eco-
system basis. The Act should foster partnerships among states and within states 
that address upstream issues impacting coastal and nearshore resources. 
• Most  CZM  programs  lack  policies  and  strategies  for  proactive  management  for 
the  full  extent  of  state  waters.  Guidelines  should  encourage  states  to  engage  in 
comprehensive planning for all state waters in coordination with adjacent states 
and relevant Federal agencies. 
• Guidelines governing state improvement grants are restrictive and may unfortu-
nately  tend  to  limit  states’  ability  to  do  the  work  necessary  to  move  toward  eco-
system-based  management.  Provisions  of  the  CZMA  governing  grants  to  states 
should  be  modified  to  make  it  a  more  flexible,  useful  tool  to  stimulate  innova-
tive  approaches  to  adaptive,  ecosystem-based  management  as  called  for  by  the 
Commission and the U.S. Ocean Action Plan. 
• The  paucity  of  data  to  inform  management  is  a  perpetual  challenge  for  coastal 
and marine resource managers. NOAH should seek to stimulate increased man-
agement-oriented  research  to  support  states  as  they  move  towards  ecosystem- 
based management. 

The  Conservancy  would  like  to  work  with  you  in  the  coming  months  on  any  nec-
essary  changes  to  S.  360  and  to  ensure  its  passage  during  the  109th  Congress. 
Thank you for your efforts to enact this important legislation. 

Sincerely, 

LYNNE ZEITLIN HALE, 

Director, Global Marine Initiative 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

SCHOOL OF MARINE AFFAIRS 

Seattle, WA, May 23, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 

RE: S. 360 REAUTHORIZATION OF THE CZM ACT 

Dear Senators Stevens and Inouye: 
I  am  writing  to  urge  that  you  favorably  consider  S.  360,  Reauthorization  of  the 
Coastal Zone Management Act. As you know, this law was first adopted by Congress 
in 1972, has been reauthorized and amended at least six times since then, and has 
become an important part of the fabric of our environmental and resource manage-
ment  laws  of  the  country.  It  is  time  to  reauthorize  the  CZMA  again  in  light  of  the 
findings  and  new  directions  provided  by  the  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy 
(USCOP). 

I  have  actively  studied  the  development  and  implementation  of  the  CZMA  since 
1970. Between 1970 and 1975 I represented Louisiana on the Coastal States Organi-
zation when the law was first being debated in the Congress and in the early stages 
of  implementation.  I  founded  the  Coastal  Management  journal  in  1972  and  pub-
lished  papers  on  all  aspects  of  the  implementation  of  the  law  through  its  many 
phases.  In  1997  I  led  a  group  of  six  researchers  investigating  the  effectiveness  of 
the  CZMA  in  meeting  the  goals  set  for  it—and  found  that  the  CZM  programs  were 
effectively implementing the Act’s objectives. 

Most  recently  I  served  as  one  of  the  16  Commissioners  on  the  U.S.  Commission 
on  Ocean  Policy.  As  you  are  aware  the  Commission  studied  all  aspects  of  the  Na-
tion’s ocean and coastal policies. The coastal zone received a great deal of our atten-
tion—in  fact,  Part  IV,  consisting  of  chapters  9—13,  deal  with  issues  specific  to  the 
coastal  zone—population  growth,  hazards,  habitat,  sediment  and  transportation. 
However, throughout the report the role of the states is recognized as crucial to the 
implementation of a great many of our recommendations. 

The CZM programs are the most effective governmental tool available within the 
states for helping to achieve many of the recommendations of the USCOP. For this 
reason  it  is  important  that  the  law  be  reauthorized  and  appropriately  amended  to 
allow an effective state role in national ocean policy. Here are some examples taken 
from the USCOP report of how the states can assist meeting our national ocean pol-
icy and management needs: 

incorporate  watershed  management 

State-level socio-economic characteristics must be produced and kept up-to-date 
to determine the value of coastal regions (USCOP Ch. 1 and 25). 
States must take the lead in considering voluntary, regional processes for ocean 
issues,  and  in  developing  regional  ocean  information  programs  (USCOP  Ch.  5). 
States must interact closely with Federal agencies in formulating a coordinated 
offshore  management  regime  (USCOP  Ch.  6  and  9)  that  includes  consideration 
of  new  uses  such  as  marine  aquaculture  (USCOP  Ch.  22)  and  wind  energy 
(USCOP Ch. 24). 
State  coastal  programs  must  consider  accelerating  pressures  due  to  population 
growth,  and 
into  program  activities 
(USCOP Ch. 9). 
States must collect better data on hazard risks and losses, and upgrade mitiga-
tion planning (USCOP Ch. 10). 
State  coastal  programs  must  set  goals  for  habitat  restoration  and  undertake 
coastal  and  estuarine  land  conservation  with  Federal  funding  assistance 
(USCOP Ch. 11). 
States  must  be  active  in  the  shift  toward  comprehensive,  watershed  and  eco-
system-based sediment management regimes (USCOP Ch. 12). 
State  coastal  programs  are  central  in  the  efforts  to  improve  response  to  non- 
point sources of pollution (USCOP Ch. 14). 
States  are  key  players  in  the  effort  to  reduce  introduction  of  aquatic  invasive 
species (USCOP Ch. 17). 
States  should  receive  support  for  state-level  coral  reef  management  (USCOP 
Ch. 21). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

States are critical partners in emerging integrated ocean observing systems and 
can help insure useful information products (USCOP Ch. 26). 

To  achieve  these  goals  the  state  coastal  management  programs  need  to  be  main-
tained and their level of funding increased. These programs have proven to be flexi-
ble  and  adaptive  over  the  years,  capable  of  responding  to  new  issues  that  arise.  In 
the 1970s the coastal programs were used to experiment with coastal energy impact 
assistance.  In  the  1980s  they  were  used  to  establish  waterfront  restoration  pro-
grams.  In  the  1980s  and  1990s  they  have  been  effective  in  protecting  natural  re-
sources such as wetlands and beaches. In the 1990s they were used to improve man-
agement of coastal non-point pollution sources. I believe they can be extremely help-
ful in our current efforts to focus on coastal watersheds and offshore zones—the new 
areas of interest and attention. 

Thank you very much for your consideration. 

Sincerely, 

MARC J. HERSHMAN, 

Professor of Marine Affairs, Adjunct Professor of Law, University of Washington; 
Commissioner, U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy (2001–2004). 

cc:  Senators  Olympia  J.  Snowe  and  Maria  Cantwell,  Tony  McDonald,  Coastal 
States  Organization,  and  Admiral  James  Watkins,  Chairman,  U.S.  Commission  on 
Ocean Policy (2001–2004). 

AMERICAN PLANNING ASSOCIATION 

Washington DC, May 24, 2005 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Ranking Member, 
Hon. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 
Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senators, 

On  behalf  of  the  American  Planning  Association  (APA),  I  am  writing  to  urge  the 
Committee to support reauthorization of the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA), 
S.  360.  APA  applauds  your  leadership  in  bringing  this  important  issue  before  the 
Senate Commerce Committee for a hearing. Both the President’s U.S. Ocean Action 
Plan and the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy’s Final Report recommended the re-
authorization  of  CZMA  and  highlighted  its  importance  in  ensuring  economically  vi-
brant and ecologically sustainable coastal and ocean resources. 

CZMA  reauthorization  would  strengthen  the  planning  and  coordination  capabili-
ties  of  coastal  states  to  address  watershed  and  ocean  planning.  The  legislation 
would increase the ability of state and local officials to improve ocean resources and 
ecosystems  by  providing  technical,  institutional  and  financial  support  for  better 
planning and management of coastal development and land use. APA strongly sup-
ports  provisions  in  S.  360  to  create  a  Coastal  Community  Program.  These  grants 
would  help  implement  locally-devised  strategies  for  improving  coastal  communities, 
benefiting local economies and the environment. 

APA  represents  more  than  37,000  professional  planners,  local  officials,  and  en-
gaged citizens committed to good planning as a tool for creating communities of last 
value. Coastal planning and water policy issues are among APA’s top legislative pri-
orities  for  the  109th  Congress.  As  such,  we  strongly  endorse  S.  360  and  pledge  to 
work  with  you  in  advancing  this  important  legislation  and  other  key  elements  of 
ocean policy reform. 

Thank  you  for  your  leadership  on  behalf  of  coastal  communities  and  providing  a 

forum for discussion of CZMA reauthorization. 

Sincerely, 

W. PAUL FARMER, 

Executive Director and CEO 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:00 Jan 04, 2011 Jkt 063243 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63243.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

